रजिस्ट्री सं. डी.एल.- 33004/99 REGD. No. D. L.-33004/99 


LIslGa 
Che Gazette of India 


Ol.. -S7. We. -37.-4032024-25294 
CG-DL-E-4032024-25294 


असाधारण 
EXTRAORDINARY 
भाग वा---खण्ड 4 
PART II—Section 4 


प्राधिकार से प्रकाशित 
PUBLISHED BY AUTHORITY 
सं. 47] नई दिल्‍ली, बुधवार, मार्च 6, 2024/फाल्गुन 6, 945 
No. 47] NEW DELHI, WEDNESDAY, MARCH 6, 2024/PHALGUNA 6, 945 


भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ 
अधिसूचना 
नईं दिल्‍ली, 46 फरवरी, 2024 
भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ (नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम), विनियम 2023 


फा.सं. 44-7/2022-3mguqe; L—eaa—wna पर यथासंशोधित भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ 
अधिनियम, 4947 (4947 का XLVIII) की धारा i6(i) के अधीन प्रदत्त शक्तियों का प्रयोग करते हुए 
भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ एतदद्वारा निम्नलिखित विनियम बनाती है, यथा - 
4. लघु शीर्षक और प्रवर्तन 


i ये विनियम भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ fa प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) प्रशिक्षक 
कार्यक्रम), विनियम 2023 कहे जाएंगे | 


i. ये विनियम भारत के राजपत्र में इनकी अधिसूचना की तिथि से प्रभावी होंगे। 
2. परिभाषाएं 
इन विनियमों में, जब तक कि संदर्भ से अन्यथा अपेक्षित न हो, 
i. अधिनियम” का अभिप्राय समय-समय पर यथासंशोधित भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ अधिनियम, 4947 
(4947 का XLVI) से है; 


584 6ा/2024 () 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


i. 'परिषद्‌” का अभिप्राय अधिनियम के तहत गठित भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ से है; 

ii, “बीएमओएनसी“ का अभिप्राय बुनियादी आपातकालीन प्रसूति एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल से है; 
iv. ‘SRY का अभिप्राय प्रत्यक्ष रूप से अवलोकित प्रयोग से है; 

v. 'जीओआई” का अभिप्राय भारत सरकार से है; 

vi. 'एचडीयू” का अभिप्राय उच्च्च निर्भरता इकाई से है; 

vii. आईसीएम' का अभिप्राय अंतर्राष्ट्रीय प्रसाविका परिसंघ से हे; 
viii. “आईसीयू” का अभिप्राय गहन देखभाल इकाई से है; 

ix. “आईएमएनसीआई'” का अभिप्राय नवजात शिशु रोगों के एकीकृत प्रबंधन से है; 


x. लक्ष्य (LaQshya)' का अभिप्राय प्रसव कक्ष एवं प्रसूति शल्य-चिकित्सा कक्ष गुणवत्ता सुधार पहल 


xi. "एमसीक्यू' का अभिप्राय बहुविकल्पीय प्रश्नों से है; 
xii. "एमएलसीसी“ का अभिप्राय प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई वाली निरंतर देखभाल से है; 
xiii, “WHR का अभिप्राय प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई वाली देखभाल इकाइयों से है; 
xiv. एमएमआर' का अभिप्राय मातृ मृत्यु दर से है; 
xv. एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू” का अभिप्राय स्वास्थ्य एवं परिवार कल्याण मंत्रालय, भारत सरकार से है; 
xvi. एनएमटीआई'” का अभिप्राय राष्ट्रीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थान से है; 
xvii. 'एनपीएम” का अभिप्राय नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी से है; 
xviii. “ओबीजी” का अभिप्राय प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग से है; 
xix. “ओपीडी' का अभिप्राय बाह्य रोगी विभाग से है; 
xx. ‘sel’ का अभिप्राय शल्य-चिकित्सा कक्ष से हे; 
xxi. 'क्यूएमएनसी”' का अभिप्राय गुणवत्तापरक मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल से है; 
xxii, “आरएमएनसीएच” का अभिप्राय प्रजनन, मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु स्वास्थ्य से है; 


xxiii. आरएन एंड आरएम' का अभिप्राय एक पंजीकृत उपचर्या एवं पंजीकृत प्रसाविका (आरएन एंड 
आरएम) से है और एक ऐसे नर्स को दर्शाता है जिसने मान्यता प्राप्त नर्सिंग स्नातक (बी.एससी. 
नर्सिंग) या डिप्लोमा इन जनरल नर्सिंग एंड मिडवाइफरी (जीएनएम) पाठ्यक्रम, जैसा कि परिषद्‌ 
द्वारा निर्धारित किया गया हो, सफलतापूर्वक पूरा कर लिया हो और किसी एक एसएनआरसी में 
पंजीकृत उपचर्या एवं पंजीकृत प्रसाविका के रूप में पंजीकृत हो; 


xxiv. एसबीएल' का अभिप्राय परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन से है; 

xxv. 'एसडीए' का अभिप्राय सेफ डिलीवरी ऐप है; 

xxvi. 'एसडीजी' का अभिप्राय संघारणीय विकास लक्ष्य से है; 

xxvii. एसएमटीआई' का अभिप्राय राजकीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थान से है; 
xxviii. एसएनआरसी” का अभिप्राय संबंधित राज्य सरकारों द्वारा किसी भी नाम से गठित राज्य उपचर्या 

एवं प्रसाविका पंजीकरण परिषद्‌ से है; 
xxix. "Qual का अभिप्राय है सार्वभौमिक स्वास्थ्य कवरेज से है; 
xxx. 'यूएनएफपीए' का अभिप्राय है यूनाइटेड नेशंस पॉपूलेशन फंड से है; 


xxxi. 'डब्ल्यूएचओ' का अभिप्राय है विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन से है। 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3 


नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम! 
4. परिचय एवं पृष्ठभूमि 
4.4 परिचय 


भारत सन्‌ 2045 में, 493 सदस्य देशों वाले संधारणीय विकास लक्ष्य (एसडीजी) समूह का सदस्य बना, 
जिसका लक्ष्य सन्‌ 2030 तक दुनिया को अधिक समृद्ध, अधिक समान और सभी के लिए अधिक सुरक्षित 
ग्रह बनाना है। यह कहने की आवश्यकता नहीं है कि भारत की जिम्मेदारी बहुत अधिक है क्योंकि हमारे 
देश में रहने वाली दुनिया की एक-छठी आबादी की प्रगति को गति दिए बिना इन महत्वाकांक्षी लक्ष्यों को 
प्राप्त नहीं किया जा सकता है। 


स्वास्थ्य, भारत सरकार द्वारा की गई प्रतिबद्धताओं का केंद्र बिंदु है। हमें सभी आयु वर्ग के लोगों के 
लिए स्वस्थ जीवन और सभी की भलाई सुनिश्चित करने में सक्षम होने के लिए, हमारे मुख्य स्वास्थ्य 
संकेतकों, जिसमें मातृ एवं शिशु मृत्यु दर शामिल हैं, में सुधार लाने पर ध्यान देना होगा। 


कोई भी गर्भवती महिला इस विश्वास के साथ स्वास्थ्य व्यवस्था में प्रवेश करती है कि वहां पर उसे 
और उसके नवजात शिशु को उच्च गुणवत्ता वाली स्वास्थ्य सेवाएं मिलेंगी। इस विश्वास के प्रत्युत्तर स्वरूप 
भारत ने देश में मातृ एवं शिशु स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं को राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य मिशन के तहत और अधिक सुदृढ़ 
बनाया है। भारत ने गत कुछ दशकों में राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य मिशन तथा जननी सुरक्षा योजना और जननी 
शिशु सुरक्षा कार्यक्रम जैसी योजनाओं के माध्यम से Gerd weal की संख्या को सुधारने में अदभुत 
प्रगति की है, जिससे मातृ एवं शिशु मृत्यु दर में बहुत कमी आई है। नमूना पंजीकरण प्रणाली के अनुसार 
भारत का मातृ मृत्यु अनुपात 2004-06 में 254 प्रति लाख सजीव प्रसव से घटकर 2044-6 में 430 प्रति 
लाख सजीव प्रसव हुआ है। भारत ने मातृ मृत्यु दर को कम करने की दिशा में प्रभावशाली प्रगति की है, 
जो इस तथ्य से परिलक्षित होती है कि मातृ मृत्यु दर (एमएमआर) की संयोजित वाषिक दर की गिरावट 
में काफी वृद्धि हुई है (2007-09 से 2044-43 के दौरान) 5.8: से (2044-43 से 2044-46 के दौरान) 8. 
oi:| इसी तरह की उपलब्धियां पांच वर्ष से कम आयु वाले बच्चों की मृत्यु दर और शिशु मृत्यु दर में 
आई कमी में भी परिलक्षित होती हैं। 


मातृ एवं शिशु स्वास्थ्य पर निवेश, राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य मिशन का एक प्रमुख क्षेत्र है। प्राथमिक 
निर्देशपरक इकाइयों, नए मातृ एवं शिशु स्वास्थ्य खंडों, प्रसूति हेतु उच्च निर्भरता इकाइयों एवं गहन 
देखभाल इकाइयों का परिचालन; दक्षता प्रशिक्षण जैसी क्षमता निर्माण पहल; प्रधान मंत्री सुरक्षित मातृत्व 
अभियान जैसे गुणवत्तापरक प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल कार्यक्रमों का सुदृढ़ीकरण, आदि प्रमुख प्राथमिकता बनी हुई 
हैं | 

उपरोक्त के अलावा, भारत सरकार द्वारा हाल ही में लक्ष्य (LaQshya) — प्रसव कक्ष एवं प्रसूति 
शल्य-चिकित्सा कक्ष गुणवत्ता सुधार पहल शुरू की गई है। पर्याप्त मात्रा में वैश्विक साक्ष्य विद्यमान हैं कि 
जननी और नवजात शिशुओं के जीवन को बचाने के लिए शिशु जन्म के समय और उसके तुरंत बाद 
उनकी देखभाल करना अत्यधिक महत्त्वपूर्ण है। व्हाइट रिबन एलायंस द्वारा किए गए अध्ययनों में भी Pree 
मातृत्व देखभाल पर ध्यान देने की आवश्यकता पर प्रकाश डाला गया है। इस प्रकार लक्ष्य कार्यक्रम को 
प्रसव के दौरान तथा प्रसव के तुरंत बाद गुणवत्तापरक देखभाल प्रदान करने और शिष्ट मातृत्व देखभाल 
को बढ़ावा देने के लिए शुरू किया गया है। 


अदभुत प्रगति के बावजूद, अभी भी हर वर्ष गर्भावस्‍था, प्रसव और प्रसवोत्तर अवधि के दौरान लगभग 
32,000 गर्भवती महिलाओं की मृत्यु हो जाती है। इसके अलावा, हर वर्ष जन्म के बाद पहले माह के 
दौरान ही लगभग 5,90,000 नवजात शिशुओं की मृत्यु हो जाती है। भारत में सार्वभौमिक स्वास्थ्य कवरेज 
(यूएचसी) को सुधारने और मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु तथा बाल स्वास्थ्य हेतु संधारणीय विकास लक्ष्यों 
(एसडीजी) को प्राप्त करने के लिए अतिरिक्त प्रयास करना आवश्यक हे। राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य नीति 2047 का 
उद्देश्य है सन्‌ 2020 तक मातृ मृत्यु दर को 400 प्रति लाख सजीव प्रसव तक कम करना। 


‘gg अभिलेख भारत सरकार के स्वास्थ्य एवं परिवार कल्याण मंत्रालय और भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ द्वारा अंतर्राष्ट्रीय प्रसाविका परिसंघ के सहयोग से 
विकसित किया गया है और राष्ट्रीय मिडवाइफरी कार्य बल की पाठ्यक्रम उपसमिति के आदानों पर आधारित है। 


4 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


महिलाओं एवं नवजात शिशुओं की उत्तरजीविता का गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान तथा इससे भी अधिक प्रसव 
के समय मिलने वाली देखभाल और बरती गई सावधानियों के साथ गहरा संबंध है। कुशल देखभाल तक 
पहुंच उपलब्ध नहीं होने के कारण प्रसव के मामलों का देरी से प्रबंधन, खासकर ग्रामीण इलाकों में, मृत्यु 
का एक प्रमुख कारण है। प्रसव के दौरान कुशल एवं Ree देखभाल अत्यधिक महत्त्वपूर्ण है क्योंकि लाखों 
महिलाओं तथा नवजात शिशुओं में प्रसवपूर्व, प्रसवकाल या प्रसव के तुरंत बाद ऐसे जटिल या गंभीर 
विकार विकसित हो जाते हैं, जिनका अनुमान लगाना भी कठिन है। 


साक्ष्यों से पता चलता है कि अंतर्राष्ट्रीय मानकों पर प्रशिक्षित प्रसाविकाओं द्वारा प्रदान की जाने वाली 
गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल, मातृ एवं शिशु मृत्यु दर तथा मृतजन्म दर को 83: तक कम करती है। 
और 56 od मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु स्वास्थ्य नतीजों से यह भी स्पष्ट है कि 87: प्रसव केवल 
अंतर्राष्ट्रीय मानकों पर प्रशिक्षित प्रसाविकाओं द्वारा कराये जा सकते हैं। विश्व स्तर पर इस बात के प्रमाण 
भी मिलते रहे हैं कि प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई वाली देखभाल इकाईयां (एमएलसीयू) महिला-केंद्रित 
देखभाल तथा नैसर्गिक प्रसूति प्रणाली को बढ़ावा देकर और देखभाल की गुणवत्ता तथा निरंतरता को 
बढ़ावा देकर मातृ एवं शिशु मत्यु दर तथा रुग्णता में कमी ला सकती हैं। जहां कहीं भी प्रसाविकाओं की 
अगुवाई वाली निरंतर देखभाल (एमएलसीसी) का मॉडल पेश किया गया है, इससे अपरिपक्व जन्म में 
24% की कमी आई है। उत्तरजीविता के अलावा, प्रसाविकाओं की गुणवत्तापरक देखभाल स्तनपान दर 
और मनोसामाजिक परिणामों में भी सुधार लाती है, तथा विशेष रूप से शल्य जनन के मामलों में 
अनावश्यक मध्यवर्तनों के उपयोग को कम करती है और परिवार नियोजन को बढ़ावा देती है (लेंसेट 
सीरीज, 2044; यूएनएफपीए, 204 और डब्ल्यूएचओ, 2047) | 


अंतर्राष्ट्रीय प्रसाविका परिसंघ ने प्रसूति विद्या की धारणा और आदर्श देखभाल की रूपरेखा तैयार की 
el? प्रसूति विद्या में विज्ञान एवं समाजशास्त्र जैसे अन्य स्वास्थ्य व्यवसायों द्वारा प्रयुक्त किए जाने वाले 
विषयों से प्राप्त जानकारी, कौशल और पेशेवर दृष्टिकोण समाहित हैं, लेकिन प्रसाविकाओं द्वारा स्वायत्तता, 
साझेदारी, नैतिकता और जवाबदेही के व्यावसायिक ढांचे के अंतर्गत अभ्यास किया जाता है। प्रसूति विद्या 
महिलाओं एवं उनके नवजात शिशुओं की देखभाल करने का एक ऐसा दृष्टिकोण है, जिससे प्रसाविकाएं 
शिशु जन्म की सामान्य जैविक, मनोवैज्ञानिक, सामाजिक तथा सांस्कृतिक प्रक्रियाओं और नवजात शिशु के 
शुरुआती जीवन में सुधार लाते हैं; प्रत्येक महिला की व्यक्तिगत परिस्थिति और विचारों का सम्मान करते 
हुए उनके साथ मिलकर काम करते हैं; अपनी व अपने परिवार की देखभाल के लिए महिलाओं की 
व्यक्तिगत क्षमताओं को बढ़ावा देते हैं; और प्रत्यक महिला की व्यक्तिगत आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने 
वाली समग्र देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए जरूरत पड़ने पर प्रसाविकाओं तथा अन्य स्वास्थ्य कार्यकर्ताओं 
के साथ सहयोग करते हैं। प्रसूतिकालीन देखभाल एक स्वायत्त प्रसाविका द्वारा प्रदान की जाती है। 


4.2 भारत की 'प्रसाविकीय सेवा पहल' (मिडवाइफरी सर्विसेज इनिशिएटिव ऑफ इंडिया) 


भारत में हर वर्ष 3 करोड़ गर्भवती महिलाओं को गुणवत्तापरक देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित 
मानव संसाधन की आवश्यकता को ध्यान में रखते हुए तथा इससे पहले आने वाली चुनौतियों को 
पहचानते हुए, भारत सरकार ने नर्स प्रेक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी द्वारा एमएलसीयू के माध्यम से प्रजनन, 
मातृत्व एवं नवजात शिशु स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं को सुदृढ़ बनाने हेतु सेवा प्रावधान का एक वैकल्पिक मॉडल 
प्रस्तावित किया है। एमएलसीयू के माध्यम से प्रसाविकाओं द्वारा प्रदान की जाने वाली गुणवत्तापरक मातृत्व 
देखभाल इस बदलाव के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। "देखभाल की गुणवत्ता न केवल जीवन बचाएगी, बल्कि शिशु 
जन्म का एक सकारात्मक अनुभव भी प्रदान करेगी” मान्यता का तात्पर्य है आवश्यक बदलाव परिवर्तनकारी 
होने चाहिए। इसके लिए सेवाओं को वितरित करने के तरीके और महिलाओं को प्रदान की जाने वाली 
देखभाल की प्रकृति में मूलभूत परिवर्तन करने की आवश्यकता होगी। “भारत में प्रसाविकीय सेवाओं के 
दिशानिर्देशों' द्वारा निर्धारित परिवर्तनकारी बदलाव प्रसूति विद्या शिक्षा के मूल में समाहित होने चाहिए। 

'प्रसाविकीय सेवा पहल' का उद्देश्य आईसीएम दक्षताओं के अनुरूप कशल “नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन 
मिडवाइफरी” (एनपीएम) नामक प्रसाविकाओं का एक नया संवर्ग तैयार करना है, जो महिला केंद्रित 
सहानुभूतिशील प्रजनन, मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु स्वास्थ्य सेवा (आरएमएनसीएच) प्रदान करने में सुविज्ञ और 
सक्षम हों, और मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु स्वास्थ्य हेतु एसडीजी प्राप्त करने के लिए सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य 


7https://www.internationalmidwives.org/assets/files/definitions-files/208/06/eng-philosophy-and-model-of-midwifery-care.pdf s://www.internationalmidwives.org/assets/files/definitions-files/208/06/eng-philosophy-and-model-of-midwifery-care.pdf 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5 


प्रणाली में इस संवर्ग के एकीकरण के लिए एक समर्थक वातावरण विकसित करना है (एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू, 
2048) | 


4.3 भारत के भविष्य के लिए ad प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) और एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक तैयार 
करना 


महिलाओं एवं नवजात शिशुओं को संपूर्ण आवश्यक देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए आईसीएम दक्षताओं 
वाले सुविज्ञ व कुशल और अंततराष्ट्रीय-मानक वाले प्रसाविकाओं को तैयार करने के लिए गुणवत्तापरक 
शिक्षा आवश्यक है। साक्ष्य इंगित करते हैं कि प्रसूति विद्या में आवश्यक कौशल और दक्षता प्राप्त करने के 
लिए अपेक्षित प्रशिक्षण की इष्टतम अवधि ig माह है। परिषद्‌ के मौजूदा एक वर्षीय ‘ad प्रैक्टिशनर इन 
मिडवाइफरी पोस्ट बेसिक डिप्लोमा प्रोग्राम को फिर से अभिकल्पित कर संस्थागत एवं सामुदायिक स्तर 
पर शिष्ट, उच्चतम स्तर की गुणवत्ता तथा साक्ष्य आधारित देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए और विशेषतौर 
पर सुरक्षित एवं सक्षम प्रसवकालीन देखभाल प्रदान करने वाले अधिक एनपीएम तैयार करने के लिए 
48-माह के गहन आवासीय कार्यक्रम में उन्‍नयन किया गया है। गुणवत्तापरक मातृत्व एवं नवजात शिशु 
देखभाल (क्यूएमएनसी) तंत्र पर आधारित गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय सेवा क लिए आवश्यक घटकों को भी 
पाठ्यक्रम में समेकित किया गया है। 


नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) महिलाओं के सम्पूर्ण जीवनकाल में उनके स्वास्थ्यवर्धन के 
लिए उत्तरदायी होंगे, जिसमें महिलाओं के प्रजनन काल के दौरान तथा उनके नवजात शिशुओं पर विशेष 
ध्यान fear जाएगा। वह गर्भाधानपूर्व, गर्भावस्‍था, प्रसव, और सूतिकावस्था के दौरान और साथ ही नवजात 
शिशु को देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए उत्तरदायी होंगे। वह अपनी कार्य प्रणाली के लिए उत्तरदायी और 
जवाबदेह होंगे। एनपीएम कुशल प्रसव सहायक, सहायक नर्स प्रसाविका (एएनएम), नर्स, डॉक्टर और 
विशेषज्ञों वाले अस्पताल तथा मौजूदा परिधीय स्वास्थ्य सुविधा में स्वतंत्र रूप से अथवा डॉक्टरों के साथ 
मिलकर उनके सहयोगी के रूप में कार्य करेंगे। इन एमएलसीयू में तैनात प्रसाविकाओं से कम जोखिम 
वाले और सामान्य प्रसव को संभालना अपेक्षित होगा और जटिलताओं वाली महिलाओं को आगे के 
सहयोगात्मक प्रबंधन के लिए डॉक्टरों के पास सुरक्षित रूप से निर्देशित करने से पहले उनका प्रारंभिक 
प्रबंधन और स्थिरीकरण सुनिश्चित करना भी अपेक्षित होगा। 

भारतीय प्रसाविकाओं की गुणवत्ता और भारत में आरएमएनसीएच सेवाओं के परिवर्तन में उनके 
योगदान की आकांक्षाएं और योजनाएं, एक प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण कार्यक्रम की मांग करती हैं जो देखभाल 
की संस्कृति को बदलते हुए, सतत अध्ययन और प्रसाविकाओं के नेतृत्व वाली देखभाल के एक नए संगठन 
के भीतर काम करते हुए, गर्भवती महिला, उसके नवजात शिशु और परिवार की भावनात्मक, सामाजिक, 
भौगोलिक, शारीरिक, चिकित्सीय और व्यक्तिगत आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने के लिए स्वायत्त रूप से 
अभ्यास करने की क्षमता को संयोजित करेगा। ऐसी शिक्षा केवल मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों द्वारा प्रदान की जा 
सकती है जो अंतर्राष्ट्रीय मानकों पर आधारित पाठ्यक्रम में संलग्न हैं और प्रसाविकीय कार्य के लिए 
बुनियादी संबंध निर्माण, आलोचनात्मक सोच, प्रतिबिंबता, रचनात्मकता का समर्थन करते हैं और निर्णय, 
समस्या समाधान, निदान, संचार और नैदानिक कौशल पर लागू प्रसूति विद्या व स्वास्थ्य विज्ञान के 
सिद्धांतों की अच्छी समझ रखते हैं। 

इसलिए, डब्ल्यूएचओ / आईसीएम दक्षताओं और परिषद्‌ के विनियमों के अनुसार नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स इन 
मिडवाइफरी को प्रशिक्षित करने की क्षमता वाले नर्स प्रेक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) प्रशिक्षकों के 
एक समूह को प्रशिक्षित करना आवश्यक है। एनपीएम द्वारा प्रदान की जाने वाली प्रसाविकीय सेवाओं में 
परिवर्तन लाने के लिए यह आवश्यक है कि मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक, प्रशिक्षक के रूप में अपनी भूमिका 
निभाने से पहले इन दक्षताओं में अच्छी तरह निपुण हों। इस परिवर्तनकारी बदलाव और मातृत्व देखभाल 
के प्रतिमान बदलाव की आवश्यकता बदलाव में अग्रणी और व्यवहार में शिक्षा की स्थिरता सुनिश्चित लाने 
वाले मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों की शिक्षा के केंद्र में होनी चाहिए। 


इस तत्काल आवश्यकता के प्रत्युत्तर में, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक पाठ्यक्रम को आईसीएम दक्षताओं के 
साथ-साथ डब्ल्यूएचओ मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक की मूलभूत दक्षताओं के अनुरूप विकसित किया गया है, जो 
प्रसाविकाओं के मानवीय बदलाव ate eared भूमिका पर बल देता है। पाठ्यक्रम को चार पाठ्यक्रम 
मॉड्यूल में विकसित किया गया है, मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं को संबंधपरक एवं परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय 


6 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SECc.4] 


देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना, मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं को गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म और सूतिकावस्था के दौरान 
देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना, मॉड्यूल Ll: प्रसाविकाओं को गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल करने, 
प्रबंधन करने और पर्यवेक्षण करने के लिए तैयार करना, मॉड्यूल IV: प्रसाविकाओं को साक्ष्य-आधारित 
मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास करने के लिए तैयार करना। इसका उद्देश्य मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास को रेखांकित करने 
वाले मूल मूल्यों की भूमिका निभाने के साथ-साथ मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों के तकनीकी ज्ञान, नैदानिक 
कौशल और सुविधा कौशल को सुदढ़ करना है। मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम सक्षम एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक 
तैयार करता है, जो एनपीएम को महिला, नवजात शिशु और परिवार को गुणत्त्तापूर्ण, शिष्ट, 
महिला-केंद्रित, सम्मानजनक देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए प्रभावी ढंग से शिक्षित और प्रशिक्षित कर 
सकते हैं। कार्यक्रम एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को नेतृत्व, पर्यवेक्षण और प्रबंधन कौशल से भी परिपूर्ण करेगा और 
उन्हें मिडवाइफरी कार्य से संबंधित शोध के अंतिम साक्ष्य को समझने और उपयोग करने में सक्षम 
बनाएगा | 


2. दर्शन एवं परिकल्पना 
24 दर्शन 


परिषद्‌ का मानना है कि पंजीकृत val को नसों की उभरती विस्तारित और विशेषज्ञ भूमिकाओं तथा 
प्रौद्योगिकी में प्रगति के वर्तमान संदर्भ में नैदानिक व सामुदायिक समायोजनों में नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स इन 
मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) के रूप में कार्य करने के लिए अतिरिक्त शिक्षित और प्रशिक्षित करने की 
आवश्यकता है। मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा को सुदृढ़ करना गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय कार्य के लिए अत्यंत 
महत्वपूर्ण है और एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को एनपीएम द्वारा प्रदान की जाने वाली प्रसाविकीय सेवाओं में 
मानवीकरण और स्वायत्त भूमिका के संदर्भ में परिवर्तन लाने के लिए शिक्षकों के रूप में अपनी भूमिका 
निभाने से पहले अंतर्राष्ट्रीय मानकों के अनुसार प्रशिक्षित करना आवश्यक है। 


परिषद्‌ का मानना है कि योग्यता-आधारित प्रशिक्षण नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) 
प्रशिक्षकों को मिडवाइफरी कार्य करने का अभ्यास करने के लिए 'महिला-केंद्रित और शिष्ट देखभाल' की 
अवधारणा पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हुए, ठोस साक्ष्य-आधारित जानकारी के आधार पर ज्ञान, कौशल और 
व्यवहार का प्रदर्शन करने में सक्षम बनाएगा। एक शिष्ट वातावरण प्राप्त करने के लिए और संबंधपरक 
देखभाल के बारे में छात्रों के ज्ञान और अभ्यास को विकसित करने के लिए, जो प्रसाविकीय कार्य के 
अभ्यास का केंद्र है, छात्र-शिक्षक संबंध, संचार और अधिकार संबंधों पर ध्यान देने पर भी बल दिया गया 
है (sca, 2009) और अगली पीढ़ी के अभ्यासकर्ताओं को विकसित करने के लिए शैक्षिक अनुभवों को 
आकार देने में शिक्षक की भूमिका और उत्तरदायित्व पर बल दिया गया है (बिएस्टा, 2045)। प्रशिक्षित 
प्रशिक्षक स्वतंत्र रूप से और साथ ही अंतःपेशेवर दल के साथ सहयोगात्मक रूप से कार्य करने के लिए 
अपने ज्ञान, दृष्टिकोण तथा कौशल को पारस्परिक और सांस्कृतिक दक्षताओं के साथ संयोजित करने में 
सक्षम होंगे। 

एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों के लिए पाठ्यक्रम, जो भविष्य में प्रसाविकीय कार्य को विकसित करने और निरंतर 
नेतृत्व प्रदान करने में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाएंगे, को इस अत्यधिक आवश्यक आमूलचूल और जटिल 
परिवर्तनकारी बदलाव के प्रति उत्तरदायी होने, शिक्षित, कुशल और शिष्ट प्रसाविकाओं के इस नए संवर्ग 
जो भारत के भविष्य के लिए प्रसाविकाओं के नेतृत्व वाली देखभाल प्रदान करने में eared भूमिका के 
लिए तैयार हों, को शिक्षित करने और इसके लिए उपयुक्त बनाने की क्षमता विकसित करने की 
आवश्यकता होगी। 


इसलिए, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक पाठ्यक्रम दर्शन महत्वपूर्ण प्रतिबिबन पर केंद्रित परिवर्तनकारी अध्ययन, 
समस्या- प्रस्तुति और संवाद के साथ-साथ प्रतिबिंब / क्रियाशीलता / तर्क अभ्यास पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने 
वाले विचार पर आधारित है। शिक्षण-अधिगम दृष्टिकोण वयस्क अध्ययन सिद्धांतों, योग्यता-आधारित 
शिक्षा, सहयोगात्मक अध्ययन, अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता, महारती अध्ययन और स्व-निर्देशित अध्ययन को 
एकीकृत करेगा। आवश्यकतानुसार सहयोगात्मक और अंतःविषयक अध्ययन के लिए प्रशिक्षण और अध्ययन 
का नेतृत्व प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग, बाल चिकित्सा और सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य चिकित्सा संकाय द्वारा समर्थित 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों द्वारा किया जाएगा। 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 7 


परिषद्‌ का मानना है कि नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी को प्रशिक्षण देने में संलग्न एनपीएम 
प्रशिक्षकों को सभी प्रसाविकीय कौशलों (ज्ञान, दृष्टिकोण और अभ्यास) में सक्षम होना चाहिए, नैदानिक 
क्षेत्र में उदाहरण पेश करने और एनपीएम प्रशिक्षण के प्रबंधन और देश भर में कार्यान्वयन का समर्थन 
करने के लिए योग्य होना चाहिए । 


परिषद्‌ का यह भी मानना है कि सर्वोत्तम नैदानिक अध्ययन अनुभव प्रदान करने के लिए नैदानिक 
समायोजनों में विभिन्‍न प्रकार की नवीन शैक्षिक रणनीतियों का उपयोग किया जा सकता है। आशा की 
जाती है कि प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई वाली देखभाल इकाइयों में कार्य करने के लिए इन एनपीएम की 
उचित नियुक्ति के लिए संवर्ग पदों के निर्माण की दिशा में विकासशील नीतियों को सुविधाजनक बनाया 
जाएगा | 
2.2 परिकल्पना 

कार्यक्रम का उद्देश्य ऐसे मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक तैयार करना है जो भारत के लिए मिडवाइफरी और 
मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा के दृष्टिकोण के साथ छात्रों को परिवर्तनकारी शिक्षा में संलग्न करने में सक्षम हों, जो 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों के लिए डब्ल्यूएचओ दक्षताओं को पूरा करते हों, और शिक्षा एवं शोध के माध्यम से 
मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास और छात्रवृत्ति के विकास का संचालन करते हों। 
3. लक्ष्य एवं उद्देश्य 
3.4 लक्ष्य 

इस शैक्षिक कार्यक्रम का उद्देश्य नर्स face इन मिडवाइफरी के लिए शिक्षकों और प्रशिक्षकों की 
क्षमता में कार्य करने के लिए सक्षम एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक तैयार करना; देखभाल के सभी तीनों स्तरों पर 
महिला, नवजात शिशु और परिवार को गुणतत्तापूर्ण एवं शिष्ट देखभाल प्रदान करना, महिला और नवजात 
शिशु की देखभाल प्रबंधन व पर्यवेक्षण करना; नवीनतम शैक्षिक प्रौद्योगिकी का उपयोग करके महिला और 
नवजात शिशु देखभाल से संबंधित क्षेत्रों में एनपीएम का प्रशिक्षण और उन्हें महिला एवं नवजात शिशु 
देखभाल के शोध क्षेत्रों में संचालन या भाग लेने के लिए तैयार करना है। 


3.2 उद्देश्य 
कार्यक्रम एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को निम्नलिखित कार्य संपादित करने के लिए तैयार करता है - 

4. परिवर्तनकारी शिक्षा विकसित करना और नेतृत्व प्रदान करना। 

2. डब्ल्यूएचओ मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर कंपीटेसीज (2043) का निष्पादन प्रदर्शित करना। 

3. आईसीएम एसेंशियल कंपीटेंसीज फॉर मिडवाइफरी प्रैक्टिस का निष्पादन प्रदर्शित करना और परिषद्‌ 
के विनियमों और एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास करना। 


4. कुशल, महिला-केंद्रित, शिष्ट, सम्मानजनक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल की भूमिका निर्वहन करना जो 
महिला, उसके नवजात शिशु और परिवार तथा उन समुदायों की आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करते हैं 
जिनमें वे रहते हैं। 

5. एनपीएम को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता पद्धतियों का उपयोग करने की क्षमता 
प्रदर्शित करना जो ऐसे एनपीएम तैयार करते हैं जो भारत में निर्दिष्ट प्रसाविकाओं के नेतृत्व वाली 
सेवाओं में अभ्यास के दायरे में स्वायत्त रूप से अभ्यास करेंगे। 

6. प्रसाविकीय कार्य में मानवीकरण, व्यावसायिक विकास, आजीवन अध्ययन और नेतृत्व के प्रति प्रतिबद्धता 
दिखाना | 


4. पाठ्यक्रम का वैचारिक नमूना 


वैचारिक कु ना (महिला /नवजात शिशु, शिक्षक / छात्र) रिश्तों को मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक पाठ्यक्रम के 
केंद्र में रखता 4 क्योंकि कार्यक्रम उन प्रशिक्षकों को तैयार करना चाहता है जो भारत में सकारात्मक 
प्रसव अनुभव की आकांक्षाओं को आगे बढ़ाएंगे। पाठ्यक्रम छात्र को अध्ययन के केंद्र में रखकर 
महिला-क द्वित देखभाल को सुदृढ़ बनाएगा। एक परिवर्तनकारी, योग्यता-आधारित अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता 
दृष्टिकोण प्रसाविकाओं को प्रशिक्षक बनने के लिए तैयार करेगा जो भारत में महिलाओं को आवश्यकताओं 


6 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


को पूरा करने के लिए गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल को बढ़ावा देंगे। गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय 
देखभाल और परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय शिक्षा आईसीएम एसेंशियल मिडवाइफरी कंपीटेंसीज (आईसीएम, 
2049) और डब्ल्यूएचओ मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर कंपीटेंसीज (डब्ल्यूएचओ, 2043) पर आधारित है। 


इस कार्यक्रम की विषय-वस्तु, मूल्य और दर्शन वर्तमान शैक्षणिक सर्वोत्तम अभ्यास के साथ सुविज्ञ हैं। 
अध्ययन और प्रशिक्षण में प्रगति से पता चलता है कि जब छात्र पेशेवर और व्यक्तिगत आत्म-प्रतिबिंबन के 
साथ अनुभवात्मक / सैद्धांतिक अध्ययन के आधार पर गहन अनुभव में डूब जाते हैं तो छात्र अध्ययन में 
वृद्धि होती है। यह आवश्यक है कि एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक शिष्ट मातृत्व देखभाल दृष्टिकोण सिखाने के लिए, 
अध्ययन कक्ष और नैदानिक अभ्यास समायोजनों में छात्रों को प्रशिक्षित और उनके साथ संचार करते समय 
bib en की भूमिका सहित free शिक्षा प्राप्त करें और प्रदान करें। मॉडल को नीचे चित्र 4 में 
दर्शाया गया है: 


चित्र 4. पाठ्यक्रम का वैचारिक नमूना 


नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स इन मिडवाइफरी पाठ्यक्रम इसमें शामिल बुनियादी मान्यताओं, समेकित अवधारणाओं 
और मातृत्व देखभाल प्राथमिकताओं के अनुरूप मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों को तैयार करने पर केंद्रित है ताकि 
प्रशिक्षक सशक्त हों और आगामी प्रसाविकाओं को परिवर्तनकारी शिक्षा प्रदान करने में सक्षम at | एनपीएम 
प्रशिक्षक और एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम में शामिल बुनियादी मान्यताएं, समेकित अवधारणाएं और मातृत्व देखभाल 
प्राथमिकताएं नीचे दी गई हैं: 
4.4 बुनियादी मान्यताएं 


सरकारी, डब्ल्यूएचओ और आईसीएम के मूल अभिलेखों से ली wesc बुनियादी मान्यताएं, सभी 
महिलाओं को सकारात्मक प्रसव अनुभव कराने के लिए प्रतिबद्ध प्रसाविका विकसित करने के लिए एक 
आधार प्रदान करती हैं। इन मान्यताओं में (i) करुणा, (ii) सम्मान, (ii) महिला, शिशु तथा परिवार पर 
केंद्रस्थता, (iv) निष्पक्षता तथा अधिकार, (०) सहयोग तथा दलीय कार्य, (vi) नैतिक अभ्यास 
(vii) नैतिक साहस शामिल हैं । 
4.2 समेकित अवधारणाएं 


पाठ्यक्रम में महत्वपूर्ण दृष्टिकोणों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाली सात अवधारणाएं सम्मिलित हैं, जो 
समकालीन प्रसाविकीय अभ्यास को प्रेरित करती हैं। इन अवधारणाओं में 6) सामाजिक असमानताएं तथा 
प्राथमिक स्वास्थ्य चिकित्सक के रूप में प्रसाविका, (॥) साक्ष्य-आधारित प्रसाविकीय अभ्यास, (iii) 
सांस्कृतिक क्षमता, (iv) उत्तम मातृत्व तथा नवजात शिशु देखभाल, (५) निरंतर प्रसाविकीय देखभाल, 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 9 


(vi) महिला, शिशु, परिवार तथा प्रसाविका के मध्य संबंध के रूप में प्रसाविकीय अभ्यास, (vii) दैहिक 
प्रसव के इष्टतम आशावादी होना, (viii) सामुदायिक जानकारी शामिल हैं। 


4.3 मातृत्व देखभाल प्राथमिकताएं 


कार्यक्रम में निर्धारित मातृत्व देखभाल की आवश्यकताओं और प्राथमिकताओं पर अत्यधिक ध्यान दिया 
गया है, जिन्हें पाठ्यक्रम के विभिन्‍न पहलुओं में संबोधित किया गया है, यथा, (i) ऐसी असुरक्षित 
महिलाओं की मातृत्व एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल में सुधार, जिन तक पहुंचना भी दुर्लभ हो, (ii) मातृत्व 
एवं नवजात शिशु मृत्यु दर और रुग्णता को कम करना, (iii) आपातकालीन देखभाल का प्रभावी प्रबंधन, 
(iv) मानव अधिकार तथा यौन-आधारित हिंसा, (५) प्रसाविका की अगुवाई वाली देखभाल को सुदृढ़ 
बनाना, (vi) प्रसव को मानवीय बनाना और चिकित्सा-मुकत करना | 


5. एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक के गुण 


इस कार्यक्रम से स्नातक होने वाले एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक प्रसाविकीय कार्य के प्रशिक्षक, अग्रणी और 
व्यवसायी होंगे, जिन्हें मिडवाइफरी, प्राथमिक स्वास्थ्य देखभाल में इसकी भूमिका, भारत में मिडवाइफरी 
कैसे विकसित हो सकती है /हानी चाहिए, महिला और उसके परिवार पर प्रसाविका का प्रभाव, और शिक्षा 
इसे कंसे सक्षम बनाएगी, की गहन समझ होगी। महिला-केंद्रित देखभाल, छात्र-केंद्रित शिक्षण, समानता 
एवं न्याय, मानव व प्रजनन अधिकार, और दूसरों के लिए करुणा, के मूल्य अभ्यास के लिए मूल होंगे। 
भारत के भविष्य के लिए मिडवाइफ प्रशिक्षकों के पास दूरदर्शिता, नेतृत्वता के गुण, सवाल करने का 
साहस और विशेष रूप से चिकित्सक के नेतृत्व वाली प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के मौजूदा प्रतिमान को 
प्रसाविका के नेतृत्व वाली देखभाल के एक नए प्रतिमान में बदलने के लिए परिवर्तन प्राप्त करने के लिए 
सहयोगात्मक कामकाजी संबंध बनाने की क्षमता होगी। 


6. अभ्यास का दायरा 


शैक्षिक कार्यक्रम के पूरा होने पर, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक का परिषद्‌ द्वारा अनुमोदित परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा 
प्रमाणन किया जाएगा और एसएनआरसी में अतिरिक्त योग्यता के रूप में पंजीकरण किया जाएगा। 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) कार्यक्रम के कार्यान्वयन को सुनिश्चित करेंगे 
और राजकीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थानों में पाठ्यक्रम के लिए नामांकन करने वालों को शिक्षा और 
प्रशिक्षण प्रदान करेंगे | एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक अस्पतालों और स्वास्थ्य केंद्रों सहित सभी समायोजनों में विशेष 
रूप से प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई वाली देखभाल इकाइयों (एमएलसीयू) में मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास करेंगे, 
प्रशिक्षण के दौरान प्राप्त ज्ञान और नैदानिक दक्षताओं का उपयोग करेंगे, साथ ही नैदानिक मिडवाइफरी 
दक्षताओं को सुदृढ़ बनाने में परामर्श समर्थन भी देंगे। एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक शिक्षा और प्रशिक्षण और परिषद्‌ 
के विनियमों और एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार अभ्यास का दायरा (परिशिष्ट-शा!) पूरा 
करने में सक्षम होंगे। 

एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक और प्रसाविका का कार्य करने वाले व्यवसायी की विशिष्ट भूमिकाएं परिशिष्ट-- में 
सूचीबद्ध हैं। 
7. दक्षताए 

परिषद्‌ एनपीएम कार्यक्रम से संबंधित दक्षताओं में मामूली संशोधनों के साथ भारत के लिए 
मिडवाइफरी शिक्षकों को शिक्षित और प्रशिक्षित करने में डब्ल्यूएचओ कोर कंपीटेंसीज फॉर मिडवाइफरी 
एडूकेटर्स (डब्ल्यूएचओ, 2043) की मुख्य दक्षताओं को अनुकूलित करती है जिसकी रूपरेखा नीचे दी गई 
है। यह URI में दी गई मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए आईसीएम आवश्यक दक्षताए — आईसीएम 
एसेंशियल कंपीटेंसीज फॉर मिडवाइफरी प्रैक्टिस (2049) को भी अनुकूलित करती है। 


0 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IHI—SEC.4] 


चित्र 2. एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक दक्षताएं 


सभी प्रक्षेत्रों के लिए कुल 28 दक्षताओं के साथ दक्षताओं को 8 दक्षता प्रक्षेत्रों के तहत व्यवस्थित 
किया गया है। 


दक्षता प्रक्षेत्र । मिडवाइफरी के नैतिक व कानूनी सिद्धांत 


मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक सतत भूमिका निर्वहन द्वारा शिक्षण /अध्ययन गतिविधियों में प्रसाविकीय देखभाल 
के नैतिक व कानूनी पहलुओं को शामिल करते हैं और बढ़ावा देते हैं। 


दक्षताए: 


44 परिषद्‌ के मानकों के अनुसार मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में नैतिक, परोपकारी और मानवतावादी सिद्धांतों 
के अनुरूप प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने में व्यावसायिक दायित्व का प्रदर्शन Her 


4.2 भारत के कानूनी ढांचे के तहत मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में कानूनी तथा नियामक सिद्धांतों की समझ 
प्रदर्शित करना | 


4.3 महिला के यौन तथा प्रजनन स्वास्थ्य अधिकारों को देखभाल प्रक्रिया का मुख्य बिंदु मानते हुए शिष्ट 
मातृत्व देखभाल पर केंद्रित प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के दर्शन की समझ प्रदर्शित करना। 


दक्षता waa 2: मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास 


मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक उपलब्ध सर्वोत्तम साक्ष्य के आधार पर मिडवाइफरी सिद्धांत और अभ्यास में 
वर्तमान ज्ञान और कौशल बनाए रखते हैं। 


दक्षताए: 


2.4 परिषद्‌ द्वारा मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए अपनाई गई आईसीएम दक्षताओं के अनुसार ज्ञान, 
दृष्टिकोण और कौशल का प्रदर्शन करना। 


2.2 सामान्य प्रसव तथा गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान देखभाल प्रदान करना। 


[भाग पा---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण l] 
23 महिलाओं तथा उनके नवजात शिशुओं को सुरक्षित, सक्षम और प्रभावी प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान 
करने में कौशल प्रदर्शित करना | 
2.4 साक्ष्य-आधारित और अद्यतन ज्ञान को दर्शाने वाला मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास करना। 
2.5 देखभाल के सभी स्तरों पर माता, परिवार और समाज के प्रति सम्मान और सहानुभूति प्रदर्शित करना। 
दक्षता प्रक्षेत्र 3: सैद्धांतिक अध्ययन 
मिडवाइफरी शिक्षक एक ऐसा वातावरण बनाते हैं जो अध्ययन सुविधा प्रदान करता है। 
दक्षताए: 


3.4 छात्रों की छिद्रान्वेशी सोच, विवेचनात्मक तर्क कौशल और नूतन सोच विकसित करने के लिए सक्रिय 
अध्ययन की वृद्धि के लिए शैक्षिक प्रौद्योगिकी का समावेशन करना। 


3.2 प्रभावी एवं उचित शिक्षण और अध्ययन संसाधनों का चयन व उपयोग करना | 


3.3 एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम के छात्रों के लिए सिमुलेशन का उपयोग करके दक्षता-आधारित कौशल प्रशिक्षण 
प्रदान करने में कौशल प्रदर्शित करना। 


3.4 एनपीएम छात्रों की अध्ययन शैलियों और अद्वितीय अध्ययन आवश्यकताओं को पहचानना और उनका 
समर्थन करना | 


दक्षता प्रक्षेत्र 4: नैदानिक क्षेत्र में अध्ययन 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के प्रभावी नैदानिक शिक्षण के लिए वातावरण बनाए रखते 
हैं। 
दक्षताए: 
44 एक सुरक्षित और प्रभावी नैदानिक अध्ययन की सुविधा मुहया करना। 
4.2 वैयक्तिक अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता को बढ़ावा देना। 
43 नेदानिक मूल्यांकन और प्रशिक्षण में कौशल प्रदर्शित करना । 
दक्षता प्रक्षेत्र 5: छात्रों तथा कार्यक्रम का आंकलन एवं मूल्यांकन 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक नियमित रूप से छात्रों तथा कार्यक्रम की निगरानी एवं मूल्यांकन करते हैं। 
दक्षताए: 
54 विभिन्‍न आकलन रणनीतियों तथा उपकरणों का उपयोग करके छात्र की क्षमता का आंकलन करना 
और सटीक अभिलेख बनाए रखना | 
5.2 एनपीएम कार्यक्रम की प्रभावशीलता की निगरानी, आंकलन और परिगणना करना | 
दक्षता प्रक्षेत्र 6 संगठन, प्रबंधन तथा पर्यवेक्षण 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम को प्रभावी ढंग से व्यवस्थित और कार्यान्वित करते हें। 
दक्षताए: 
6.4 एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम की योजना और आयोजन में सक्रिय भाग लेना। 


6.2 एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम को प्रभावी ढंग से लागू करना और गुणवत्ता सुधार के लिए प्रतिपुष्टि प्रदान 
करना | 


6.3 पदस्थापन के बाद एनपीएम को सुविधा-आधारित परामर्श प्रदान करना | 


दक्षता प्रक्षेत्र 7: संचार, नेतृत्व तथा प्रतिपालन 


]2 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक प्रभावी ढंग से संचार स्थापित करते हैं और प्रतिपालक, परिवर्तन प्रतिनिधि तथा 
अधिनायक के रूप में कार्य करते हैं। 


दक्षताए: 


7.4 विविध देखभाल वितरण समायोजनों में विभिन्‍न तरीकों का उपयोग करके प्रभावी संचार प्रदर्शित 
करना | 


7.2 पाठ्यक्रम रूपरेखा तथा विकास और शिक्षण व मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में सांस्कृतिक क्षमता प्रदर्शित 
करना | 


7.3 मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा और अभ्यास में सुधार के लिए अग्रणी और परिवर्तन एजेंटों के रूप में कार्य 
करना | 


7.4 मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा और अभ्यास को बढ़ावा देने के लिए विभिन्‍न प्रकार की प्रतिपालन रणनीतियों का 
उपयोग करना। 


7.5 मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा से संबंधित व्यावसायिक विकास गतिविधियों में भाग लेना। 
दक्षता प्रक्षेत्र 88 शोध 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक शोध प्रयोग को बढ़ावा देते हैं और इसका उपयोग मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा और 
अभ्यास को सूचित करने के लिए करते हैं। 
दक्षताए: 
8.4 शोध का उपयोग करना और शिक्षण एवं अभ्यास को सूचित करना। 


8.2 आलोचनात्मक पूछताछ और साक्ष्य-आधारित अभ्यास का समर्थन करने वाली संस्कृति विकसित 
करना | 


8.3 एनपीएम को शोध संचालित करने, संचार करने और उपयोग करने के कौशल विकसित करने के लिए 
प्रशिक्षित करना | 


8. कार्यक्रम का निरूपण 
8. कार्यक्रम का विवरण 


एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक प्रशिक्षण छः माह का आवासीय कार्यक्रम है, जिसमें परिवर्तनकारी और संबंधपरक 
शिक्षण और अध्ययन पर केंद्रित महारत और अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता द्वारा सक्षम योग्यता-आधारित प्रशिक्षण 
पर मुख्य ध्यान दिया जाता है। पाठ्यक्रम में चार पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल शामिल हैं, मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं 
को संबंधपरक एवं परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना, मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं को 
गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म और सूतिकावस्था के दौरान देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना, मॉड्यूल Ill: प्रसाविकाओं 
को गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल कार्य करने, प्रबंधन करने और पर्यवेक्षण करने के लिए तैयार करना, 
मॉड्यूल IV: प्रसाविकाओं को साक्ष्य-आधारित मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए तैयार करना। पाठ्यक्रम में 
विभिन्‍न स्वास्थ्य देखभाल समायोजनों में कार्य करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित एनपीएम द्वारा उपयोग के लिए 
अनुमत उपचार प्रोटोकॉल और औषधियों के लिए कौशल प्रशिक्षण और अभिविन्यास शामिल है। 


इसके बाद 42 माह का संरचित परामर्श कार्यक्रम चलाया जाएगा जहां एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक एनपीएम 
छात्रों को पढ़ाएंगे और साथ ही प्रसाविका का कार्य भी करेंगे। एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक लॉगबुक बनाएंगे, अपना 
पोर्टफोलियो रखेंगे और सलाहकार के साथ व्यक्तिगत रूप से या समूह में, आमने-सामने या ऑनलाइन 
बातचीत के दौरान अनुभव को प्रतिबिंबित करेंग। सलाहकार समर्थन के साथ-साथ सहकर्मी समर्थन 
मेंटरशिप कार्यक्रम के आवश्यक घटक हैं। विभिन्‍न शिक्षण विधियों का उपयोग करके नैदानिक और 
अध्ययन कक्ष शिक्षण का संतुलन बनाए रखा जाएगा। 


चूंकि कार्यक्रम भारत में मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा के मानक निर्धारित करता है, इसलिए यह महत्वपूर्ण है कि 
ये छात्र ऐसे कार्यक्रम से जुड़े जो समकालीन अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता का मॉडल तैयार करता हो। इस प्रकार 
पाठ्यक्रम को अनुभवात्मक और परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन दृष्टिकोणों (चोराजी एम. और क्लिनेडिंस्ट के. 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 3 


2049; स्मिथ व अन्य 2048; Hled 4984; डेवी 4938) को शामिल Hed हुए पढ़ाया जाएगा। पाठ्यक्रम में 
डब्ल्यूएचओ मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर कोर कम्पीटेंसीज (2043ए) के 8 दक्षता waa ale इन प्रक्षेत्रों के तहत 
तैयार किए गए 28 दक्षता विवरणों पर आधारित योग्यता-आधारित दृष्टिकोण का भी उपयोग किया 
जाएगा। यह उम्मीद की जाती है कि, पाठ्यक्रम पूरा होने पर इस कार्यक्रम के मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक 48 
माह के एनपीएम प्रशिक्षण के माध्यम से प्रसाविकाओं की नई पीढ़ी को पढ़ाना शुरू करते समय इन्हीं 
दृष्टिकोणों को अपनाएंगे | 


8.2 कार्यक्रम संरचना 


व्यावहारिक (घंटे) 


नल सैद्धांतिक 
पाठ्यक्रम Ase (घंटे) | कौशल प्रयोगशाला | नैदानिक 
(घंटे) 
मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं को संबंधपरक एवं परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय देखभाल 
के लिए तैयार करना 
मॉड्यूल [: प्रसाविकाओं को गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म और सूतिकावस्था के दौरान 
देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना 
मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं को गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल कार्य करने, 20 
प्रबंधन करने और पर्यवेक्षण करने के लिए तैयार करना 
मॉड्यूल IV: प्रसाविकाओं को साक्ष्य-आधारित मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए 20 
तैयार करना 


कुल घंटे 440 घंटे 40 घंटे 840 घंटे 


8.3 नर्स प्रेक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम प्रारम्भ करने के लिए दिशानिर्देश 
8.3. स्टाफ 


4. संकाय प्रशिक्षक (शिक्षक) - एम.एससी. ओबीजी / बाल रोग /सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य नर्सिंग के साथ 
न्यूनतम 2 वर्ष का नैदानिक प्रसाविकीय अनुभव और 5 वर्ष का शिक्षण अनुभव। (प्रारंभिक dal के 
प्रशिक्षण के लिए भारतीय मिडवाइफरी संकाय प्रशिक्षकों के साथ-साथ अंतर्राष्ट्रीय मिडवाइफरी 
शिक्षकों को भी काम पर लगाया जाएगा)। 


2. मेडिकल प्रिसेप्टर्स — स्नातकोत्तर उपाधि के पश्चात 3 वर्ष के अनुभव के साथ प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग, 
बाल रोग अथवा सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य के चिकित्सीय संकाय /सलाहकार | 
3. अतिथि संकाय - एनएचएम / एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू के अधिकारी / अन्य क्षेत्रों के विशेषज्ञ | 
संकाय छात्र अनुपात - 4 : 5 
प्रिसेप्टर छात्र अनुपात - 4 : 5 
सीटों की संख्या -- अधिकतम 30 प्रति बैच 
8.3.2 भौतिक सुविधाएं 
4. अध्ययन कक्ष - 4 
2. आवश्यक उपकरणों और आपूर्तियों के साथ कौशल /सिमुलेशन प्रयोगशाला - 4 (परिशिष्ट-ना) 
3. पुस्तकालय - मिडवाइफरी, मातृ, नवजात शिशु से संबंधित नवीनतम नर्सिंग पाठ्यपुस्तक तथा राष्ट्रीय 
व अंतर्राष्ट्रीय पत्रिका, जोकि भारत सरकार द्वारा जारी दिशानिर्देशों /मॉड्यूल्स के प्रासंगिक हों 
4. शिक्षण सामग्री 
« एलसीडी प्राजेक्टर 
« प्रोजेक्शन के लिए स्क्रीन 


© कप्यूटर 


[4 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


* लैपटॉप 
«» आईटी एप्स के लिए टैबलेट (यथा, सुरक्षित डिलीवरी ऐप, ई-पार्टो ग्राफ और अन्य ऐप) 
© टैब स्क्रीन को बाह्य स्क्रीन पर प्रोजेक्ट करने के लिए कनेकटर्स 
© 4 एमबीपीएस इंटरनेट लीज्ड लाइन 
«» मिडवाइफरी से संबंधित उपकरण जैसे जिम बॉल, फ्लोर मैट, Rata getter आदि 
5. प्रशिक्षकों के लिए कार्यालयी सुविधाएं 
8.3.3 नैदानिक सुविधाएं 
शैय्याओं की न्यूनतम संख्या और अन्य नैदानिक सुविधाएं: 


¢ 00-200 शैय्या वाला मूल अस्पताल जिसमें कम से कम 50 प्रसूति शैय्या या प्रमाणित एमएलसीयू के 
साथ 50 शैय्या वाला प्रसूति अस्पताल 


° भारत सरकार के लक्ष्य दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार प्रसव कक्ष 

« न्यूनतम 6 प्रसव कक्ष /स्थान 

* प्रसूति एवं नवजात शिशु इकाइयां 

e प्रति वर्ष न्यूनतम 6000 प्रसव कराने की क्षमता 

* प्रसूति ओटी और प्रसूति एचडीयू / आईसीयू 

*» अलग कंगारू मातृत्व देखभाल इकाई 

*» 8-70 द्वितीय स्तर की नवजात शिशु शैय्या 

« स्वास्थ्य उपकेंद्र, सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य केंद्र और प्राथमिक स्वास्थ्य केंद्र के साथ संबद्धता 

« तृतीयक देखभाल अस्पताल के साथ निर्देशन संधि 

¢ तृतीयक अस्पताल - मेडिकल कॉलेज अस्पताल के साथ संबद्धता 

« तृतीय स्तर की नवजात शिशु शैय्या के साथ संबद्धता 

8.4 प्रवेश के लिए अहता 

8.4.4 प्रवेश हेतु पात्रता 

इस कार्यक्रम में प्रवेश के लिए इच्छुक अभ्यर्थी के पास निम्नलिखित अहर्ताएं होनी चाहिए: 

«» एक पंजीकृत नर्स और पंजीकृत प्रसाविका (आरएन एंड आरएम) होना चाहिए। 

« प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग, बाल रोग या सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य विशेषज्ञता में एम.एससी. नर्सिंग के साथ 
न्यूनतम 2 वर्ष का नैदानिक प्रसूति कार्य अनुभव। 

«० बी.एससी. नर्सिंग और नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी के साथ 2 वर्ष का नैदानिक अनुभव। 


० सेवारत अभ्यर्थी भी प्रवेश के लिए पात्र होंगे और उन्हें नियमित वेतन मिलता रहेगा। आवासीय 
कार्यक्रम होने के नाते, कार्यक्रम के अन्य छात्रों को संबंधित संगठन में उनके समकक्षों के बराबर 
वेतन /वजीफा दिया जाएगा। 

टिप्पणी 


० प्रारंभिक dal में, किसी भी एम.एससी. /बी.एससी. नर्सिंग अभ्यर्थी के पास कम से कम 5 वर्ष का 
नैदानिक प्रसूति कार्य अनुभव, मिडवाइफरी कार्य करने का मनोभाव, प्रसव कराने का 
नैदानिक / व्यावहारिक व क्रियाशील अनुभव और नैदानिक अभ्यास जारी रखने और प्रसव कराने की 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5 


इच्छा होनी चाहिए। ओबीजी नर्सिंग में प्रशिक्षण अनुभव वाले अभ्यर्थियों को प्राथमिकता दी जाएगी। 
शोध अनुभव होना अतिरिक्त लाभदायक होगा। 


«० मिडवाइफरी कार्य में प्रशिक्षित होने और अभ्यास करने के लिए अभ्यर्थी को उस राज्य में (आरएन एंड 
आरएम) अभ्यास करने के लिए पंजीकरण कराना होगा, जहां वह एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम में 
पंजीकृत है। 


8.4.2 चयन प्रक्रिया 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक की नियुक्ति के लिए चयन मानदंड और प्रक्रिया का अवलोकन नीचे उल्लिखित है : 


प्रवेश परीक्षा दो भागों में आयोजित की जाएगी, प्रत्येक घटक की भारिता प्रतिशत निर्धारित होगी। प्रवेश 
परीक्षा के लिए अधिकतम अंक 400 होंगे (लिखित परीक्षा तथा ओएससीई के लिए 60 तथा साक्षात्कार के 
लिए 40) | 


०» भाग 4: लिखित परीक्षा तथा ओएससीई 


लिखित परीक्षा (40%): बहुविकल्पीय प्रश्न और दो लघु निबंध (अवधि 2 घंटे) में प्रसवपूर्व, 
प्रसवकालीन, प्रसवोत्तर, जटिलता प्रबंधन और नवजात शिशु देखभाल शामिल et) लघु निबंधों में 
तकनीकी दक्षता के साथ-साथ लिखित अंग्रेजी में प्रवीणता का अनुवीक्षण किया जाएगा। लिखित 
अंग्रेजी में प्रवीणता के लिए कुछ afar दी जानी चाहिए। 


ओएससीई — वस्तु:संरचित नैदानिक परीक्षा (20%): लक्ष्य के तहत मौजूदा प्रोटोकॉल पर आधारित 
एक ओएससीई बैंक संदर्भ के लिए संलग्न है। 


e भाग 2: साक्षात्कार (40:) 


लिखित परीक्षा और ओएससीई में उत्तीर्ण होने वाले सफल अभ्यर्थियों का साक्षात्कार के दौरान 
निम्नलिखित के लिए अनुवीक्षण किया जाएगा: 


4) अभिप्रेणात्मक अनुवीक्षण (20%) 


2) 


अभ्यर्थी के व्यक्तिगत विवरण में दी गई जानकारी के आधार पर - 

क) महिला के स्वास्थ्य का मनोभाव - सकारात्मक प्रसव अनुभव प्रदान करने के लिए शिष्ट 
देखभाल प्रदान करना | 

ख) अलग राज्य में निर्दिष्ट एनएमटीआई में 6-माह के आवासीय पाठ्यक्रम में प्रशिक्षण लेने की 
इच्छा और अपने गृह राज्य में निर्दिष्ट प्रशिक्षण केंद्र में 42 माह की मेंटरशिप | 

ग) प्रशिक्षण के बाद पदस्थापन के आधार पर कम जोखिम वाली गर्भावस्‍था और दैहिक प्रसव में 
प्रसाविकीय देखभाल में वैयक्तिक व्यवसायी के रूप में सेवा करने की इच्छा। 

घ) अपनी जीवन वृत्ति के दौरान नैदानिक अभ्यास जारी रखने की इच्छा, हालांकि उसकी जीवन 
वृत्ति के चरण के आधार पर शिक्षण और नैदानिक अभ्यास के बीच वितरण भिन्न-भिन्न हो 
सकता है। 

ड) कार्यक्रम के लक्ष्यों और जन्म के समय भारत सरकार के गुणवत्तापरक देखभाल प्रदान करने के 
दृष्टिकोण के प्रति प्रतिबद्धता। अभ्यर्थियों को is—are के प्रशिक्षण और मिडवाइफरी नेतृत्व 
वाली देखभाल के मॉडल की स्पष्ट समझ होनी चाहिए। 

अभिक्षमता आंकलन (20%) अंग्रेजी भाषा में बोलने की दक्षता एवं संचार, तकनीकी ज्ञान, ग्राहकों 

के अधिकारों के लिए नेतृत्व एवं पक्ष-समर्थन, और टीम भावना का पता लगाना साक्षात्त्कार प्रक्रिया 

का एक हिस्सा होगा। 


8.5 कार्यक्रम की संरचना 


8.5.i कार्यक्रम का साप्ताहिक वितरण (26 सप्ताह) 


4. शिक्षण: सैद्धांतिक एवं नैदानिक आवासीय 23 सप्ताह 


[6 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


2. परीक्षा (तैयारी सहित) 4 सप्ताह 
3. Wa + सीएल + सार्वजनिक अवकाश 2 सप्ताह 
26 सप्ताह 


8.5.2 शिक्षण के लिए पाठ्यक्रमों का वितरण: 23 सप्ताह = 4020 घंटे 
सामूहिक कक्षा (सैद्धांतिक व कौशल प्रयोगशाला): 3 सप्ताह = 3 xX 40 = 420 घंटे 


नैदानिक आवासीय (नैदानिक अभ्यास, सैद्धांतिक व कौशल प्रयोगशाला): 20 सप्ताह = 20 x 45 = 
900 घंटे 


विवरण 


guia: सैद्धांतिक सामूहिक कक्षा: 3 सप्ताह x 40 घंटे प्रति सप्ताह = 420 घंटे (सैद्धांतिक 400 घंटे + कौशल प्रयोगशाला 
20 घंटे) 


नैदानिक आवासीय (20 सप्ताह): 20 सप्ताह x 45 घंटे प्रति सप्ताह = 900 घंटे (सैद्धांतिक 40 घंटे + कौशल प्रयोगशाला 20 

घंटे + नैदानिक 840 घंटे) 

e 40 घंटे सैद्धांतिक और 20 घंटे कौशल प्रयोगशाला को नैदानिक अनुभव के दौरान समेकित किया जाना है। इन्हें कौशल 
प्रयोगशाला अध्ययन, संकाय के व्याख्यान, नैदानिक दौरे, नैदानिक प्रस्तुति, औषधीय प्रस्तुति आदि के रूप में किया जा 
सकता है। (48 सप्ताह तक 3-4 de प्रति सप्ताह: पहले 40 सप्ताह — कौशल प्रयोगशाला के लिए 2 घंटे प्रति सप्ताह x 


i0 सप्ताह = 20 घंटे और सैद्धांतिक के लिए 2 घंटे प्रति सप्ताह x 40 सप्ताह = 20 घंटे और अगले 8 सप्ताह — 
सैद्धांतिक के लिए 3 de प्रति सप्ताह x 8 सप्ताह = 24 घंटे)। 

एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को केवल प्रसूति सेवा क्षेत्रों (एएनसी क्लिनिक, ट्राइएज, प्रसव कक्ष, प्रसवपूर्व / प्रसवोत्तर वार्ड, 
एसएनसीयू आदि) में नैदानिक सुविधा के ड्यूटी रोस्टर के अनुसार अलग--अलग पालियों में तैनात किया जाएगा। 

प्रति सप्ताह न्यूनतम 45 घंटे और हर पखवाड़े ऑन कॉल ड्यूटी दी जाएगी। 


8.6 अनुदेश पाठ-योजना 


क्र. aan सैडां व्यावहारिक (कौशल | नैदानिक पदस्थापन 
S 
सं. eee द्धांतिक प्रयोगशाला+नै दानिक) 


क्षेत्र 
मॉड्यूल प्रू प्रसाविकाओं को संबंधपरक एवं परिवर्तनकारी 30 एसएल-5 
प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना सीएल-40 
अनुभाग 4: संबंधपरक शिक्षा: प्रसाविकाओं को संबंधपरक एसएल-2 एकीकृत नैदानिक 
प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना सीएल-5 अभ्यास 


i 


इकाई 2: मिडवाइफरी का परिचय और महिलाओं को क्‍या 
चाहिए 


a इकाई 3: गर्भवती महिलाओं के सार्वभौमिक अधिकार 
zx इकाई 4: Rise संबंधपरक देखभाल 
इकाई 6: निर्देशन प्रणाली श्रृंखला सीएल-5 


है अनुभाग 2: परिवर्तनकारी शिक्षा: प्रसाविकाओं को एसएल-3 


एकीकृत नैदानिक 


परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना 
(शिक्षण एवं अध्ययन दृष्टिकोण) 


इकाई i: अभ्यास के लिए ज्ञान को विकसित करना और 
ज्ञान को व्यवहार में लाना 


इकाई 2: हम अभ्यास के लिए सक्षम होने के लिए ज्ञान, 


कौशल और व्यवहार be सीखते हैं 
| | इकाई 3: अभ्यास के लिए अनुभवात्मक और 


[भाग शा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण [7 


सदा पक व्यावहारिक (कौशल | नैदानिक पदस्थापन 


पाठ्यक्रम 
प्रयोगशाला+नै दानिक) 


aI 
eRe aa बलयसत a 
इकाई 4: वयस्क अध्ययन सिद्धांतों पर आधारित शैक्षिक 
दृष्टिकोण विकसित करना 
इकाई 5: शिक्षण और नैदानिक प्रशिक्षण कौशल सीएल-3 

एसएल-3 


मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं को गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म और एसएल-35 
सूतिकावस्था के दौरान देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना सीएल-790 


एसएल-2 


इकाई 3: गर्भावस्‍था में शारीरिक परिवर्तन 2 प्रसवपूर्व ओपीडी / 
वार्ड 
अनुभाग 2: सामान्य गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म और सूतिकावस्था 22 एसएल-42 
सीएल-450 


इकाई 2: गर्भावस्‍था आंकलन और पहली तिमाही के दौरान 3 एसएल-॥ प्रसवपूर्व ओपीडी / 
प्रसाविकीय देखभाल सीएल--40 वार्ड 
इकाई 3: गर्भावस्‍था की दूसरी तिमाही के दौरान प्रसाविकीय एसएल-॥ प्रसवपूर्व ओपीडी / 
देखभाल सीएल-40 वार्ड 
इकाई 4: गर्भावस्‍था की तीसरी तिमाही के दौरान एसएल-॥ प्रसवपूर्व ओपीडी / 
प्रसाविकीय देखभाल सीएल-40 वार्ड 
इकाई 5: प्रसव वेदना के पहले चरण के दौरान प्रसाविकीय एसएल-3 प्रसव कक्ष / आपदा 
देखभाल सीएल-70 
इकाई 6: प्रसव वेदना के दूसरे चरण के दौरान प्रसाविकीय 2 एसएल-3 प्रसव कक्ष 
देखभाल सीएल-40 
इकाई 7: प्रसव वेदना के त्तीसरे चरण के दौरान प्रसाविकीय 2 एसएल-2 प्रसव कक्ष 
देखभाल सीएल-70 
इकाई 8: प्रसव deal के चौथे चरण के दौरान प्रसाविकीय 2 Wavel—-I प्रसव कक्ष 
देखभाल सीएल-70 

ओपीडी 


अनुभाग 3: नवजात शिशु देखभाल 6 एसएल-2 
सीएल--40 


«| | | | fas 


इकाई 4: परिवार केंद्रित देखभाल Poa | प्रसवोत्तर वार्ड 


इकाई 2: नवजात शिशु की निरंतर देखभाल सीएल-40 प्रसवोत्तर वार्ड / 
ओपीडी 


इकाई 3: नवजात शिशु के जोखिम की पहचान और 2 सीएल-45 एसएनसीयू / 
निर्देशन एनआईसीयू / 
प्रसवोत्तर वार्ड / 
ओपीडी 


8 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


सैदां व्यावहारिक (कौशल | नैदानिक पदस्थापन 
द्वांतिक प्रयोगशाला+नैदानिक) क्षेत्र 


| 


इकाई 5: रोग रोकथाम और टीकाकरण सीएल-5 प्रसवोत्तर 
ओपीडी / परिवार 

नियोजन 
वार्ड / टीकाकरण 

ओपीडी 


अनुभाग 4: महिलाओं तथा नवजात शिशुओं की जटिल एसएल-46 
सीएल--300 


एसएल-2 एएनसी ओपीडी / 
सीएल-70 एएनसी वार्ड / 
प्रसूति एचडीयू 


पाठ्यक्रम 


क्र 
सं 
| | देखभाल, स्वस्थ परिवार और समुदाय 
इकाई ॥: गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान समस्याओं की पहचान और 
प्रबंधन 
इकाई 2: प्रसव वेदना के दौरान सामान्य अवस्था से विचलन एसएल-4 प्रसूति वार्ड / 
की पहचान और प्रबंधन 


सीएल-70 प्रसूति एचडीयू / 
प्रसूति ओटी 


एसएल- प्रसवोत्तर वार्ड / 
सीएल-70 प्रसूति एचडीयू 

एसएल- एसएनसीयू / 

सीएल--50 एनआईसीयू 


एसएल-3 प्रसवोत्तर वार्ड / 


इकाई 3: प्रसवोत्तर समस्याओं की पहचान और प्रबंधन 


इकाई 4: नवजात शिशु समस्याओं की पहचान और प्रबंधन 


इकाई 5: स्वस्थ परिवार और समुदाय 


सीएल-40 परिवार नियोजन 
वार्ड 


अनुभाग 5: फार्माकोलॉजी, संक्रमण नियंत्रण और कानूनी व 24 एसएल-2 

नैतिक मुद्दे 

इकाई 4: एप्लाइड फार्माकोलॉजी और औषधि निर्धारण क 20 

बुनियादी सिद्धांत 

इकाई 2: संक्रमण नियंत्रण 2 एसएल-2 एकीकृत नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 


| छअगलोपकआ 5४८: 


मॉड्यूल I: प्रसाविकाओं को गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय सीएल-20 
देखभाल कार्य, प्रबंधन और पर्यवेक्षण करने के लिए तैयार 
करना 


| इकाई ea Aa कक cA कत) 


एमएच / डीएच 
इकाई 2: बदलाव के सिद्धांत और परिवर्तनकारी अभ्यास a! पे aay ८ 


|_| इकाई $: एमएलसीयू का प्रबंधन 2 
|__| इकाई 4: अभिलेख और प्रतिवेदन 


मॉड्यूल IV: प्रसाविकाओं को साक्ष्य-आधारित मिडवाइफरी सीएल-20 

अभ्यास क लिए तैयार करना 
= इकाई 4: ज्ञान और उपयोग — शोध और साक्ष्य | 5 | सीएल-20 i | 
i कुल = 4020 घंटे 440 घंटे 40+840 घंटे i 


9. प्रशिक्षण तथा अध्ययन 


एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक पाठ्यक्रम में प्रशिक्षण अध्ययन अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता सिद्धांतों पर आधारित है। 
अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता का मानना है कि अध्ययन एक सक्रिय प्रक्रिया है जो छात्रों की प्रामाणिक गतिविधियों, 
अनुभवों और सामाजिक संघर्षों पर परस्पर प्रभाव डालती है। शैक्षिक प्रक्रिया को सम्मान के साथ नया 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण [9 


आधार प्रदान किया जाता है, जिसमें शिक्षक ऐसी शिष्ट देखभाल और संचार का आचरण करते हैं जिसका 
ये स्नातक महिलाओं के साथ उपयोग करेंगे। छात्रों को जानबूझकर अध्ययन के केंद्र में रखा जाता है 
और वे ज्ञानार्जन प्रक्रिया में सीधे शामिल हो जाते हैं। इस प्रकार, अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता अध्ययन सुविधा के 
लिए आवश्यक स्रोत सामग्री और विचारशील प्रतिबिंबन के रूप में अनुभव पर निर्मर करती है। गतिविधियों 
तथा अनुभवों के लिए 'वास्तविकता' का संदर्भ प्रदान करना छात्रों को अभ्यास के प्रकारों और जटिलताओं 
के साथ संरेखित करता है जिनका वे मिडवाइफरी सस्‍्नातकों के रूप में सामना कर सकते हैं। जैसे-जैसे 
छात्र वास्तविक जीवन की परिस्थितियां में कार्य करते हैं, जिसमें निर्णय लेने की आवश्यकता होती है, जो 
मातृत्व देखभाल वातावरण की प्रकृति को दर्शाती है एवं स्वायत्त भूमिकाओं को बढ़ावा देती है, fore 
कार्यक्रम के पूरा होने पर ग्रहण करने की आवश्यकता होती है तथा एमएलसीयू में प्रसाविकीय देखभाल 
का नेतृत्व करने के लिए कहा जाता है, उनकी प्रेरणा और वचनबद्धता बढ़ जाती है। 


अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता, सिद्धांत और व्यावहारिकता के बीच की दूरी को कम करने के लिए प्रतिबद्ध है 
जिसे समकालीन तृतीयक स्वास्थ्य देखभाल शिक्षा में एक चुनौती के रूप में देखा जाता है। अनुभवात्मक 
प्रज्ञता, कोठरियों में होने वाले प्रशिक्षण और अध्ययन से बचाते हुए अभ्यास को सिद्धांत के साथ समेकित 
करती है। अध्यापन-कला के एक हिस्से के रूप में अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता छात्रों को मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के 
माध्यम से महत्वपूर्ण अभ्यासात्मक अनुभव में संलग्न करेगी। बच्चे के जन्म, गर्भाधारण-पूर्व और प्रसव से 
लेकर प्रसवोत्तर तक निरंतर नैदानिक समायोजनों की विविधता को प्रतिबिंबित करने के लिए व्यावहारिक 
अभ्यास का आयोजन किया जाएगा, जिसमें अस्पताल और सामुदायिक समायोजन शामिल होंगे। छात्रों को 
देखभाल के अनुभवों की परिभाषित निरंतरता में संलग्न होने की भी आवश्यकता होगी जहां वे गर्भावस्‍था, 
प्रसवकाल, जन्म और सूतिकावस्था में महिलाओं का अनुसरण करते हैं। 

इस कार्यक्रम में परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन (एसबीएल) और प्रतिबिंबित अभ्यास अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता के 
पूरक हैं। एसबीएल उन परिदृश्यों का उपयोग करता है जो यथार्थवादी स्थितियों को दर्शाते हैं, उदाहरण 
के लिए ये मामले के अध्ययन, छिद्रान्वेशी घटनाओं या कथात्मकों पर आधारित हो सकते हैं, जो संदर्भ 
सामग्री और/या अध्ययन शुरू करने के अनुकूल अवसर एवं अभ्यास, जटिलताओं का पता लगाने तथा 
महत्वपूर्ण सोच, समस्या को सुलझाने और निर्णय लेने के कौशल के लिए एक आदर्श वातावरण प्रदान 
करते हैं। एसबीएल में अध्ययन प्रक्रिया कई चरणों से गुजरती है जिसमें छात्रों को परिदृश्य में संलग्न 
होने, स्थिति का विश्लेषण करने, अध्ययन की आवश्यकताओं की पहचान करने, जानकारी हासिल करने, 
प्रतिबिंबित करने और अध्ययन को लागू करने की आवश्यकता होती है। परिदृश्य आधारित अध्ययन 
अध्यापन और परिवर्तनीय अध्ययन कक्ष के माध्यम से सबसे अच्छा प्रदान किया जाता है, जहां छात्र 
अध्यापन-पूर्व पठन और अभिलेखित व्याख्यान का उपयोग कर सकते हैं ताकि शिक्षण की संवादात्मक 
प्रकृति को अपनाया जा सके | 


एक सुरक्षित माहौल प्रदान करने के लिए एक समर्पित सिमुलेटेड वातावरण विकसित किया जाएगा 
जहां छात्रों को मिडवाइफरी कौशल विकसित करने, दल में कार्य करने, परिदृश्यों तथा समस्याओं का पता 
लगाने और नैदानिक निर्णय लेने का अभ्यास करने के लिए सिमुलेशन कार्यशालाओं के माध्यम से अवसर 
मिलेगा। सावधानीपूर्वक तैयार की गईं सिमुलेशन गतिविधियां महिलाओं की आवश्यकताओं एवं स्वास्थ्य 
समस्याओं के लिए प्रासंगिक संचार कौशल विकसित करने का अवसर प्रदान करेंगी, जिसमें विभिन्‍न 
जनसांख्यिकीय तथा सांस्कृतिक पृष्ठभूमि के परिवारों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाले परिदृश्यों के साथ 
बातचीत करना शामिल है, जो भारत की सांस्कृतिक और जनसांख्यिकीय विविधता के हिसाब से बहुत ही 
महत्वपूर्ण है। दलीय सिमुलेशन परिदृश्यों को लागू कर अंतःपेशेवर अध्ययन को भी बढ़ावा दिया जा 
सकता है। 

प्रतिबिंबित अभ्यास छात्रों को सकारात्मक और नकारात्मक दोनों तरह के अनुभवों से सीखने तथा 
अपने स्वयं और अभ्यास के बारे में नई अंतर्दृष्टि प्राप्त करने में सहायक होता है। गिब्स चक्र मॉडल एक 
अनुभव या गतिविधि को व्यवस्थित रूप से प्रतिबिंबित करने के लिए 6-चरण का दृष्टिकोण प्रदान करता 
है; जिसमें विवरण, भावनाएं, मूल्यांकन, विश्लेषण, निष्कर्ष और एक कार्य योजना शामिल हैं। 


20 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IHI—SEC.4] 


विवरण (4) भावना (2) 


| Pret चक मॉडल | 


कार्य योजना (6) मूल्यांकन (3) 


निष्कर्ष (5) विश्लेषण (4) 


परिदृश्य आधारित अध्ययन तथा प्रतिबिंबित अभ्यास द्वारा समर्थित अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता को पूरे पाठ्यक्रम 
में सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक दोनों घटकों में समेकित किया जाएगा। सहयोग तथा बातचीत के प्रोत्साहन 
के लिए शिक्षण और अध्ययन व्यवस्थाओं का आयोजन किया जाएगा, शिक्षण विधियों में अनुशिक्षण एवं 
सामूहिक कार्य, ऑनलाइन संसाधन एवं व्याख्यान, स्मार्ट अध्ययन कक्ष, वैयक्तिक शोध एवं प्रतिबिंबन, 
अनुभवात्मक कार्यशालाएं, जर्नल क्लब, निदान पर्यन्त समीक्षा शामिल हैं। 


9.4 शिक्षण तथा अध्ययन के तरीके 


अध्ययन कक्ष 

e अनुशिक्षण तथा कार्यशाला 

० व्याख्यान तथा परिचर्चा 

e अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता 

e स्व-निर्देशित अध्ययन (अध्ययन संसाधन - 
परिशिष्ट-79) 

© समस्यापरक अध्ययन 

e अभ्यास शिक्षण 

० सूक्ष्म शिक्षण 

e ऑडियो-वीडियो की सहायता से शिक्षण 

*» आभासी अध्ययन -- आभासी अध्ययन कक्ष 

e 'सुरक्षित डिलीवरी ऐप/स्व-निर्देशित 
अध्ययन के रूप में कोई अन्य ऐप 


कौशल प्रयोगशाला 


कौशल प्रदर्शन 
सिमुलेशन 

परिदृश्य आधारित 
प्रतिबिंबित अध्ययन 
ओएससीई (योजना तथा 
परिचालन) 

भूमिका निर्वहण 
अभ्यास 

सूक्ष्म शिक्षण — कौशल 
प्रदर्शन 

वीडियो 


नैदानिक 


पर्यवेक्षित नैदानिक अभ्यास 
स्वतंत्र नैदानिक अभ्यास 

बेड साइड क्लिनिक 

प्रतिबिंबित अध्ययन 
अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता 

मामले की प्रस्तुति 

मामले का अध्ययन / परिचर्चा 
स्वास्थ्य परिचर्चा 

नैदानिक दौरे /सम्मेलन 
औषधीय वार्तालाप तथा प्रस्तुति 
सूक्ष्म शिक्षण - सैद्धांतिक, कौशल प्रदर्शन 
क्षेत्रीय दौरे / प्रतिवेदन 

लॉगबुक (परिशिष्ट--) 


उदाहरण: *ETech आधारित अध्ययन को विभिन्‍न शिक्षण पद्धतियों में सेफ डिलीवरी ऐप के एकीकरण के माध्यम से पूरे 
पाठ्यक्रम में शामिल किया जा सकता है। सेफ डिलीवरी ऐप एक स्मार्टफोन एप्लीकेशन है जो BEmONC पर साक्ष्य- 
आधारित तथा अद्यतन नैदानिक दिशानिदेशों को प्रत्यक्ष एवं त्वरित पहुंच प्रदान करता है। एसडीए का एक शिक्षण और 
अध्ययन साधन के रूप में उपयोग किया जाता है जिसमें 44 मॉड्यूल शामिल हैं: संक्रमण निवारण, गर्भपात के बाद देखभाल, 
उच्च रक्तचाप, प्रसव वेदना के dR चरण का सक्रिय प्रबंधन, दीर्घकालीन प्रसव वेदना, प्रसवोत्तर रकतस्राव, हाथ द्वारा 
भ्रूणनाल का निष्कासन, मातृ रोगाणुता, नवजात शिशु को पुनर्जीवित करना, नवजात शिशु प्रबंधन, जन्म के समय कम वजन 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 2. 


9.2 आंकलन के तरीके 

सतत रूपात्मक आंकलन 

०  प्रतिबिंबित अध्ययन के माध्यम से स्व-आंकलन तथा साथ ही सहकर्मी समीक्षा 
«सामूहिक कार्य 

© उद्देश्य संरचित नैदानिक परीक्षा (ओएससीई) 

© लेख, मामले पर परिचर्चा, साहित्यिक समीक्षा, लिखित कार्य 

*» लिखित परीक्षा 

© व्यावहारिक आंकलन — शिक्षण गतिविधियां, सिमुलेशन 

© शिक्षण अवलोकन आंकलन - शिक्षण अभ्यास का प्रत्यक्ष अवलोकन (अभ्यास शिक्षण) 
© दक्षता आंकलन 

© नैदानिक अभ्यास आंकलन 

40. परीक्षा विनियम 

परीक्षा प्राधिकरण: परिषद्‌ द्वारा अनुमोदित परीक्षा बोर्ड 


अभ्यर्थियों को राष्ट्रीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थान में छः: माह के गहन आवासीय प्रशिक्षण से गुजरना 
होगा। प्रशिक्षण के दौरान, यानी, तीन माह के प्रशिक्षण के अंत में, शिक्षकों को योग्यता-आधारित परीक्षा 
से गुजरना होगा। लेकिन, यदि प्रशिक्षक परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण नहीं करता है, तो उसे 2-4 सप्ताह के अंदर 
सैद्धांतिक या व्यावहारिक, केवल असफल परीक्षा, में फिर से बैठने का एक अवसर दिया जाएगा और यदि 
फिर से असफल हुआ और अनुपयुकत पाया गया तो उसे कार्यक्रम से बाहर कर दिया जाएगा। तीन माह 
के अंत में परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण करने वाले शिक्षकों का छः माह के प्रशिक्षण के अंत में पुनः आंकलन किया 
जाएगा और उसके बाद 48 माह के अंत में अंतिम आंकलन किया जाएगा। तीन माह के बाद की परीक्षा 
का परीक्षा प्रतिरूप 48 माह के अंत में अंतिम परीक्षा के परीक्षा प्रतिरूप के समान होगा। (विस्तृत परीक्षा 
दिशानिर्देश अलग से परिशिष्ट-शा!| में दिए गए हैं।) 


40.4 परीक्षा में प्रवेश हेतु पात्रता 
*» अंतिम परीक्षा में बैठने से पहले सैद्धांतिक तथा व्यावहारिक कक्षाओं में 90% उपस्थिति होनी चाहिए। 


© ऐसे छात्र जो लॉगबुक और नैदानिक आवश्यकताओं जैसी सभी आवश्यकताओं को सफलतापूर्वक पूरा 
करते हैं, परीक्षा में बैठने के पात्र होंगे और अंतिम परीक्षा में बैठ सकते हैं। 


« अंतिम परीक्षा में बैठने के लिए 42 माह का मेंटरशिप अनुभव पूरा करना अनिवार्य है। 


« 3 माह के बाद पहले आंकलन और 6 माह के बाद दूसरे आंकलन में बैठने की पात्रता का विवरण 
परीक्षा दिशानिर्देशों में उल्लिखित है। 


40.2 अनुपूरक परीक्षा 


* सैद्धांतिक या व्यावहारिक परीक्षा में से किसी एक में अनुत्तीर्ण अभ्यर्थी, परीक्षा के 6 सप्ताह बाद 
अनुपूरक परीक्षा में बैठ सकते हैं। 


० wal की संख्या - 3 


40.3 परीक्षा का प्रतिरूप (एक सैद्धांतिक प्रश्नपत्र तथा एक व्यावहारिक परीक्षा) 


आंतरिक (रूपात्मक आंकलन) बाह्य (योगात्मक आंकलन) 


सैद्धांतिक (25 अंक (परीक्षण, निर्दिष्ट कार्य, प्रस्तुतिकरण) 75 अंक (0 अंक — एमसीक्यू, 30 अंक - 
लघु उत्तर, 35 अंक — निबंध / परिदृश्य) 


22 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SECc.4] 


व्यावहारिक |50 अंक (नदानिक प्रदर्शन के लिए 40 + नैदानिक निर्दिष्ट कार्य के 50 अंक (ओएससीई के लिए 20 + डीओपी 
लिए 40 + ओएससीई के लिए 40 + डीओपी के लिए 20) के लिए 30) 


40.4 व्यावहारिक परीक्षा 
© तीन Wael का एक पैनल - संकाय प्रशिक्षक — 2 (एक आंतरिक तथा एक बाह्य) और मेडिकल 
प्रिसेप्टर -- 4 (पाठ्यक्रम के प्रशिक्षण में संलग्न परीक्षक के साथ-साथ मेडिकल प्रिसेप्टर को भी 
पाठ्यक्रम से भलीभांति परिचित होना चाहिए) 
40.5 परीक्षक की योग्यता 
«  प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग विशिष्टता में एम.एससी. नर्सिंग के साथ स्नातकोत्तर उपाधि के पश्चात 5 वर्ष का 
प्रशिक्षण या नदानिक अनुभव दोहरी भूमिका के साथ/ प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग में एम.एससी. नर्सिंग के 
साथ संकाय के रूप में 5 वर्ष के अनुभव के साथ कम से कम 2 वर्ष का प्रसाविकीय नैदानिक कार्य 
अनुभव | 
«स्नातकोत्तर उपाधि के पश्चात 3 वर्ष @ अनुभव के साथ प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग, बाल रोग और 
सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य विभाग के चिकित्सीय संकाय /सलाहकार | 
44. प्रमाणन 
a) शीर्षक — नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) प्रशिक्षक 
ब) निर्धारित अध्ययन कार्यक्रम के सफल समापन पर एक उपाधि प्रदान की जाती है, जिसमें उल्लिखित 
होगा कि अभ्यर्थी ने 
i. नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) प्रशिक्षक का निर्धारित पाठ्यक्रम पूरा कर लिया है। 
ii. jill प्रदान करने से पहले सैद्धांतिक के 90: और व्यावहारिक अनुदेश के 400% घंटे पूरे कर 
Vel 
iii. Seg तथा व्यावहारिक परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण (आंतरिक और बाह्य दोनों में मिलाकर 70% अंक) कर 
| 
स) प्रमाणन, परिषद्‌ द्वारा अनुमोदित परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा किया जाएगा। एसएनआरसी द्वारा एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक 
को एक अतिरिक्त योग्यता के रूप में पंजीकृत किया जाएगा। 
मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक, जो छः माह के अंत की परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण कर लेते हैं, को नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स इन 
मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) के प्रशिक्षण के लिए राजकीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थानों में तैनात किया जाना 
चाहिए। मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों की दक्षता सुनिश्चित करने के लिए मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों को छः: माह के 
प्रशिक्षण के बाद एक वर्ष की ऑनसाइट मेंटरशिप दी जाएगी। परिषद्‌ द्वारा अनुमोदित परीक्षा बोर्ड उन 
अभ्यर्थियों का एक अनंतिम प्रमाणपत्र प्रदान करेगा, जिन्होंने छः माह का प्रशिक्षण सफलतापूर्वक पूरा कर 
लिया है और 42 माह की मेंटरशिप पूरी करने के बाद अंतिम प्रमाणन प्रदान करेगा। 
42. पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल 
पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल I: 
प्रसाविकाओं को संबंधपरक एवं परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 30 घंटे 
व्यावहारिक: कौशल प्रयोगशाला (wave): 5 घंटे, नैदानिक (सीएल): 40 घंटे 
पाठ्यक्रम का लक्ष्य 


यह पाठ्यक्रम छात्रों को भारतीय और वैशिवक संदर्भ में प्रसाविकीय कार्य की समझ के आधार पर एक 
शिक्षक के रूप में उनकी भूमिका को समझने के लिए तैयार करता है, इस प्रकार daar और 
परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए भविष्य के एनपीएम तैयार करता है। इसका उद्देश्य ऐसे 
प्रशिक्षक तैयार करना है जिन्होंने प्रसाविकीय धारणा और अभ्यास के सिद्धांतों को आत्मसात किया है और 
परिवर्तनकारी शिक्षण और अध्ययन प्रथाओं की कला में सक्षम और कुशल हैं। 


पाठ्यक्रम विवरण 


महिला-केंद्रित देखभाल और छात्र-केंद्रित अध्ययन की दोहरी अवधारणाएं इस पाठ्यक्रम के केंद्र बिंदु 
हैं। अभ्यास के दायरे पर आधारित मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास की धारणा, आचार संहिता और प्रसाविका के लिए 
परिषद्‌ / आईसीएम द्वारा आवश्यक दक्षताओं के आधार का पता लगाया जाएगा। इससे एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक 
को वयस्क शिक्षण सिद्धांतों की जानकारी प्राप्त करने और नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी को प्रभावी ढंग 
से पढ़ाने और प्रशिक्षित करने में कौशल तथा दृष्टिकोण विकसित करने में भी मदद मिलेगी। 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 23 


पाठ्यक्रम के उद्देश्य 


. 


भारतीय संदर्भ में आईसीएम प्रसाविका दक्षताओं के अनुरूप मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक की दक्षताओं का 
अन्वेषण HAT | 


मिडवाइफरी पाठ्यक्रम, प्रमुख राष्ट्रीय एवं अंतर्राष्ट्रीय अभिलेखों और मिडवाइफरी तथा मिडवाइफरी 
शिक्षा दिशानिर्देशों की समझ प्रदर्शित करना | 


प्रभावी संचार और शिष्ट मातृत्व एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल प्रदान करने में कौशल प्रदर्शित करना। 


सुविधाजनक अध्ययन हेतु वातावरण बनाने के लिए अनुभवात्मक और परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन 
सिद्धांतों सहित वर्तमान शैक्षिक सिद्धांतों की व्याख्या करना। 


स्व-अध्ययन की आवश्यकताओं को पहचानना और छात्र-निर्देशित अध्ययन लक्ष्यों को लागू करना। 
सामूहिक गतिशीलता और सहकर्मी समीक्षा तथा आत्म-चिंतन के महत्व की व्याख्या करना | 

प्रभावी अध्ययन, शिक्षण पद्धतियों और साक्ष्य के आधार पर संसाधनों का विकास करना। 

सातत्य में मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास और आईसीएम आवश्यक दक्षताओं के संदर्भ में योग्यता-आधारित 
शिक्षा लागू करना। 

वर्तमान मिडवाइफरी जानकारी और कौशल का प्रदर्शन करना और सतत व्यावसायिक विकास की 
भूमिका को पहचानना। 


दक्षताएं (डब्ल्यूएचओ शिक्षक दक्षताएं) 


I. 


4. 


परिषद्‌ के मानकों के अनुसार मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में नैतिक, परोपकारी और मानवतावादी सिद्धांतों 
के अनुरूप प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने में व्यावसायिक दायित्व का प्रदर्शन करना। (4.4) 


महिला के यौन तथा प्रजनन स्वास्थ्य अधिकारों को देखभाल प्रक्रिया का मुख्य बिंदु मानते हुए शिष्ट 
मातृत्व देखभाल पर कंद्रित प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के दर्शन की समझ प्रदर्शित करना। (2.3) 


छात्रों की छिद्रान्वेशी सोच, विवेचनात्मक तक॑ कौशल और नूतन सोच विकसित करने के लिए सक्रिय 
अध्ययन की वृद्धि के लिए शैक्षिक प्रौद्योगिकी का समावेशन करना। (3.4) 


प्रभावी एवं उचित शिक्षण और अध्ययन संसाधनों का चयन व उपयोग करना। (3.2) 


एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम के छात्रों के लिए सिमुलेशन का उपयोग करके दक्षता-आधारित कौशल प्रशिक्षण 
प्रदान करने में कौशल प्रदर्शित करना। (3.3) 


एनपीएम छात्रों की अध्ययन शैलियों और अद्वितीय अध्ययन आवश्यकताओं को पहचानना और उनका 
समर्थन करना। (3.4) 


एक सुरक्षित और प्रभावी नैदानिक अध्ययन की सुविधा मुहैया करना। (4.4) 
वैयक्तिक अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता को बढ़ावा देना। (4.2) 


नैदानिक मूल्यांकन और प्रशिक्षण में कौशल प्रदर्शित करना। (4.3) 


. विभिन्‍न आंकलन रणनीतियों तथा उपकरणों का उपयोग करके छात्र की क्षमता का आंकलन करना 


और सटीक अभिलेख रखना । (5.) 


. एनपीएम कार्यक्रम की प्रभावशीलता की निगरानी, आंकलन और परिगणना करना। (5.2) 
. एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम की योजना और आयोजन में सक्रिय भाग लेना। (6.4) 


. एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम को प्रभावी ढंग से लागू करना और गुणवत्ता सुधार के लिए प्रतिपुष्टि प्रदान 


करना। (6.2) 
विविध देखभाल वितरण समायोजनों में विभिन्‍न तरीकों का उपयोग करके प्रभावी संचार प्रदर्शित 
PAT | (7.4) 


24 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल let आगे दो अनुभागों में उप-विभाजित किया गया है: 


अनुभाग 4 - सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 4 घंटा और नैदानिक (सीएल): 5 
घंटे 
अनुभाग 2 - सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 4 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 5 
घंटे 
अनुभाग 4: संबंधपरक शिक्षा: प्रसाविकाओं को संबंधपरक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए तयार करना 
डब्ल्यूएचओ प्रशिक्षक दक्षताओं और आईसीएम मिडवाइफरी धारणा और मुख्य अभिलेखों पर आधारित, 
इस अनुभाग में छात्रों को वैश्विक संदर्भ में मिडवाइफरी की उनकी समझ को विकसित करके और इसे 
भारत के लिए ag मिडवाइफरी पहल के अंदर स्थापित करके एक प्रशिक्षक के रूप में उनकी भूमिका से 
परिचित कराया जाएगा। महिला-केंद्रित देखभाल और छात्र-केंद्रित अध्ययन की दोहरी अवधारणाएं इसके 
केंद्र बिंदु हैं। 
प्रसाविका की आईसीएम परिभाषा, अभ्यास के दायरे, आचार संहिता और प्रसाविका के लिए आवश्यक 
दक्षताओं के आधार पर मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास की धारणा; लक्ष्य दिशानिर्देश; प्रसवपूर्व, प्रसवकालीन और 
प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल पर डब्ल्यूएचओ के दिशानिर्देश और सिफारिशें; मातृ, शिशु और परिवार का लगाव 
और मनोविज्ञान; प्रसव को मानवीय बनाने से संबंधित साहित्य, रूपरेखा और दिशानिर्देश, सांस्कृतिक 
क्षमता, शिष्ट देखभाल, यौन स्वास्थ्य और प्रजनन अधिकार, लिंग आधारित हिंसा और परिषद्‌ के नैतिक 
और कानूनी पहलुओं का पता लगाया जाएगा और शिक्षण और नैदानिक अभ्यास में लागू किया जाएगा। 
इस अनुभाग में, भारत में प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई वाली देखभाल के लिए नए दिशानिर्देशों और एनपीएम 
के पाठ्यक्रम के साथ डब्ल्यूएचओ मिडवाइफरी शिक्षक की मुख्य दक्षताओं; शिक्षाशास्त्र अध्ययन और 
प्रशिक्षण का परिचय दिया जाएगा। शिक्षक को भूमिका, सकारात्मक मानवीय रिश्ते, सम्मानजनक शिष्ट 
संचार, आत्मविश्वास से भरपूर सक्रिय श्रवण और संचार कौशल @ विकास पर विशेष ध्यान दिया जाएगा। 
छात्र सामूहिक कार्य, सहकर्मी समर्थन और चिंतनशील अभ्यास का उपयोग करना शुरू कर देंगे और 
महत्वपूर्ण सोच कौशल, चिंतनशोल अभ्यास और साक्ष्य-आधारित नीति और अभ्यास सहित आजीवन 
अध्ययन कौशल विकास को अपने शिक्षण अभ्यास में शामिल करेंगे। 


अनुभाग 4: अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (Tava): 4 घंटा और नैदानिक (सीएल): 5 घंटे 


a अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय oe a निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


इकाई गतिविधियां 


टी-4 (अन्य छात्रों तथा |परिचय 
प्रशिक्षकों के साथ 
घनिष्ठता बढ़ाना 


का आंकलन 
चुटकुला सुनाना विकसित करना | करना 
(आइसमकब्रे कर) 
० पाठ्यक्रमों का अवलोकन और| और 'आपको 
अपेक्षाएं 


० मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक प्रशिक्षण 
कार्यक्रम की परिकल्पना 

समूहों में कार्य 

करने वाले छात्र 


साथियों के पिछले aye 
अनुभव के साथ._|* सफलता हेतु अध्ययन गतिविधियां 


तादात्म्य स्थापित | संसाधनों तक पहुंच 
करना (ऑनलाइन) 


आत्मविश्वास क॑ | सेमिनार और ट्यूटोरियल की 
साथ मिडवाइफरी अपेक्षाएं और समूहों में कार्य 
प्रशिक्षक छात्र के | करना 


रूप में आगे बढ़ना 
० स्व-निर्देशित अध्ययन की 


मिडवाइफरी भूमिका 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


इकाई 


समय 
(घंटे) 


अध्ययन के नतीजे 


प्रशिक्षक बनने की 
स्पष्ट समझ रखना 


भारत में 
प्रसाविकीय कार्य 
के वर्तमान 
परिदृश्य व स्थिति 
और इसके भविष्य 
की व्याख्या करना 


प्रसाविकीय अभ्यास 
और नैत्तिकता के 
दर्शन की व्याख्या 
करना 


नैदानिक अभ्यास 
में प्रसाविकीय 
देखभाल मॉडल 
लागू करना 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


विषय 


० पाठ्यक्रम आंकलन, शैक्षणिक 
नीतियों व प्रक्रियाओं, 
सामूहिक मानदंडों का 
अवलोकन 


० डब्ल्यूएचओ प्रशिक्षक दक्षताएं 


० अपना पोर्टफोलियो विकसित 
करना 


भारत में प्रसाविकीय कार्य का 
वर्तमान परिदृश्य व स्थिति और 
इसका भविष्य 


० भारत में प्रसाविकीय कार्य का 
वर्तमान परिदृश्य व स्थिति 
और इसका भविष्य 

० प्रसाविकीय कार्य का इतिवृत्त 


० वतमान परिदृश्य: भारत में 
प्रसाविका कार्य 


० प्रसाविकीय अभ्यास के दर्शन 
का परिचय 


० परिषद्‌ / आईसीएम आचार 
संहिता 

० प्रसाविका और प्रसाविकीय 
कार्य में कुशल अन्य 
सेवा-प्रदाता के बीच अंतर 
सहित प्रसाविकीय देखभाल 
के मॉडल 

० प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई 
वाली देखभाल और देखभाल 
की निरंतरता (एमएलसीसी) 


० प्रसाविकाओं की अगुवाई 
वाली देखभाल और देखभाल 
की निरंतरता के संदर्भ में 
स्वायत्तता और जवाबदेही 


(आईसीएम) 
० परिषद्‌ के अभ्यास मानक 


० प्रसाविकीय अभ्यास के लिए 
आईसीएम वैश्विक मानक 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


गतिविधियां निहित कार्य 


० जर्नल संदर्भ 
और प्रस्तुति 


० सेमिनार (छात्र 
की अगुवाई में) 

० स्व-निर्देशित 
अध्ययन 

० एक गर्भवती 
महिला / नई मां 
से उसके 
अनुभव के बारे 
में बात करना 


pa 


आंकलन विधि 


20 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IHI—SECc.4] 


UT Nie ees oe शैक्षिक अध्ययन हा 
इकाई (घंटे) अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


प्रासंगिक बनाना ile मिडवाइफरी में रुझान 


० मिडवाइफरी एसोसिएशंस 
और इनकी भूमिका 


भारत के लिए महिला, 
नवजात शिशु और परिवार 
केंद्रित देखभाल का दर्शन 
महिला, नवजात और अभ्यास 
शिशु एवं परिवार |. "महिलाएं क्‍या चाहती हैं! - 
केंद्रित देखभाल | देखभाल अपेक्षाएं और 
अवधारणा की अनुभव 
व्याख्या करना 
सकारात्मक संबंध स्थापित 
करना 
भारत में प्रसाविकीय अभ्यास 
में प्रमुख चुनौतियां और 
परिवर्तन हेतु मिडवाइफरी 
प्रशिक्षण का प्रभाव 


भारत में एनपीएम की 
भूमिकाएं और दायरा 

संबंधपरक शिक्षा और 
संबंधपरक मिडवाइफरी 


संबंधपरक शिक्षा 
और संबंधपरक 
मिडवाइफरी की 
व्याख्या करना 


गर्भवती महिलाओं |गर्भवतती महिलाओं के ० व्याख्यान, अभ्यास में ० परिदृश्य पर 
के सार्वभमौमिक  [सार्वभौमिक अधिकार ट्यूटोरियल सार्वभौमिक निहित कार्य 


अधिकारों की हि गर्भवती महिलाओं के और सेमिनार अधिकारों = हि 
ey as ne सार्ईवभौमिक अधिकार और. fe अभ्यास में ee ee 
उन्हें भारत उन्हें भारत में कैसे लागू अवलोकन लिए एक 
लागू किया जा को परिदृश्य 
किया जा सकता है? 
सकता है? विकसित करना 
कि इन्हें मानवाधिकार उल्लंघनों और 
aus i 8 उनके प्रभावों का अंतराष्ट्रीय 
व्यवहार में केसे 


अध्ययन 
लागू किया जा 
सकता है 


शिष्ट संबंधपरक देखभाल: ० परिचर्चा और भूमिका निर्वहन je निबंध, 
शिष्ट मातृत्व और नवजात अनुभवात्मक आलेख लेखन | संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
शिशु देखभाल (आरएमएनसी) प्रज्ञता आर 


प्रसवपूर्व 
: एमसीक्यू 


० आरएमएनसी क्‍या है? ० वीडियो - देखभाल, 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


इकाई 


समय 
(घंटे) 


अध्ययन के नतीजे 


आरएमएनसी के 


महत्व की व्याख्या 


करना 


महिला केंद्रित 


देखभाल की प्रथा 
को शिष्ट मातृत्व 


देखभाल के 


प्रावधान से जोड़ना 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


विषय 


० शिष्ट देखभाल की प्रकृति 


महिला और परिवार से 
अपेक्षित देखभाल का प्रकार 
देखभाल गुणवत्ता सुधार में 
आरएमएनसी का महत्व 
स्वास्थ्य देखभाल के लिए 
ग्राहकों के अधिकार और 
सामाजिक जवाबदेही प्रथाओं 
के उदाहरण 


आरएमसी सेवाओं के लिए 
व्यवहार परिवर्तन रणनीति 


सामाजिक और सांस्कृतिक 
बाधा Yad वातावरण बनाना 


एमएलसीयू में महिलाओं के 
लिए आरएमसी 


सभी चरणों में आरएमसी 
० गर्भाधान-पूर्व 

० एएनसी के दौरान 

० प्रसव वेदना के दौरान 
० प्रसव के दौरान 


० प्रसवात्तर अवधि के दौरान 


आरएमसी में एकीकृत 
नवजात शिशु देखभाल 


ग्राहक गोपनीयता 


शिष्ट संचार: शोक, मातृ 
मृत्यु, नवजात शिशु मृत्यु, 
आईयूडी, मृत जन्म 
जटिलता में आरएमसी 
महिलाओं की प्रसवोत्तर 
मनोवैज्ञानिक रुग्णता के 
दौरान आरएमसी 

दिव्यांग महिलाओं के लिए 
आरएमसो 

अशिष्ट देखभाल का प्रभाव 
एमएनएच सेवा में 
आरएमएनसी आश्वस्त करने 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


गतिविधियां 


आरएमएनसी 


० प्रसूति वार्ड में 


एकीकृत 
नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 
नैदानिक 
परिदृश्य और 
भूमिका निर्वहन 
- जैसे, 
घरेलू / यौन 
शोषण - छात्रों 
द्वारा प्रतिक्रिया 
और सबूत 
समाने लाना 


शिष्ट 

प्रशिक्षक / छात्र 
संबंध प्रोत्साहित 
करना 

अभ्यासः 
नैदानिक 
वातावरण में 
सकारात्मक 
संबंध बनाना 
और मिडवाइफ 
प्रैक्टिशनर की 
नई भूमिका के 
प्रति सभी को 
संवेदनशील 
बनाना 

देखभाल की 
संबंधपरक 
निरंतरता के 
अध्ययन का 
अन्वेषण करना 


निहित कार्य 


प्रसवकालीन 
देखभाल और 
प्रसवोत्तर 
देखभाल के 
दौरान 
आरएमएनसी 
लागू करने में 


प्रसाविकीय कार्य 


की प्रमुख 
चुनौतियों का 
पता लगाना 


भूमिका निर्वहन 


(रोल प्ले) तैयार 


करना 


27 


आंकलन विधि 


० रेटिंग पैमाने 
के साथ 
नैदानिक 
प्रदर्शन का 
आंकलन 
माताओं से 
(विशेष रूप 
से शिष्ट 
देखभाल 
वितरण का 
आंकलन 
करने के लिए 
तैयार किया 
गया) 
प्रतिपुष्टि 
फॉर्म 
प्रसवपूर्व 
देखभाल, 
प्रसवकालीन 
देखभाल और 
प्रसवोत्तर 
देखभाल के 
दौरान 
आरएमएनसी 
को लागू 
करने के 
परिदृश्य का 
आंकलन 


28 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEC.4] 
समय | a शैक्षिक अध्ययन ran 
इकाई | ध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य. | आंकलन विधि 
(घंटे) गतिविधियां 
में एनपीएम की भूमिका 
शिष्ट और ० व्यवहार और शिक्षा में शिष्ट 
करुणामयी रिश्ते बनाना 
देखभाल को 
बढ़ावा देने के 
लिए रणनीति 
विकसित करना 
Vv | टी-2 भारत में मातृ एवं नवजात ० परिचर्चा और je महत्वपूर्ण ० निबंध, 
हंसल शिशु स्वास्थ्य परिदृश्य अनुभवात्मक सांख्यिकीय संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
ee जि प्रज्ञता परिदृश्य | अभिलेख / तथ्य | और 
सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य ० स्व-निर्देशित ही a — wet 
(स्व--अध्ययन) अध्ययन ees ० दौरे के 
० भारत में मातृ एवं नवजात |» एचएससी, ° rie aids bb 
Sea ae पीएचसी खभाल पर आंकलन 
भारत में मातृ एवं शिशु स्वास्थ्य के महामारी । ee ee 
नवजात शिशु संबंधी पहलू और परिमाण | सीएचसी में 
स्वास्थ्य की (स्व-अध्ययन) पर्यवेक्षित 
महामारी विज्ञान |e मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु या 
की व्याख्या करना | स्वास्थ्य के मुद्दे: आयु, लिंग, 
लिंगभेद, मनोवैज्ञानिक 
सामाजिक-सांस्कृतिक कारक, 
लैंगिक असमानताएं और 
महिला सशक्तिकरण 
० एमसीएच संदर्भ में राष्ट्रीय, 
राजकीय, जिला और ग्राम 
स्तरीय स्वास्थ्य देखभाल 
विभिन्‍न राष्ट्रीय वितरण प्रणाली 
आरएमएनसीएच eee ee बलि 
ards कह aeenenthys & ag 
माय जाय ae राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य कार्यक्रम 
प्रसाविकीय सेवा je एमएनएच में देखभाल की 
पहल पर चर्चा गुणवत्ता 
करना 
VI | टी-2 ननिर्दिष्टीकरण निर्दिष्टीकरण (रेफरल) प्रणाली je परिचर्चा और |e निर्देशन पर्ची / निबंध, 
dita प्रणाली तंत्र को तिंत्र अनुभवात्मक नोट लेखन संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
wear ae |, अन्य स्वास्थ्य देखभाल ne ० सेफ डिलीवरी ie 
cen प्रदाताओं की सीमाएं और. पर्यवेक्षित ऐप (एसडीए) 03038. 
संभावनाएं नैदानिक 
निर्दिष्टीकरण हेतु |e निर्दिष्टीकरण के लिए नीति ae 
महिलाओं को और प्रोटोकॉल; रणनीतियों 
संयत करने के की सीमा ([निर्दिष्टीकरण की 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


इकाई अध्ययन के नतीजे 


समय 

(घंटे) 
लिए आवश्यक 
नीतियों तथा 
प्रोटोकॉल को 
पहचानना और 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 29 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


eo गतिविधियां 


निहित कार्य आंकलन विधि 
आवश्यकता वाली स्थितियां, 
कब, कहां और किस स्थिति 
के लिए केसे निर्दिष्ट करना 
है) 


लागू करना 


० परिवहन व्यवस्था: सामुदायिक 
संसाधन, परिवार को सलाह 


और निर्देशन नोट 
० अनुवर्ती कार्रवाई: निर्दिष्ट 
मामलों पर जानकारी रखना 
० निर्दिष्टीकरण पर अभिलेख 
और प्रतिवेदन 


अनुभाग 2: परिवर्तनकारी शिक्षा: प्रसाविकाओं को परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना 
(शिक्षण एवं अध्ययन दृष्टिकोण) 

अनुभाग 2 में संपर्ण सातत्य और प्राथमिक स्वास्थ्य देखभाल समायोजनों में मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के 
संदर्भ में अनुभवात्मक व परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन और योग्यता-आधारित शिक्षा जैसे शैक्षिक सिद्धांतों 
को पेश किया जाएगा। 


छात्रों को एक ऐसा वातावरण बनाने का कौशल सिखाया जाएगा जो सैद्धांतिक और नैदानिक दोनों 
वातावरणों में अध्ययन की सुविधा प्रदान करता ell यह महिलाओं और नवजात शिशुओं की गर्भावस्‍था, 
प्रसवकाल और प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल की निरंतरता में छात्र के मिडवाइफरी ज्ञान और नैदानिक अनुभव पर 
भी ध्यान देगा। सूचित निर्णय लेने, जोखिम प्रबंधन / कल्याणकारी सहायता, समुदाय व प्राथमिक स्वास्थ्य 
समायोजनों में कार्य करने की सुविधा, महिलाओं के लिए मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा और सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य 
भूमिका में साक्ष्य का उपयोग। निरंतर व्यावसायिक दक्षता की आवश्यकता; नैदानिक पर्यवेक्षण की भूमिका; 
शिक्षण सामग्री और संसाधन विकसित करने के अवसर प्रदान करना; अनुभवात्मक व परिदृश्य-आधारित 
अध्ययन के परिचय, सिमुलेशन प्रौद्योगिकियों, अध्ययन और शिक्षण दृष्टिकोण को समेकित करने पर 
प्रकाश डाला जाएगा। 


अनुभाग 2: अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (Tava): 4 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 5 घंटे 
शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


० व्याख्यान, ट्यूटोरियल, हट अभ्यास में ज्ञान व्यक्तिगत 


इकाई |समय (घंटे)। अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय 


I टी-2 स्वयं के ज्ञान आधार |अभ्यास के लिए ज्ञान विकसित 


और विकास क्षेत्रों का |करना और ज्ञान को अभ्यास में | छात्र की अगुवाई के अनुप्रयोग | अध्ययन 

आंकलन लाना वाली सेमिनार पर निहित ere) योजना के 

आईसीएम दक्षताओं ‘| शिक्षा और अभ्यास की ताकत |e स्व-निर्देशित अध्ययन | तैयार करना, साथ 

की समझ प्रदर्शित ९ दक्षताएं क्‍या हैं, और अध्ययन, |e आईसीएम दक्षताओं | जैसे पोर्टफोलियो 

करना और इनके शिक्षण की विभिन्‍न विधियां का उपयोग करते हुए अंतर्गर्भशियी और 

विरुद्ध: आकलन करना | Fe? परिदृश्य विकास cara 4 ee 
० इन्हें विकसित करने के लिए आरएमसी विकास 


चिंतनशील अभ्यास की 
व्याख्या करना और 
इसका उपयोग 
अध्ययन और ज्ञान को 
विकसित करने के 
लिए कैसे किया जा 
सकता है 


अनुभव तैयार करना 

० मिडवाइफरी ज्ञान, चिंतनशील 
अभ्यास और विभिन्‍न दृष्टिकोण 
के बारे में क्या अनोखा है? 


30 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SECc.4] 


इकाई |समय (Ge)| अध्ययन के नतीजे 


एसएल-2 
सीएल-5 


समझ प्रदर्शित करना, 
जिसमें अनुभवात्मक 
प्रज्ञता, कौशल 
अध्ययन, 
परिदृश्य-आधारित 
अध्ययन, 
अभ्यास--आधारित 
अध्ययन शामिल हैं, 
लेकिन इन्हीं तक 
सीमित नहीं हैं 
आईसीएम दक्षताओं 
और डब्ल्यूएचओ 
प्रशिक्षक दक्षताओं को 
सीखने के लिए आधार 
के रूप में अभ्यास से 
परिदृश्य विकसित 
करना 


परिवर्तनकारी और 
संबंधपरक प्रसाविकीय 
देखभाल के लिए 
शैक्षिक दृष्टिकोण की 
समझ का प्रदर्शन 
करना और अनुप्रयोग 


शिक्षण और नैदानिक 
प्रशिक्षण के सिद्धांत व 
रणनीतियों / कौशलों 
की व्याख्या करना 


छात्र-केंद्रित और 
संबंधपरक अध्ययन पर 


आत्म-चिंतन 
गतिविधियों में भाग 
लेना 


पारस्परिक संचार को 
बढ़ावा देना 


विषय 


शैक्षणिक सिद्धांतों की |मिडवाइफरी शिक्षण पर लागू होने 


वाले शैक्षिक सिद्धांत 

० अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता, 
परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन, 
अध्ययन कौशल, अभ्यास में 
शिक्षण और आंकलन, वैचारिक 
अध्ययन 


मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए 
अनुभवात्मक और 
परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन 
० परिदृश्य-आधारित अध्ययन, 
अभ्यास, पढ़ने या ऑनलाइन 
संसाधनों से परिदृश्य कैसे 
विकसित किया जाए 
० अभ्यास आधारित शिक्षा जिसमें 
नैदानिक निर्णय लेना, व्यवहार 
में साक्ष्य का उपयोग करना 
शामिल है 
० नेदानिक क्षेत्र में अभ्यास हेतु 
शिक्षा को आकार देना 
० सिमुलेशन का उपयोग करना 
शैक्षिक दृष्टिकोण 
० संबंधपरक शिक्षा - संबंधपरक 
प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के लिए 
प्रसाविकाओं को तैयार करना 
(छात्र / शिक्षक / 
महिला / परिवार) 
परिवर्तनकारी शिक्षा - 
परिवर्तनकारी प्रसाविकीय 
देखभाल के लिए प्रसाविकाओं 
को तैयार करना 
छात्र केंद्रित अध्ययन 
योग्यता आधारित शिक्षा» 
प्रशिक्षण 


शिक्षण और नैदानिक प्रशिक्षण 
कौशल 

० शिक्षण-अध्ययन प्रक्रिया 

० वयस्क अध्ययन सिद्धांत 


अध्ययन, अभ्यास 
चिंतनशील अध्ययन 
सूक्ष्म शिक्षण 
पाठ योजना और कौशल जांच 
सूची तैयार करना 
एवी एड्स तैयार करना 
मामले का अध्ययन तैयार 
करना, मामला / सिमुलेशन 
परिदृश्य 
मास्टर और नैदानिक रोटेशन 
योजना तैयार करना 

० नेदानिक शिक्षण विधियां - 
दौरे और प्रतिवेदन, बेडसाइड 


० शिक्षण के तरीके - सिमुलेशन, 
परियोजनाएं, समस्या-आधारित |e 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
गतिविधियां 


कुछ आईसीएम 
दक्षताओं और 
डब्ल्यूएचओ 
मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर 
कपीटेंसी डोमेंस के 
आधार पर शैक्षिक 
डिजाइन, शिक्षण 
दृष्टिकोण और पाठ 
योजनाएं विकसित 
करना 


आईसीएम दक्षताओं 
के आधार पर विभिन्‍न 
परिदृश्यों को विकसित 
करने और डब्ल्यूएचओ 
प्रशिक्षक दक्षताओं की 
सीमा के हिस्से को 
एकीकृत करने वाली 
गहन कार्यशालाएं 

० कक्षा में डब्ल्यूएचओ 
दक्षताओं की संपूर्ण 
श्रंखला को शामिल 
किया जाएगा 


० अभ्यास: 
छात्र और शिक्षक के 
बीच सकारात्मक 
संबंध बनाना 

भूमिका निर्वहनः 
परिदृश्य आधारित 
अध्ययन 


परिचर्चा और 
अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता 
अभ्यास शिक्षण: 
सिद्धांत और कौशल 
प्रदर्शन 

चिंतनशील अध्ययन 
का अभ्यास करना 
० भूमिका निर्वहन 


निहित कार्य 


में आईसीएम 
दक्षताओं के 
आधार पर पाठ 
योजना तैयार 
करना 


लिखित 
परिदृश्य और 
कक्षा में शिक्षण 
के लिए उस 
परिदृश्य का 
उपयोग करना 
पोर्टफोलियो 
विकसित करना 


अभ्यास शिक्षण: 
सिद्धांत और 
विभिन्‍न शिक्षण 
पद्धतियों का 
उपयोग करके 
कौशल प्रदर्शन 
पाठ योजना, 
जांच सूची, 
दृश्य-श्रव्य 
साधन (एवी 
एड्स) तैयार 
करना 
मामले का 
अध्ययन तैयार 
करना, 
मामला / 
सिमुलेशन 
परिदृश्य 

० सूक्ष्म शिक्षण 


आंकलन विधि 


० पाठ योजना 
का आंकलन 


०» आईसीएम 
दक्षताओं के 
आधार पर 
परिदृश्य का 
आंकलन 


० निबंध, संक्षिप्त 
उत्तर और 
एमसीक्यू 

० अभ्यास 
शिक्षण 


सत्र / सूक्ष्म 
शिक्षण 


[aT Iil—ave 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


3] 


इकाई |समय (घंटे)। अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय 2 निहित कार्य. | आंकलन विधि 
सफल प्रसाविका- क्लिनिक, सम्मेलन 
महिला साझेदारी ० नैदानिक प्रीसेप्टरशिप, मेंटरिंग 
स्थापित करने के लिए | और रोल मॉडलिंग 
आवश्यक सचार ० सहकर्मी-समीक्षा, आत्म-चिंतन 
कौशल की पहचान | पारस्परिक संचार 
कि] ० संचार 
सांस्कृतिक ० दलीय संचार 
विविध र ० टकराव प्रबंधन 
का के है ० प्रसाविका और महिला के बीच 
चुनौतियों को प्रभावी और शिष्ट संचार 
पहचानना . pe eae gaat के 
० मार्गदर्शन एवं परामर्श 
VI | टी-3 ज्ञान और कौशल आंकलन /मूल्यांकन के तरीके परिचर्चा और ज्ञान आंकलन |e निबंध, 
एसएल-2 |आंकलन के विभिन्‍न le ज्ञान आंकलन: निम्नलिखित अनुभवात्मक प्रज्ञता | परीक्षण की संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
तरीकों की व्याख्या की तैयारी ० स्व-निर्देशित अध्ययन। तैयारी और 
करना ० निबंध © सिमुलेशन ओएससीई एमसीक्यू 
० संक्षिप्त उत्तर स्टेशनों और fe ओएससीई 
| ० एमसीक्यू सिमुलेशन क्षेत्रों 
आकलन उपकरण e कौशल आंकलन की स्थापना 
विकसित करना ० निहित कार्य आंकलन के 
० पर्यवेक्षण जांचसूची लिए चेकलिस्ट 
० ओएससीई / ओएसपीई तैयार करना 
ु ० व्यावहारिक परीक्षा 
FIFO DT / ० मौखिक परीक्षा 
समीक्षा में भाग लेना |, मनोवृत्ति का आंकलनः मनोवृत्ति 
के पैमाने 
पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल वा 
प्रसाविकाओं को गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म और सूतिकावस्था के दौरान देखभाल के लिए तैयार करना 


सैद्धांतिक (टी): 80 घंटे 


व्यावहारिक: कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 35 घंटे, नैदानिक (सीएल): 790 घंटे 


पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल Il को आगे पांच अनुभागों में उप-विभाजित किया गया है: 


अनुभाग 4 - 
अनुभाग 2 - 
घंटे 
अनुभाग 3 - 
घंटे 
अनुभाग 4 - 
घंटे 
अनुभाग 5 - 


पाठ्यक्रम का लक्ष्य 


सैद्धांतिक (टी): 6 घंटे और कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 3 घंटे 


सैद्धांतिक (टी): 24 घंटे और कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 2 घंटे 


सैद्धांतिक (टी): 22 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 42 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 450 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 6 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 2 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 40 


सैद्धांतिक (टी): 22 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 46 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 300 


यह पाठ्यक्रम एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को उनके ज्ञान, नैदानिक कौशल और दक्षताओं को बढाने के लिए 
तैयार करेगा और संपूर्ण waded के दौरान कुशल, जानकार, संवेदनशील और शिष्ट प्रसाविकीय 
देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए सक्षम एनपीएम तैयार करने के लिए उदाहरण पेश करेगा। 


32 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


पाठ्यक्रम विवरण 


यह मॉड्यूल एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को दैहिक प्रसव को बढ़ावा देने और गुणवत्तापरक शिष्ट देखभाल 
प्रदान करने के लिए संबंधित जैविक और व्यवहार विज्ञान और मिडवाइफरी सिद्धांतों की समीक्षा करने में 
सक्षम बनाने के लिए तैयार किया गया है। पाठ्यक्रम में शरीर रचना विज्ञान एवं शरीर विज्ञान, गर्भावस्‍था 
पूर्व देखभाल, प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल, अंतर्गर्भाशयी देखभाल, प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल और नवजात शिशु की 
देखभाल और औषधि निर्धारण के बुनियादी सिद्धांत, कानूनी व नैतिक मुद्दे और संक्रमण नियंत्रण के साथ 
अनुप्रयुक्त औषध विज्ञान की समीक्षा शामिल है। इसमें गर्भावस्‍था, प्रसव वेदना व प्रसवोत्तर अवधि के 
दौरान समस्याओं / जटिलताओं और नवजात शिशु समस्याओं की पहचान और प्रबंधन भी शामिल है। 


पाठ्यक्रम के उद्देश्य 
4. महिला प्रजनन प्रणाली और गर्भाधान के गहन विश्लेषण और जीवन पद्धति पर चर्चा करना। 
2. गर्भावस्‍था पूर्व आंकलन करना और देखभाल प्रदान करना, जिसमें परामर्श भी शामिल है। 


3. प्रसवपूर्व, प्ररवकाल और प्रसवोत्तर अवधि में महिलाओं का आंकलन करना और देखभाल प्रदान करना, 
जिसमें दैहिक प्रसव का संचालन भी शामिल है। 


4. नवजात शिशुओं का आंकलन करना और उनकी देखभाल करना। 

5. सामान्य स्थिति से विचलन की पहचान करना, महिलाओं और नवजात शिशुओं को स्थिरता प्रदान 
करना और उच्च स्वास्थ्य केंद्रों तक पहुंचाना | 

6. अनुप्रयुक्त औषध विज्ञान और औषधि निर्धारण के सिद्धांतों की अच्छी जानकारी प्रदर्शित करना | 

7. भारत सरकार के दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार मिडवाइफरी, प्रसूति संबंधी आपात स्थितियों और जटिल 
स्थितियों में उचित औषधि निर्धारण करना और उनका उपयोग करना। 


8. परिषद्‌ के मानकों के अनुसार प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने में पेशेवर जवाबदेही प्रदर्शित करना 
जो मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में नैतिक, परोपकारी, कानूनी और नैतिक तथा विनियामक और मानवतावादी 
सिद्धांतों के अनुरूप हो | 

9. मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल सुविधाओं में संक्रमण नियंत्रण प्रथाओं को लागू करना। 


40. महिलाओं आर उनके नवजात शिशुओं को प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने में स्वास्थ्य देखभाल दल 
के साथ सहयोग करना। 


44. पारिवारिक और सामुदायिक स्वास्थ्य को बढ़ावा देना और परिवार कल्याण सेवाएं प्रदान करना। 
दक्षताएं (आईसीएम) 


i. मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए क्षेत्राधिकार संबंधी कानूनों, नैतिक, विनियामक आवश्यकताओं, आचार 
संहिता का पालन करना। (4p) 


2. गर्भावस्‍था-पूर्व और प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल प्रदान करना। (2ए) 

3. महिलाओं की स्वास्थ्य स्थिति का निर्धारण करना। (2बी) 

4. भ्रूण के हालचाल का आंकलन करना। (2सी) 

5. गर्भावस्‍था की प्रगति की निगरानी करना। (2डी) 

6. ऐसे स्वास्थ्य व्यवहारों को बढ़ावा और समर्थन देना जिससे उनके हालचाल में सुधार हो। (2ई) 


7. गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म, स्तनपान, माता-पिता बनने और परिवार में बदलाव से संबंधित अग्रिम मार्गदर्शन 
प्रदान करना। (2एफ) 


8. जटिलता वाली गर्भवती महिलाओं का पता लगाना, प्रबंधन करना और उनको उचित परामर्श हेतु 
भेजना। (2जी) 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 33 


9. महिला और उसके परिवार को प्रसव के लिए उचित स्थान चुनने में सहायता करना। (2एच) 
40. अनपेक्षित या गलत समय पर गर्भवती हुई महिलाओं को देखभाल प्रदान करना। (2आई) 
44. दैहिक प्रसव प्रक्रिया और शिशु जन्म को बढ़ावा देना (3०) 

42. सुरक्षित सहज योनि जन्म का प्रबंधन करना और जटिलताओं से रोकथाम करना। (3बी) 

43. जन्म के तुरंत बाद नवजात शिशु की देखभाल करना। Beh) 

44. स्वस्थ महिला को प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल प्रदान करना। (4ए) 

45. स्वस्थ नवजात शिशु की देखभाल करना। (4बी) 

46. स्तनपान को बढ़ावा देना और इसमें सहायता करना। (4सी) 


i7. महिला में प्रसवोत्तर जटिलताओं का पता लगाना और उनका इलाज करना या उचित परामर्श हेतु 
भेजना। (4डी) 


48. नवजात शिशु की स्वास्थ्य समस्याओं का पता लगाना और उनका प्रबंधन करना। (4ई) 
49. परिवार नियोजन सेवाएं प्रदान करना। (4एफ) 
अनुभाग 4: मातृ, भ्रूण और नवजात शिशु की जीवन पद्धति 


इस अनुभाग में सामान्य दैहिक प्रसव की सुविधा का समर्थन करने के लिए प्रजनन और भ्रूण विकास 
के गहन विश्लेषण और जीवन पद्धति में छात्रों के ज्ञान की समीक्षा की जाएगी। 


इस अनुभाग में प्रजनन प्रणाली, गर्भाधान, मासिक धर्म और डिंबग्रंथि चक्र का गहन विश्लेषण और 
जीवन पद्धति; मातृ श्रोणि और भ्रूण खोपड़ी का गहन विश्लेषण शामिल होंगे, लेकिन यह इन्हीं तक 
सीमित नहीं होगा। इसमें गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान होने वाले सामान्य दैहिक परिवर्तनों का गहन अध्ययन 
किया जाएगा। इसमें अपरा शरीर विज्ञान और भ्रूण की वृद्धि एवं विकास, भ्रूण परिसंचरण की समीक्षा की 
जाएगी। मिडवाइफरी जानकारी और अभ्यास कौशल के अनुप्रयोग का समर्थन करने के लिए जैव विज्ञान 
प्रदान करते हुए सामग्री को क्रमिक रूप से सामान्य गर्भावस्‍था के साथ जोड़ा जाएगा। 
अनुभाग 4: अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 


सैद्धांतिक (टी): 6 घंटे और कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 3 घंटे 


गतिविधियां 


(भ्रूण-श्रोणि संबंधों 
के साथ) 


० हार्मानल चक्र 


भरूणविज्ञान और भ्रूण © भ्रूण 
गर्भधारण की की वृद्धि और विकास सामूहिक कार्य परिसंचरण - 


ee प्रक्रिया को योजनाबद्ध 
। ० निषेचन और गर्भाधान जला 
समझना * आनलाइन प्रतिनिधित्व 


34 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
गतिविधियां 


निहित कार्य |[आंकलन विधि 


अपरा विकास और # प्रत्यारोपण व्याख्यान 


कार्य को समझना |, भ्रूणीय विकास ० स्व-निर्देशित 


प्रारं = गर्भा वस्था -0- अ 5 ध्ययन 
RET र्भावस्‍था ee लक अध्ययन 
में भ्रूण की वृद्धि हा 
और विकास की |e अपरा संबंधी कार्य; 
जानकारी प्रदर्शित | रक्त मस्तिष्क अवरोध 
करना « भ्रूण की वृद्धि और 
भ्रूण के स्वास्थ्य | विकास 
और पोषण मं ° भ्रूण परिसंचरण 
गर्भनाल की aor पं 
भूमिका को Vay eee 
समझना 
| टी-2 [प्रारंभिक गर्भावस्‍था गर्भावस्‍था की शुरुआत |e शिक्षण ० रचनात्मक 
में जीवन पद्धति मेंमें जीवन पद्धति में « सामूहिक कार्य प्रश्नोत्तरी 
होने वाले बदलाव हु (अंतिम 
० ऑनलाइन 
मा मी ० हृदय, रुधिर, ese ry 
i a अंत:स्रावी, पाचन, परीक्षा) 
bee के Va, गर्भाशय, « स्व-निदेशित ० शैक्षिक 
गर्भावस्‍था हार्मोन | gen, where sea संसाधन 
की परस्पर क्रिया | प्रणाली वात, त्वचीय विकास 
को समझना बदलाव 


० गर्भावस्‍था के हार्मोन 


० गर्भावस्‍था के सतत 
लक्षण 


अनुभाग 2: सामान्य गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म और सूतिकावस्था 


यह अनुभाग छात्र को सामुदायिक और संस्थागत समायोजनों में प्रसव के दौरान कुशल, दक्ष, 
करुणामयी और शिष्ट प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए तैयार करेगा। 


इसमें दैहिक प्रसव को बढ़ावा देने और शिष्ट गुणवत्तापरक मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल प्रदान 
करने की जानकारी और कौशल शामिल होंगे। इसमें प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल: गर्भावस्‍था का आंकलन, व्यापक 
स्वास्थ्य इतिवृत्त, शारीरिक आंकलन, जांच, मौजूदा रोग का प्रबंधन /रोग निदान, गर्भावस्‍था की 
परेशानियों में सहायता, भ्रूण के विकास और स्वास्थ्य का आंकलन, स्वास्थ्य जानकारी और सूचित सहमति, 
प्रसवपूर्व शिक्षा; अंतर्गर्भाशयी देखभाल: प्रसव वेदना का पहला, दूसरा, तीसरा और चौथा चरण, जिसमें 
प्रसव deat की प्रगति का आंकलन, पार्टोग्राफ, योनि परीक्षण, अवलोकन और अभिलेखीकरण, प्रसव वेदना 
और शिशु जन्म के दौरान महिलाओं की सहायता करना, दैहिक प्रसव को बढ़ावा देना, गैर-औषधीय और 
औषधीय दर्द-निवारक, मूलाधार आघात का आंकलन, मूलाधार टांके लगाना, रक्‍तस्राव का अवलोकन और 
आंकलन, समयबद्ध निर्देशन; प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल: मातृ देखभाल, पितृत्व (माता, पिता और परिवार) की ओर 
पारगमन, लगाव को बढ़ावा देना, त्वचीय संपर्क, स्तनपान की शुरुआत, स्तनपान की चुनौतियों का प्रबंधन, 
अभिलेखीकरण, प्रतिवेदन आदि शामिल हैं, लेकिन केवल यहीं तक सीमित नहीं होंगी। सामान्य गर्भावस्‍था, 
प्रसव वेदना, जन्म और प्रसवोत्तर अवधि के दौरान शिष्ट महिला-केंद्रित प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 35 


साथ-साथ साक्ष्य-आधारित गुणवत्ता, सांस्कृतिक क्षमता और संवेदनशीलता का उपयोग करते हुए 
प्रसाविकीय देखभाल की समग्रता और निरंतरता पर अत्यधिक जोर दिया जाता है। 
अनुभाग 2: अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 22 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 42 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 450 घंटे 
शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


समय न नतीजे ees 
इकाई (घंटे) ध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


निरंतर देखभाल द्वारा गर्भावस्था की शुरुआत ० परिचर्चा और ० गर्भधारण पूर्व le जांच सूची 

महिलाओं के साथ सा ere कमाल अनुभवात्मक परामर्श का उपयोग 
गर्भावस्‍था पूर्व दे 

साझेदारी? को सुगम प्रज्ञता करते हुए 


महिलाओं का 
e यौन विकास की समीक्षा की काशल 
— (स्व-अध्ययन) ० प्रदर्शन इतिवृत्त लेना | Pls 


और उनके ees 
स्वास्थ्य की ० जांच सूची 


गर्भावस्‍था पूर्व 


देखभाल के महत्व को ९ मानव कामुकता के हे ey 0७०8 


परामर्श देना 


समझाना सामाजिक-सांस्कृतिक स्थिति का का उपयोग 
पहलू (स्व-अध्ययन) ० शिक्षण, सामूहिक | आंकलन करते हुए 


महिला और उसके ae pea 
मधुमेह, उच्च रक्तचाप ay दानिक 
परिवार के लिए प्रसव मेह, उच् ५ ० महिलाओं की 
को एक सामान्य जीवन| थायराइड और गर्भावस्‍था je मामले का अध्ययन। पोषण स्थित्ति प्रदर्शन का 
में भावित करने _ आंकलन 
घटना के रूप में को प्र करने वाले का आंकलन 
पहचानना जीर्ण संक्रमण जैसी और जांच साक्ष्य 
a cee स्वास्थ्य समस्याओं के आधारित 
योग्य दम्पत्तियों को fore wea anenfta Pid 
a foams ए साक्ष्य आधारित ey 
गर्भधारण खमभाल " 
है जांच 
प्रदान करना 
दैहिक प्रसव के संबंध में 
जागरूकता के साथ 
गर्भधारण पूर्व परामर्श 


मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में 
साझा निर्णय लेने में 
सक्षम बनाने के लिए 
जानकारी प्रदान करना ** आनुवंशिक परामर्श 
और कौशल विकसित | (se) 

० गर्भावस्‍था का आंकलन 

और पुष्टि करना 

समझना और उसकी | मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में 
वकालत करना साझा निर्णय लेना 


० योजनाबद्ध पितृत्व 


टी-3 |महिलाओं की पहली तिमाही के दौरान fe पचिर्चा और ० स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा निबंध, 
विशिष्टता, और उनके गर्भावस्‍था का आंकलन alk} अनुभवात्मक संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
सामाजिक व प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रज्ञता प्रस्तु और 
सीएल-40 [सांस्कृतिक संदर्भ एमसीक्यू 
eer ° निम्नलिखित की समीक्षा | प्रदर्शन USS warily 
जि न eee साइड प्रक्रिया जांच 
कमी पर प्रभावी ढंग ale सामान्य गर्भावस्‍था ० बेड साइड nek 
क्लीनिक Xb ee. 
प्रतिक्रिया देना ० मातृ पोषण एवं कुपोषण उपयोग करते 


एसएल--॥ 


>यहां यह उल्लेखनीय है कि प्रसाविका और महिला के बीच साझेदारी संबंध में, दोनों समान रूप से आवश्यक, लेकिन अलग-अलग, योगदान देते हैं। 
महिला परिभाषित करती है कि उसका परिवार कौन है और वे भागीदार कैसे बनेंगे। जानकारी साझा की जाती है, निर्णयों पर बातचीत की जाती है और 
महिला ऐसे निर्णय लेती है जो उसके लिए सही होते हैं। प्रसाविका महिला के निर्णयों का समर्थन करती है। पेयरमैन एवं अन्य पाठ्यपुस्तक में “व्यवहार 
में साझेदारी' अध्याय देखें। 


36 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई 


समय 
(घंटे) 


अध्ययन के नतीजे 


महिला और परिवार 
को प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल 
का महत्व समझाना 


गर्भवती महिलाओं की 

प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल, 

स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा और 

निरंतर देखभाल प्रदान 

करने में कौशल 

प्रदर्शित करना 

० गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान 
समानता और 
देखभाल तक पहुंच 
को बढ़ावा देना 

e महिला और उसके 
परिवार के लिए 
प्रसव को एक 
सामान्य जीवन 
घटना के रूप में 
पहचानना 


» अभिलेखीकरण और |° 
अभिलेख रखने की 
आवश्यकता की 
व्याख्या करना 


विषय 


गर्भावस्‍था की पहचान - 
संकेत और लक्षण, 
विभेदक निदान, 
पुष्टिकरण परीक्षण 
प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल की 
परिभाषा, प्रकृति, उद्देश्य 
और महत्व 


० आरएमसी प्रोटोकॉल 
का पालन करते हुए 
महिलाओं के साथ 
साझेदारी बनाना 


प्रसवपूर्व आंकलन: 
इतिवृत्त लेना, शारीरिक 
परीक्षण, स्तन परीक्षण, 
प्रासविक तथा श्रोणि 
परीक्षण (लियोपोल्ड 
कौशल), प्रयोगशाला 
जांच 

गर्भावस्‍था की छोटी- 
मोटी परेशानियों की 
पहचान एवं प्रबंधन 
प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल और 
परामर्श (गर्भावस्था में 
जीवनशैली, पोषण, साझा 
निर्णय लेना, गर्भावस्‍था 
में जोखिम भरा व्यवहार, 
गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान यौन 
जीवन के संबंध में 
परामर्श आदि) 

प्रसवपूर्व चिंता की जांच 


पारिवारिक हिंसा की 
जांच 
० एएनसी के दौरान 
प्वाइंट ऑफ केयर और 
वन स्टॉप सर्विस 
गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान 
खतरे के संकेत 
गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान 
सामान्य स्थिति को 
बढ़ावा देने के साथ प्रसव 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
गतिविधियां 


मामले पर 
परिचर्चा 

सेमिनार 

नर्सिंग दौरे 
प्रसवपूर्व ओपीडी 
और वार्ड में 
पर्यवेक्षित नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 
स्व-निर्दे शित 
अध्ययन 

कुशल जन्म 
परिचर मॉड्यूल 
ऑनलाइन 
व्याख्यान 
परिदृश्य आधारित 
अध्ययन 


निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


सम्मेलन 
प्रसवपूर्व 
इतिवृत्त लेना 
और आंकलन 
करना 
सूक्ष्म-जन्म 
योजना तैयार 
करना 


प्रयोगशाला 
जांच: प्रदर्शन 
और व्याख्या 
- यूपीटी, 
एचबी 
अनुमान, 
एचआईवी / 
सिफिलिस 
जांच; 
एल्बुमिन और 


शुगर के लिए 
मूत्र विश्लेषण 


भ्रूण स्वास्थ्य 
का आंकलन 
प्रसवपूर्व 
परामर्श 


हुए नैदानिक 
कौशल का 
आंकलन 
करना 
रेटिंग पैमाने 
का उपयोग 
करते हुए 
दानिक 
प्रदर्शन का 
आंकलन 
करना 
ओएससीई / 
ओएसपीई 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


इकाई 


| 


समय 
(ac) 


टी--4 
एसएल-॥ 


सीएल--40 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


pear grea शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य 


की तैयारी और जटिलता 
की तैयारी 


० बच्चे के जन्म की तैयारी 
० शिष्ट देखभाल और 
संवेदनशील संचार 
० अभिलेखीकरण और 
प्रतिवेदन 
० भारत सरकार के 
दिशानिर्देशों के 


अनुसार नैदानिक 
प्रक्रियाएं 


० एएनसी के विभिन्‍न 
मॉडल और उनका 
विकास 

० एएनसी प्रावधान का 
भारत सरकार का वर्तमान 
मॉडल 


e डौला/आशा की भूमिका 


दूसरी तिमाही के गर्भावस्‍था की दूसरी ० शिक्षण 
दौरान प्रसाविकीय तिमाही के दौरान 
अभ्यास की जानकारी [प्रसाविकीय देखभाल है 
प्रदर्शित करना * आनलाइन 
कल ० दूसरी तिमाही के दौरान सका 
शारीरिक परिवर्तनों और 
परेशानियों से संबंधित f° परिदृश्य आधारित 


० सामूहिक कार्य 


महिला केंद्रित । a 
न जिक re शिक्षा और प्रबंधन earl 
q देखभाल 
बनाए रखना ० आरएच नकारात्मक और |* मामले का अध्ययन 
रोगनिरोधी एंटी डी » सिमुलेशन 
० दूसरी तिमाही के परीक्षण | कार्यशाला 
भ्रूण की वृद्धि और हे 
विकास का आकलन और स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 
कास का आंकलन 
करना ० जांच परिणामों की 


व्याख्या करना 
० आईएफए, कैल्शियम 

और विटामिन डो 

अनुपूरण, ग्लूकोज 

सहनशीलता परीक्षण, 

टीकाकरण आदि पर 
मातृ स्वायत्तता और स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 


चयन को बढ़ावा देने |, सूचित निर्णय लेना 
वाली नैतिक 


मौजूदा रोग के प्रबंधन 
या रोग निदान पर 
चर्चा करना 


37 


आंकलन विधि 


० प्रश्नोत्तरी, 
(अंतिम 
पाठ्यक्रम 
परीक्षा) 

० योग्यता 
आधारित 
आंकलन 


e ओएससीई 


36 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SECc.4] 


इकाई 


IV 


समय 
(घंटे) 


टी--4 
एसएल-+॥ 


सीएल--40 


अध्ययन के नतीजे 


मिडवाइफरी प्रथा को 
सुविधाजनक बनाना 


तीसरी तिमाही के 
दौरान प्रसाविकीय 
अभ्यास की जानकारी 
प्रदर्शित करना 


जन्म योजना विकसित 
करने के लिए महिला 
केंद्रित संबंध- 
आधारित देखभाल 
बनाए रखना 


प्रत्येक महिला का 


आत्मविश्वास बढ़ाने के 


लिए प्रसव की तैयारी 


विषय 


० प्रसवपूर्व आंकलन: पेट 
टटोलना, भ्रूण आंकलन, 
भ्रूण की हृदय गति का 
परिश्रवण करना - 
डॉपलर और पिनार्ड्स 
भ्रूण स्वास्थ्य का 
आंकलन: भ्रूण प्रारूप, 
डीएफएमसी, 
बायोफिजिकल प्रोफाइल, 
गैर-तनाव परीक्षण, 
काडियोटोको ग्राफी, 
यूएसजी, वाइब्रो- 
एकॉस्टिक सिमुलेशन 


दूसरी तिमाही में प्रसवपूर्व 
देखभाल 


० महिला केंद्रित देखभाल 


० शिष्ट देखभाल और 
संवेदनशील संचार 

० निर्देशन और सहयोग, 
सशक्तिकरण 

० निरंतर जोखिम 
आंकलन 

० मातृ मानसिक स्वास्थ्य 


० डौला / आशा को 
भूमिका 


गर्भावस्‍था की तीसरी 

तिमाही के दौरान 

प्रसाविकीय देखभाल 

० तीसरो तिमाही के दौरान 
शारीरिक परेशानियां 


० तीसरी तिमाही के 
परीक्षण और जांच 


देर से गर्भावस्‍था में भ्रूण 
सहभागिता 

तीसरी तिमाही की 
प्रसवपूर्व शिक्षा कक्षाएं 


० प्रसव की तैयारी और 
जटिलता की तैयारी 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


शिक्षण ० प्रश्नोत्तरी, 
अंतिम 
० सामूहिक कार्य 5 
पाठ्यक्रम 
° ऑनलाइन परीक्षा) 
व्याख्यान 
० योग्यता 
० परिदृश्य आधारित आधारित 
अध्ययन आंकलन 


० मामले का अध्ययन 


अनुरूपण 
कार्यशाला 

प्रसव स्थिति का 
प्रदर्शन 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


इकाई 


V 


समय 
(घंटे) 


टी--4 
एसएल-3 


सीएल-70 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय 


emda स्तनपान कराने पर 
स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 


से संबंधित प्रसवपूर्व 

देखभाल और स्तनपान 

शिक्षा प्रदान करना |, गर्भावस्‍था के खतरे के 
संकेत - फटो हुई 
झिल्लियों की पहचान 

e सतत जोखिम आंकलन 

० सांस्कृतिक जरूरतें 

० महिला केंद्रित देखभाल 

० शिष्ट और संवेदनशील 
संचार 

० वैकल्पिक प्रसव स्थिति - 
महिलाओं का पसंदीदा 
विकल्प 


० डौला/आशा की भूमिका 
प्रसव deal की जीवन [प्रसव वेदना के प्रथम चरण |e 
पद्धति लागू करना कि दौरान प्रसाविकीय 
प्रसाविका कैसे किसी देखभाल 


महिला का निम्नलिखित की समीक्षा |» 
आत्मविश्वास बढ़ाते हैं ee eee 

० सामान्य प्रसव और जन्म 
और प्रसव वेदना के ५ 
दौरान उसको शिष्ट f° जन्म// प्रसव वेदना की 
देखभाल प्रदान करते | अण्ञात 
हे ० योनि परीक्षण (यदि ° 


जीवनसाथी की Yo), प्रसव वेदना के are 
को प्रोत्साहित करना 


39 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन मम 
गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 
परिचर्चा और eds साइड |e निबंध, 
अनुभवात्मक क्लिनिक संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
cel ० स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा ane 
aes एमसीक्यू 
हक ० मामले की aiteeeitd 
क्लीनिक प्रस्तुति e ओएससीई / 
मामले पर ओएसपीई 
० नैदानिक । 
परिचर्चा जलने ० प्रक्रिया जांच 
सम्मेलन ; 
सेमिनार न ail का 
* मामल का उपयोग करते 
अनुरूपण अध्ययन हुए कौशल 


० पार्टोग्राफ की|। Pl जाकलन 
प्लॉटिंग और |, रेटिंग पैमाने 


वीडियो 


० प्रसव कक्ष सुनियोजित ॥ प्रदर्शन mes 
महिला के भावनात्मक | करना - ट्राइएज, प्रसव सा Suit के साथ 
० प्रसव वा 
स्वास्थ्य पर प्रसाविका | की तैयारी पर्यवेक्षित नैदानिक * पर्यवेक्षितत नैदानिक 
पर्यवेक्षित नैदानिक 
(और दल के अन्य कु नैदानिक प्रदर्शन का 
सदस्यों) की भाषा के [° कारात्मक प्रसव का अभ्यास व कल 
) की भाषा के अभ्यास आंकलन 
भाव गर चर्चा करना | हिल caus 
प्रभाव पर चर्चा करना ० ; 
० शिष्ट देखभाल और आईएमएनसीआई 
प्रसव के लिए ऐसा न्‍ इएमए लक ” 
संचार एनएसएस 
माहौल कैसे बनाए . ce 
जिसमें मॉड्यूल 
रखा जाए जिसमें पहला चरण Sh 


महिला सुरक्षित महसूस 
करे, पर चर्चा करना 


० सामान्य प्रसव की 
कार्यिकी 

प्रसव के दौरान दर्द 

पर प्रभावी ढंग से काम 


० प्रसव वेदना की प्रगति 
की निगरानी 


लक्ष्य दिशानिर्देश 


40 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SECc.4] 


इकाई अध्ययन के नतीजे 


समय 
(घंटे) 


करना 


प्रसाविका किस प्रकार 
किसी महिला की प्रसव 
कार्यिकी को बढ़ाने 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
गतिविधियां 


पार्टो ग्राफ का उपयोग 

प्रसव वेदना के दौरान 

दर्द निवारक 

(गैर-औषधीय और 

औषधीय) 

भ्रूण स्वास्थ्य का आंकलन 

और निगरानी 

मनोवैज्ञानिक समर्थन - 

भय का प्रबंधन 

प्रसव @ लिए गतिविधि 

और स्थिति 

प्रसव वेदना के दौरान 

पोषण 

सामान्य प्रसव के पहले 

चरण के दौरान देखभाल 

० महिलाओं के लिए 
सकारात्मक प्रसव 
अनुभव 

० प्रसव के दौरान साथी 

० माता और नवजात 
शिशु के बीच संबंधों 
को बढावा देने के लिए 
सुरक्षित वातावरण 

० डौला / आशा की 
भूमिका 

० प्रसव मध्यवर्तन के 
संबंध में साक्ष्य 
आधारित सिद्धांत 
(जैसे, मां बनना) और 
अभ्यास 


विषय 


निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


के दौरान प्रसाविकीय 
देखभाल 


स्व-निर्देशित अध्ययन 


० जीवन पद्धति (प्रसव तंत्र) 


० आसनन प्रसव के संकेत 


० अंतर्गर्भाशयी निगरानी 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


इकाई 


Vil 


समय 
(घंटे) 


टी-2 
एसएल-2 


सीएल-70 


अध्ययन के नतीजे 


और दैहिक प्रसव को 
बढ़ावा देने के लिए 
देखभाल और सहायता 
प्रदान करते हैं, पर 
चर्चा करना 


जन्म के तुरंत बाद 
नवजात शिशु का 
आंकलन और देखभाल 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


ay गतिविधियां 


पसंदीदा प्रसव स्थिति 
० गर्म सेक 


योनि परीक्षण (यदि 
आवश्यक हो) 


प्रबंधन - तैयारी और 
जन्म का समर्थन 


मनोवैज्ञानिक समर्थन 


गर--निर्देशात्मक 
अनुशिक्षण 


० डौला/आशा की भूमिका 


प्रसव वेदना के तीसरे चरण ० शिक्षण 

के दौरान देखभाल ० सामूहिक कार्य 

० जीवन पद्धति - गर्भनाल 
पृथक्करण और 
निष्कासन, होमियोस्टैसिस 


° ऑनलाइन 
व्याख्यान 


प्रसव वेदना के तीसरे 
चरण का शारीरिक 
प्रबंधन 


अध्ययन 


प्रसव वेदना के तीसरे 
चरण का सक्रिय प्रबंधन 
गर्भनाल, झिल्ली और 
वाहिकाओं की जांच 


मूलाधार, योनि का 
फटना / चोट का आंकलन 
और यदि आवश्यक हो 
तो सिवना 


मूलाधार की तात्कालिक 
देखभाल 


जन्म के तुरंत बाद 
नवजात शिशु का 
आंकलन और देखभाल 


आवश्यक नवजात शिशु 
देखभाल (ईएनबीसी) 


स्तनपान की शुरुआत 
त्वचीय संपर्क 


० विटामिन के प्रोफिलैक्सिस 


० परिदृश्य आधारित 


4] 


निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


० मामले का le wala 
अध्ययन (अंतिम 
अनुरूपता पाठ्यक्रम 

० अनुरूपता 

परीक्षा) 


42 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


समय preg ger a शैक्षिक अध्ययन ro 
इकाई (घंटे) अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


प्रसव वेदना के चौथे चरण je शिक्षण ० प्रश्नोत्तरी 
(अंतिम 
पाठ्यक्रम 
ऑनलाइन परीक्षा) 


जज प्रसव और जन्म कक [के दौरान देखभाल ay 
4 हिक कार्य 
प्रभाव का एक परिवर्ती |. और नवजात शिशु 
eas 3 मां और नवजात शिशु का 
एल-70 घटना के रूप में चर्चा a 
, गहन विश्लेषण oe 
| व्याख्यान 
और प्रबंधन ० योग्यता 


eae परिदृश्य आधारित आधारित 
० मातृ , मालिक 


स्तनपान की शुरुआत | लंबाई, मूत्र उत्पादन, 
और पर्याप्त लैचिंग रक्‍त हानि का अवलोकन [* मामले का अध्ययन 
सुनिश्चित करना अनुरूपण 
3 ० जन्म का अभिलेखीकरण |* अनुरूपण 

और अभिलेख कार्यशाला 


० स्तनपान और लैचिंग 


अध्ययन आंकलन 


० गर्भाशय की ऐंठन का 
प्रबंधन 

० वैकल्पिक / पूरक उपचार 

० डौला/आशा की भूमिका 

० विभिन्‍न प्रसव प्रथाएं 


० मां और नवजात शिशु के 
बीच संबंध को बढ़ावा 
देने के लिए सुरक्षित 
वातावरण 


महिला की देखभाल में [प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल / परिचर्चा और सेमिनार ० निबंध, 
प्रसाविका की भूमिका महिलाओं की निरतर अनुभवात्मक संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
के एकीकरण को देखभाल प्रज्ञता 
प्रदर्शित करना निम्नलिखित की समीक्षा प्रदर्शन 
० सामान्य प्रसवोत्तर अवधि je अनुरूपण 

प्रसव के बाद He सूतिकावस्था की कार्यिकी * बेडसाइड 
शारीरिक परिवर्तनों का, /सवोत्तर आंकलन और | राउंड, क्लिनिक | स्तनपान के 
ea oe देखभाल — समायोजन le मामले पर लिए परामर्श 

और घरेलू देखभाल परिचर्चा देना - * ओएससीई / 
स्तनपान की कार्यिकी  मूलाधार स्वच्छता और भूमिका निर्वहन तकनीक और | stews 
और कल ee देखभाल फीडिंग पर सेफ 
संरचना को समझना |, मूत्राशय और आंत्र की डिलीवरी ऐप 

कार्यविधि वीडियो 
प्रसवोत्तर महिलाओं Ol. सूतिकावस्था के छोटे- 
देखभाल में कौशल मोटे विकार और उनका 
प्रदर्शित करना प्रबंधन 


कौशल का 
आंकलन 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 43 


समय शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
इकाई ) 


‘6 अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


० स्तनपान और स्तनपान 
नवजात शिशु की प्रबंधन की कार्यिकी 


समस्थिति और पोषण je waaqtay परामर्श और 
संबंधी आवश्यकताओं | मनोवैज्ञानिक सहायता 
को समझना ० सामान्य प्रसवोत्तर उदास 
बच्चे और प्रसवोत्तर 
अवसाद की पहचान 
० पितृत्व की ओर बदलाव 
० प्रसव के 72 घंटे से 

6 सप्ताह तक मां की 

देखभाल 

० सांस्कृतिक क्षमता 
(प्रसवोत्तर आहार और 
प्रथाओं से संबंधित 
वर्जनाएं) 

० प्रसवोत्तर और नवजात 
शिशु देखभाल के 
संबंध में साक्ष्य 
आधारित अभ्यास 

० प्रसवोत्तर परिवार 
नियोजन विधियों की 
जानकारी 


० अनुवर्तन 


अनुभाग 3: नवजात शिशु देखभाल 

यह अनुभाग छात्र को सामुदायिक और werd समायोजनों में नवजात शिशु को कुशल, जानकार, 
शिष्ट और संवेदनशील प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने के लिए तैयार करेगा। 

यह नवजात शिशु को गुणवत्तापूर्ण देखभाल प्रदान करने और जीवन में स्वस्थ परिवर्तन को बढ़ावा 
देने के लिए आवश्यक जानकारी और कौशल को संबोधित करेगा। इसमें अतिरिक्त गर्भाशय जीवन में 
बदलाव का समर्थन करना; नवजात शिशु की तात्कालिक देखभाल, अपगार स्कोर, नवजात शिशु आंकलन, 
आवश्यक नवजात शिशु देखभाल; पूर्ण शारीरिक परीक्षण; नवजात शिशु की स्वास्थ्य संबंधी आवश्यकताएं; 
नवजात शिशु की पोषण संबंधी आवश्यकताएं, त्वचीय संपर्क; स्तनपान; मां और नवजात शिशु का संबंध; 
शिशु की वृद्धि और विकास; रोगनिरोधी उपाय; भागीदार /समर्थक व्यक्ति को शामिल करना; जांच और 
टीकाकरण; माता-पिता को साक्ष्य आधारित जानकारी प्रदान करना; सांस्कृतिक मानदंडों पर विचार; शिष्ट 
देखभाल शामिल होंगे, लेकिन यहीं तक सीमित नहीं होंगे। यह छात्रों को नवजात शिशु के सामान्य 
विकास में भिन्‍नताओं को पहचानने और अंतःपेशेवर दल को निर्देशित करने के लिए सक्षम बनाता है। 

अनुभाग 3: अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 6 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 2 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 40 घंटे 
शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


समय अ घ्ययन नतीजे air sere maa 
इकाई (घंटे) अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


44 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई 


समय 
(घंटे) 


अध्ययन के नतीजे 


संवदेनशील, परिवार 
केंद्रित प्रसाविकीय 


देखभाल की आवश्यकत्ता 


और यह केसे प्रदान की 


जाती है, पर चर्चा करना 


महिला और परिवार के 
विचारों और मान्यताओं 
का सम्मान कैसे किया 


जाता है, पर चर्चा करना 


शिशु पर की गई 
क्रियाओं और मध्यवर्तनों 
को पूरी तरह से 
समझाया जाना चाहिए 
और सूचित सहमति ली 
जानी चाहिए 


विषय 


० परिवार केंद्रित देखभाल 
की अवधारणा 


० साझेदारी और सांस्कृतिक 


० सूचित सहमति और साझा 


निर्णय लेना 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
गतिविधियां 


सामूहिक कार्य 


जन्म के समय नवजात |सामान्य नवजात शिशुओं का/« परिचर्चा और 


शिशु की तैयारी पर 
चर्चा करना 

जन्म के तुरंत बाद 
नवजात शिशु के 
निरीक्षण और आंकलन 
में प्रसाविका की भूमिका 
स्पष्ट करना 

उन शारीरिक अनुकूलनों 
का अन्वेषण करना 
जिनसे नवजात शिशु 
जन्म के बाद Youd है 
मां की उपस्थिति में 
सामान्य नवजात शिशु 
देखभाल कौशल 
प्रदर्शित करना 


जोखिम वाले नवजात 
शिशु की पहचान करना 
और तत्काल उचित 


आंकलन और सतत 
देखभाल 
निम्नलिखित की समीक्षा 


० सामान्य नवजात शिशु - 
शारीरिक अनुकूलन 


e नवजात शिशु का 
आंकलन और देखभाल 
० जन्मजात विसंगतियों की 
जांच 

० प्रसव के 72 घंटे से 
6 सप्ताह तक नवजात 
शिशु की देखभाल 
(नवजात शिशु की 
नियमित देखभाल) 


० संक्रमण रोकथाम (अपूयन 
और हाथ धोना) 


जोखिम की पहचान और 
निर्देशन 


० जोखिम की पहचान और 


अनुभवात्मक 
प्रज्ञता 
प्रदर्शन 
स्व-निर्देशित 
अध्ययन 
सेमिनार 
मामले पर 
परिचर्चा 
नवजात शिशु 
प्रबंधन और 


जोखिम प्रबंधन 


पर सेफ 
डिलीवरी ऐप 
मॉड्यूल 
प्रसवोत्तर 
वार्ड / 
एनआईसीयू / 
नर्सरी में 
पर्यवेक्षित 
नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 
शिक्षण और 
सामूहिक कार्य 
० परिदृश्य 


० मामले की 


० स्वास्थ्य 


निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


Sibel, 
योग्यता 
आधारित 


० निबंध, संक्षिप्त 
उत्तर और 
एमसीक्यू 


प्रस्तुति / 
मामले पर 
परिचर्चा © ओएससीई / 

ओएसपीई 
परिचर्चा 


e गवजात 


शिशु का 
आंकलन 


[aT Ii—ave 4] 


इकाई 


समय 
(घंटे) 


एसएल-2 


सीएल-40 


अध्ययन के नतीजे 


देखभाल प्रदान करना 
अस्वस्थ नवजात 
शिशुओं को निर्देशित 


करने की प्रक्रिया को 
समझना 


नवजात शिशु की 
सामान्य समस्याओं की 
रोकथाम, पहचान और 
प्रबंधन के बारे में मां 
और परिवार को शिक्षित 
करना 


शिशु और मां के लिए 
स्तनपान के फायदों पर 
चर्चा करना 

स्तन-दुग्ध की संरचना 
को समझना 

छ: माह तक केवल 
स्तनपान की सिफारिश 
पर चर्चा करना 

यह समझाना कि मां 
पहले स्तनपान में सफल 
होने में कैसे मदद करे 
और यह पहचानना कि 
बच्चा अच्छी त्तरह से 
स्तनपान कर रहा है या 
नहीं 


स्तन-दुग्ध निकालने 
और भंडारण के तरीके 
समझाना और प्रदर्शित 
करना 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


विषय 


निर्देशन 


नवजात शिशु के 
छोटे-मोटे विकार और 
उनका प्रबंधन 


नवजात शिशु की जांच 
संकट के संकेत और 
जोखिम का आंकलन 
आईएमएनसीआई 
प्रोटोकॉल के अनुसार 
जटिलताओं की पहचान, 
प्रबंधन और निर्देशन 
अभिलेखीकरण और 
रिकार्ड 


नवजात शिशु की सामान्य 
समस्याओं के प्रबंधन के 
बारे में मां और परिवार 
की स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 


नवजात शिशु की पोषण 
संबंधी आवश्यकताएं और 
स्तनपान की शुरुआत 


० रुूपंनपान 


स्तन-दुग्ध की संरचना 
नवजात शिशु और मां के 
लिए स्तनपान के फायदे 


स्तनपान प्रबंधन: स्तनपान 
तकनीक और स्थिति, 
स्तनपान के दौरान मां के 
लिए आराम और पोषण 


केवल स्तनपान 


स्तन-दुग्ध निकालना और 
भंडारण 

भूख के लक्षण 

स्तनपान के लिए सहायक 
वातावरण 

शिशु अनुकूल अस्पताल 
पहल (बीएफएचआई) 
दिशानिर्देश 


स्तनपान पर मां और 


45 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


० अनुपूरण 
० कार्यशालाएं 


०» ऑनलाइन 
व्याख्यान 


० शिक्षण और 
सामूहिक कार्य 


० रचनात्मक 
प्रश्नोत्तरी 


० योग्यता 
आधारित 
ओएससीई 


परिदृश्य 


अनुपूरण 
कार्यशालाएं 
० योगात्मक 
ऑनिलाइन परीक्षा 


व्याख्यान 


46 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


समय नि 5 lens शैक्षिक अध्ययन pou 
इकाई (घंटे) अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 
| ० कछनबक्‍लऋ 


टीकाकरण में प्रसाविका [रोग रोकथाम और ० शिक्षण और ० रचनात्मक 
मु की भूमिका को समझना |टीकाकरण सामूहिक कार्य प्रश्नोत्तरी 


० टीकाकरण ० परिदृश्य ० योगात्मक 


— —— अनुपूरण परीक्षा 
नवजात शिशु के ० टीकाकरण का महत्व ० अनुपूरण 


टीकाकरण में कौशल 


० वर्तमान टीकाकरण ० कार्यशालाएं 
प्रदर्शान करना 


कार्यक्रम पर परिवार को 


०» ऑनलाइन 
स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा 


व्याख्यान 


अनुभाग 4: महिलाओं तथा नवजात शिशुओं की जटिल देखभाल, स्वस्थ परिवार और समुदाय 


यह अनुभाग गर्भावस्‍था, प्रसव dea और जन्म तथा सूतिकावस्था के दौरान जटिल आवश्यकताओं 
वाली महिलाओं के लिए महिला और परिवार-केंद्रित, साक्ष्य-आधारित प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने 
और जोखिम वाले (कंप्रोमाइज्ड) नवजात शिशु के प्रबंधन में छात्रों की जानकारी और कौशल का विकास 
करेगा। यह आगे, छात्रों को प्राथमिक स्वास्थ्य में प्रसाविका की भूमिका की अच्छी समझ प्रदान करेगा और 
महिला व उसके परिवार के लिए सकारात्मक परिणामों को अनुकूलित करेगा। 

इसमें जोखिम आंकलन; प्राथमिकता निर्धारण, चिकित्सीय और प्रसूति संबंधी जटिलताओं और आपात 
स्थितियों में मिडवाइफरी प्रबंधन और देखभाल, कमजोर मातृ और /या नवजात शिशु के परिणाम या मृत्यु 
की स्थिति में मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास का प्रावधान; जटिल देखभाल के संबंध में कानून और नैतिकता; प्रभावी 
संचार, सहयोग, दलीय कार्य और निर्देशन; गर्भावस्‍था, प्रसव और प्रसवोत्तर अवधि की जटिलताओं, 
विकृतियों और असामान्य प्रस्तुतियों, सेफलो-पेल्विक असंतुलन (सीपीडी), समयपूर्व प्रसव वेदना, गर्भाशय 
की गतिविधि के विकारों के दौरान प्रौद्योगिकी का अनुप्रयोग और उपयोग; तीसरे चरण की जटिलताएं: 
प्रसूति संबंधी आपात स्थितियां, प्रसव dear को बढ़ाने वाली प्रसूति प्रक्रियाएं, बुनियादी जीवन-रक्षक 
कौशल - वयस्क सीपीआर; प्रसवोत्तर समस्याओं की पहचान और प्रबंधन; सामान्य से विचलन की पहचान, 
जच्चा ज्वर, जच्चा पूति, मूत्र संबंधी जटिलताएं, माध्यमिक प्रसवोत्तर रक्‍तस्राव, भग रक्‍तता, स्तन वृद्धि 
जिसमें स्तन सूजन/स्तन फोड़ा शामिल हैं, थोम्बोफ्लेबिटिस, डीवीटी, गर्भाशयी अनुजटिलता, वेसिको 
वेजिनल फिस्टुला (वीवीएफ), Yael वेजिनल फिस्टुला (आरवीएफ), प्रबंधन और निर्देशन के बारे में निर्णय 
लेना शामिल होंगे, लेकिन यहीं तक सीमित नहीं होंगे। 


नवजात शिशु की जटिल देखभाल पर सामग्री में भारत में नवजात शिशु मत्यु दर और प्रमुख कारण, 
जटिल आवश्यकताओं वाले नवजात शिशु की देखभाल योजना और मिडवाइफरी प्रबंधन, प्रौद्योगिकी का 
उपयोग; जोखिम वाले (कंप्रोमाइज्ड) नवजात शिशु के प्रबंधन में परिवार केंद्रित देखभाल को शामिल 
करना; मृत जन्म और नवजात शिशु मृत्यु देखभाल, भारत में नवजात शिशु देखभाल के मॉडल — 
एनबीसीसी, एसएनसीयू, एनआईसीयू शामिल होंगे, लेकिन यह इन्हीं तक सीमित नहीं eft स्थितियों के 
प्रबंधन में समयपूर्वता, जन्म श्वासावरोध, नवजात शिशु रोगाणुता, अल्पताप, श्वसन संबंधी संकट, 
अल्प-ऑक्सीयता और श्वासावरोध, पीलिया, नवजात शिशु संक्रमण, तेज बुखार, ऐंठन, नवजात शिशु 
टेटनस, जन्म के समय कम वजन, जन्मजात विसंगतियां, रक्‍तस्रावी बीमारियां, जन्म के समय की चोट, 
घरेलू नवजात शिशु देखभाल कार्यक्रम — नवजात शिशु देखभाल में सामुदायिक समायोजनों का 
एकीकरण, तरल आवश्यकताओं की गणना, ईबीएम / फॉर्मूला फीड / ट्यूब फीडिंग, शोक संतप्त परिवारों 
की देखभाल, प्रबंधन और निर्देशन के बारे में साझा निर्णय लेना, नवजात शिशु रोगों का एकीकृत प्रबंधन 
(आईएमएनसीआई) शामिल होंगे। 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 47 


इस अनुभाग में स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन; रोग प्रतिरक्षण; संतुलित परामर्श रणनीति (बीसीएस), सांस्कृतिक 
मानदंडों और सांस्कृतिक क्षमता का उपयोग करके परिवार नियोजन और परिवार नियोजन परामर्श; 
सामुदायिक जानकारी और समझ; मातृत्व देखभाल में पुरुषों की भागीदारी; प्रजनन स्वास्थ्य और अधिकार; 
किशोर गर्भावस्‍था; अनपेक्षित गर्भावस्‍था; गर्भपात के बाद की देखभाल; महिलाओं और प्रसाविकाओं के 
अधिकारों का आईसीएम विधेयक भी शामिल होंगे। देखभाल में जल्दी / बार-बार गर्भधारण का प्रभाव, 
एमटीपी अधिनियम, एमटीपी के तरीके, गर्भपात के बाद परिवार नियोजन के तरीके, अन्य स्वास्थ्य 
कार्यकर्ताओं के साथ सहयोग, भारत सरकार की सामाजिक कल्याण योजनाएं शामिल होंगे। 
अनुभाग 4: अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 22 घंटे, कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 46 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 300 घंटे 
समय | अध्ययन के विषय शैक्षिक अध्ययन कक 
इकाई (घंटे) नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 
I | cee |मिडवाइफरी गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान परिचर्चा और je उच्च ० निबंध, 
समस्याओं की पहचान और अनुभवात्मक | जोखिम संक्षिप्त 
प्रबंधन प्रज्ञता वाली उत्तर और 
निम्नलिखित की समीक्षा बेडसाइड — के | एमसीक्यू 
evo जोखिम वाली क्लीनिक आंकलन, : ओएससीई 
गर्भावस्‍था प्रदर्शन जांच और | मामले के 
" प्राथमिकता निर्धारण और मामले की प्रबंध पर पर 
जोखिम स्तरीकरण प्रस्तुति और | लेखन ai 


परिततों कप प्रस्तुति का 
परिचर्चा ० स्वास्थ्य मूल्यांकन 


« भ्रूण निगरानी करना और 
उसकी व्याख्या करना अनुपूरण शिक्षा 
(सीटीजी / एनएसटी) लत योजना 

० गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान बाद देखभाल * मामले की 
जटिलताओं की समीक्षा और उच्च अध्ययन 
(परिभाषा, कारण, संकेत रक्तचाप ue | योजना और 
और लक्षण, निदान, प्रबंधन | सेफ डिलीवरी|[ प्रतिवेदन 


और जटिलताएं) ऐप मॉड्यूल 
० गर्भावस्‍था के प्रारंभिक प्रसवपूर्व 
चरण में Yada: वार्ड / 

ओपीडी / 

प्रसूति 

४ अस्थानिक गर्भावस्‍था आईयूसी में 

“४ अतिसार RAT / तिल पर्यवेक्षित 
नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 


v गर्भपात 


० गर्भावस्‍था के अंतिम चरण 
में Yada: 
४ प्रसवपूर्व रक्‍्तस्राव — 
नाल का cal, नाल 
का फटना 


० हाइपरमेसिस ग्रेविडियम 


० गर्भावस्‍था प्रेरित उच्च 
रक्तचाप 


46 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


इकाई ne aes ® विषय a निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 
४ प्रसवाक्षेप पूर्व 
४ प्रसवाक्षेप 

० अपवर्त्य गर्भावस्‍था 

० ओलिगोहाइड्रेमनिओस 

० पॉलीहाइड्रेमनिओस 

० गर्भावस्‍था में चिकित्सीय 
स्थितियां 
४ गर्भावस्‍था में एनीमिया 
४ गर्भावधि मधुमेह मेलिटस 
४ हृदय रोग 
४ फफ्फ्सीय रोग 
४ थायरोटॉक्सिकोसिस 
४ यौन संचारित रोग 
४ एचआईवी / एड्स 
४ आरएच असंगति 

० गर्भावस्‍था में संक्रमण - 
मूत्र पथ संक्रमण, 
बैक्टीरियल, वायरल, 
प्रोटोजोअल, फंगल 


० अंतर्गर्भाशयी विकास 
प्रतिबंध 

० अंतर्गर्भाशयी भ्रूण मृत्यु 

० गर्भावस्‍था को जटिल 
बनाने वाले GRA संबंधी 
विकार 

० किशोर गर्भावस्‍था 


० बुजुर्ग प्राइमी ग्रेविडा और 
ग्रैंड मल्टीपारा 


० प्रोटोकॉल के अनुसार 
स्थितियों का प्रबंधन 


० प्रबंधन और निर्देशन के 
लिए निर्णय लेना 

० निर्देशन सेवाओं के लिए 
नीति 

० गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान 
समस्याओं के प्रबंधन में 


[ATT Iii—ave 4] 


अध्ययन के 
नतीजे 


समय विषय 
इकाई (घंटे) विषय 


ener 


I 


प्रबंधन 
निम्नलिखित की समीक्षा 


» समयपूर्व प्रसव वेदना: 
समयपूव प्रसव वेदना की 
रोकथाम और प्रबंधन; 
(समयपूर्व प्रसव वेदना में 
प्रसवपूर्व कॉर्टिकोस्टेरॉयड 
का उपयोग) 

«० झिल्ली का समय से पहले 
ट्टना 


zie गलत स्थिति और असामान्य 
प्रस्तुतियां (fra, ale, 
चेहरा) 


० सेफालोपेल्विक डिसप्रोपोर्शन 
(सीपीडी) 


० गर्भाशय क्रिया के विकार 
० लंबे समय तक प्रसव 
वदना 
० शीघ्र प्रसव वेदना 
० अक्रियाशील प्रसव वेदना 
ओ तीसरे चरण की जटिलताएं: 
० प्रतिधारित गर्भनाल 


० जन्म नलिका में चोट 
लगना 

० प्रसवोत्तर रक्‍तस्राव 
(गर्भाशय का द्विअर्थी 
संपीड़न, महाधमनी 
संपीड़न, गर्भाशय गुब्बारा 
टैम्पोनैड) 


० प्रसूति संबंधी आपात 
स्थितियां 


० गर्भाशय का फट जाना 


० प्रसूति संबंधी सदमा 
० एमनियोटिक द्रव 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
गतिविधियां 


अनुभवात्मक 
प्रज्ञता 

eds साइड 
क्लीनिक 

० प्रदर्शन 

० स्व-निर्दे शित 
अध्ययन 

० सेमिनार 

० मामले पर 
परिचर्चा 


49 


निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 


योजना और 
प्रतिवेदन 
अनुपूरण 
पीपीएच पर 


ओएसपीई 
० मामले के 


अध्ययन का 
आंकलन 


दीर्घकालीन 
प्रसव 
प्रसव कक्ष / 
आपातकाली 
न प्रसूति / 
प्रसूति 
आईयूसी, 
ऑपरेशन 
थिएटर में 
पर्यवेक्षित 
नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 

० परिदृश्य 
आधारित 
अध्ययन 


50 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


समय | अध्ययन के — शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
(घंटे) नतीजे गतिविधियां 
एम्बोलिज्म 
० भ्रूण सकट 
० कॉर्ड प्रोलैप्स 
० कंधे का डिस्टोसिया 


० गर्भाशय का उलटा होना 


इकाई निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 


० वासा प्रीविया 


« सूचित सहमति से भगछेदन 
और टांके लगाना (WHT, 


संकेत आदि) 
० प्रसूति संबंधी प्रक्रियाएं 
०संदंश प्रसव 
० वैक्यूम प्रसव 
eel को हाथ से हटाना 
० प्रसव वेदना का प्रेरण 


० शल्य जननः संकेत और 
तैयारी 


il 


टी--4 भमिडवाइफरी [प्रसवोत्तर समस्याओं की ० परिचर्चा और |e स्वास्थ्य ० निबंध, 
पहचान एवं प्रबंधन अनुभवात्मक | परिचर्चा की | संक्षिप्त 
Saha aay प्रज्ञता तैयारी उत्तर और 
० बेडसाइड ० नेदानिक एमसीक्यू 
क्लीनिक प्रस्तुति — |e प्रक्रिया जांच 
योजना एवं 
० = hong a प्रतिवेदन 
हक Paes ० स्व-निर्दे शित 
अध्ययन 
० सेमिनार 


० मामले पर 
० मूत्र संबंधी जटिलताएं परिचर्चा 


० शारीरिक परीक्षण, सामान्य 
से विचलन की पहचान 


० प्यूपरल पायरेक्सिया 
० प्यूपररल सेप्सिस 


० माध्यमिक प्रसवोत्तर «लो लिए 
रक्‍तस्राव वार्ड / 

० वल्वाल हेमेटोमा प्रसवोत्तर 

ओपीडी / 

आपातकाली 

न प्रसूति / 


० स्तन का बढ़ना जिसमें 
स्तन में सूजन / स्तन में 
wie pot i में ऑपरेशन 
समस्या शामिल थिएटर में 


० थ्रोम्बोफ्लिबिटिस पर्यवेक्षित 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5] 


a समय | अध्ययन के as शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
(घंटे) नतीजे गतिविधियां 


० डीवीटी 


० गर्भाशयी अनुजटिलता 


० वेसिको वेजिनल फिस्टुला 
(वीवीएफ) 


० रेकक्‍्टो वेजिनल फिस्टुला 
(आरवीएफ) 


निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 


निर्णय लेन 
O प्रसवोत्तर का अभ्यास 


उदासी / मनोविकृति करने के 


० प्रबंधन और निर्देशन के बारे लिए विभिन्‍न 
में निर्णय लेना प्रकार के 


e दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार el : 
नैदानिक प्रक्रियाएं अनुपूरण 
परिदृश्यों पर 


नवजात शिशु समस्याओं की |e परिचर्चा और |e 
पहचान Vd प्रबंधन अनुभवात्मक 
० भारत में नवजात शिशु मृत्यु, 7 
दर और प्रमुख कारण प्रदर्शन 
* भारत में नवजात शिशु ० स्व-निर्देशित 
देखभाल के मॉडल - अध्ययन 
एनबीसीसी गाज हु एम ७ ह हा एसएनसीयू THAT. 
; एसएनसीयू >सेमियार 
e उच्च जोखिम वाले नवजात 


शिशु की जांच le 


परिचर्चा 
e नवजात शिशुओं को 


«० नवजात शिशु 
प्रभावित करने वाली के 


स्थितियों और उनके Saas 7 - 
परिणामों की समी: नवजात शिशु आकलन 
परिणामों की समीक्षा cama शेर aes 
«० समयपूर्वता सेफ डिलीवरी ओएसपीई 
ऐप वीडियो 
और जन्म के 
० कंगारू जैसी मातृत्व समय कम 
देखभाल वजन वाले 
« जन्म के समय श्वासावरोध /| गॉड्यूल 
हाइपोक्सिक एन्सेफेलोपैथी | एनआईसीयू » 
पीएन वार्ड / 
वेल बेबी 


० जन्म के समय कम वजन 


क्लिनिक में 
पर्यवेक्षित 
नैदानिक 


52 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


समय =| अध्ययन के — शैक्षिक अध्ययन न 
इकाई (घंटे) नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 


e पीलिया 


«० नवजात शिशु संक्रमण 


edu बुखार 


० ऐंठन 

० नियोनटोरम टेटनस 

* जन्मजात विसंगतियां 

० रक्‍तस्रावी रोग 

oy के समय की चोट 


०» एसआईडीएस (अचानक 
शिशु मृत्यु सिंड्रोम) की 
रोकथाम, संदेवदनशील 
देखभाल 

० द्रव आवश्यकताओं की 
गणना, ईबीएम / फार्मूला 
फीड / ट्यूब फीडिंग 


* घरेलू नवजात शिशु 
देखभाल कार्यक्रम - 
नवजात शिशु देखभाल में 
सामुदायिक समायोजन का 
एकीकरण 

eee ० प्रबंधन और निर्देशन के बारे 
परामर्श की | में निर्णय लेना 

«० नवजात शिशु रोगों का 
एकीकृत प्रबंधन 
(आईएमएनसीआई) 


० शोक परामर्श 


स्वस्थ परिवार और समुदाय 
० स्वास्थ्य संवर्धन और रोग | लक हक 
aaa प्रज्ञता प्रतिवेदन 
ह तैयार करना 
«० सामाजिक और सांस्कृतिक 
मानदंड और क्षमता 


० मातृत्व देखभाल में पिता 
भागीदारी 


e परिवार कल्याण सेवाएं 
० योजनाबद्ध पितृत्व 
० जल्दी / बार-बार गर्भधारण 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 53 


समय | अध्ययन के as शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
विषय 


इकाई (घंटे) नतीजे गतिविधियां निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 


का प्रभाव ० पीएन वार्ड / 
० परिवार नियोजन विधियों saa ae 
की व्यापक श्रृंखला सम / 
एफपी 
४ विभिन्‍न परिवार नियोजन वार्ड / 
विधियों के उपयोग के | एचएससी में | पीएचसी / 
लिए कार्रवाई, सीएचसी / 
प्रभावशीलता, फायदे, एचएससी में 
नुकसान, मिथक, गलत पर्यवेक्षित 
धारणा और चिकित्सा नैदानिक 
पात्रता मानदंड (एमईसी) अभ्यास 
० आपातकालीन गर्भ ० दंपत्ति को 
निरोधक परिवार 
० संतुलित परामर्श रणनीति नियोजन 
(बीसीएस) का उपयोग Mat IS 
करके परिवार नियोजन परामर्श 
परामर्श 


० अनुवर्ती कार्रवाई का 
महत्व और अनुशंसित 
समय 


० अनपेक्षित या गलत समय 
पर गर्भधारण 

० गर्भपात के बाद परामर्श 

० अन्य स्वास्थ्य कार्यकर्ताओं 
(विशेषकर आशा और 
एएनएम) के साथ सहयोग 

० परिवार नियोजन 

प्रदान करना। कार्यक्रम/ परिवार 

कल्याण सेवाओं में 
एनपीएम की भूमिका 


अनुभाग 5: फार्माकोलॉजी, संक्रमण नियंत्रण और कानूनी व नैतिक मुद्दे 


यह अनुभाग महिला, भ्रूण और नवजात शिशु के लिए सुरक्षित अभ्यास सुनिश्चित करने के लिए छात्रों 
के फार्माकोलॉजी के ज्ञान और समझ को गहरा करेगा। 


सामग्री में फार्माकोकाइनेटिक्स; फार्माकोडायनेमिक्स; औषधियों का गुणवत्तापूर्ण उपयोग, आपातकालीन 
और जटिल देखभाल में औषधीय चिकित्सा; औषधि वर्गीकरण और कानून के साथ-साथ पर्यावरणीय 
खतरे और टेराटोजेन शामिल होंगे लेकिन इन्हीं तक सीमित नहीं होंगे। पूरक उपचार और अनुपूरण। 
नैतिक और पेशेवर आचरण संहिता, न्यायिक कानून (गर्भपात के संबंध में कानून सहित), स्थानीय नीति 
और दिशानिर्देश, शिष्ट व्यवहार, मानवाधिकार, मानवीय जन्म, स्वायत्तता और साझा निर्णय लेना, 
गोपनीयता और निजता सहित मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास की कानूनी, नियामक और नैतिक रूपरेखा और 
आवश्यकताएं। यह छात्रों को मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल सुविधाओं में संक्रमण की रोकथाम और 
नियंत्रण उपायों पर कौशल विकसित करने में भी सहायता करेगा। 


54 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


अनुभाग 5: अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 


सैद्धांतिक (टी): 24 घंटे और कौशल प्रयोगशाला (एसएल): 2 घंटे 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन लि 
गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 
एप्लाइड फार्माकोलॉजी और औषधि '# व्याख्यान e औषधि 
लेखन के बुनियादी सिद्धांत ० परिचर्चा और खुराक की 
० प्रसूति विज्ञान में माताओं और अनुभवात्मक कक 
नवजात शिशुओं के लिए उपयोग | प्रज्ञता e औषधि 
लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली औषधियां अध्ययन / 
की जाने वाली ० स्व-निर्देशित cath अध्ययन का 
औषधियों की वर्गीकरण अध्ययन पद विश्लेषण 
फार्माकोलॉजी कार्रवाई की प्रणाली ० साहित्यिक हु ef e औषधि 
की व्याख्या खुराक समीक्षा - कानून a प्रस्तुति और 
करना और विनियम, |e मामले के मामले का 
उपयोग नर्स द्वारा औषधि | अध्ययन का | प्रतिवदन 
ध्यभाव निर्धारण अभ्यास | विश्लेषण 
चुनौतियों दुष्प्रभाव 
चुनौतियों को के रुझान और परिचर्चा 


पहचानना और je एनपीएम की भूमिका - महिला 

सहयोग को और परिवार को सलाह (औषधि (९ गीपू-नवजात 
लेते समय विशेष सावधानियों के | शिशा क्षेत्रों में 
साथ) एकीकृत नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 


e औषधि लेखन 


औषधियों का टेराटोजेनिक प्रभाव 

गर्भावस्‍था जोखिम श्रेणी के आधार 

पर औषधियों का वर्गीकरण 

अभिलेखीकरण: सटीक और संपूर्ण 

अभिलेख 

औषधि लेखन के मूल सिद्धांत 

० औषधि लेखन के सिद्धांत और 
इसे प्रभावित करने वाले कारक 

० औषधि लेखन की प्रक्रिया और 
चरण 

० औषधि लेखन दक्षताएं 

नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स की अनुदेशात्मक 

भूमिका (राष्ट्रीय एवं अंतर्राष्ट्रीय) 

औषधि लेखन अभ्यास से संबंधित 

व्यावसायिक, कानूनी व नैतिक मुद्दे 

औषधि लेखन से संबंधित गलत 

प्रथाओं के पहलू (मामले के 

अध्ययनों का उपयोग करके) 


प्रोटोकॉल के अनुसार औषधि 
लेखन (राष्ट्रीय दिशानिर्देश और 
विनियम - परिषद्‌ / 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 55 


समय अध्ययन के शैक्षिक अध्ययन ae 
इकाई (घंटे) नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू) 
उन औषधियों की सूची fore 
भारत सरकार के अनुमोदन के 


प्रोटोकॉल के See Saree 
अनुसार us न : शनर द्वारा दिया 
महिलाओं के 52320 05 
लिए अनुमत 
औषधि लेखन 
I संक्रमण संक्रमण नियंत्रण ० परिचर्चा और ० राष्ट्रीय e ओएससीई / 
नियंत्रण राष्ट्रीय दिशानिर्देश और संस्थागत | SST दिशानिर्देशों | ओएसपीई 
नीतियों की नीति प्रज्ञता पर नोट्स 
व्याख्या करना fee की समीक्षा 
संक्रमण रोकथाम के सिद्धांत करना 
| संक्रमण रोकथाम के लिए मानक |” Seat Seta नैदानिक 
संक्रमण सावधाियाँ का उपयोग करते a 
नियंत्रण प्रथाओं हुए प्रदर्शन eee 
on हाथ धोना लाभ उठाना 
or ० कौशल प्रदर्शन — 
प्रदर्शित करना सुरक्षात्मक वस्त्रों का उपयोग | विशेषज्ञ आईपी 
प्रयुक्त वस्तुओं / उपकरणों का | WR तक पहुचने 
प्रसंस्करण के लिए संक्रमण 
अभ्यास 
धारदार उपकरणों का उचित 
| रख-रखाव और निपटान * वीडियो 
संक्रमण aes 
रोकथाम में स्वच्छ वातावरण बनाए रखना |* नैदानिक अभ्यास 
एनपीएम और बायोमेडिकल अपशिष्ट निपटान * Pera 
स्वास्थ्य दल | दा अध्ययन 
की भूमिका का राष्ट्रीय संक्रमण नियंत्रण 
कम आज दिशानिर्देश eared] पर सेफ 
डिलीवरी ऐप 
और प्रतिबिंबित je संक्रमण की रोकथाम / नियंत्रण में मॉड्यूल 
करना एनपीएम एवं स्वास्थ्य दल की 
भूमिका 
Il आचार संहिता feral और नैतिक मुद्दे ० परिचर्चा और प्रस्तुति — |e निबंध, 
और ० राष्ट्रीय स्वास्थ्य नीति 2047 सहित | FST मिडवाइफरी | संक्षिप्त उत्तर 
मिडवाइफरी चिकित्सा पद्धति के लिए राष्ट्रीय. | “जता कार्य में और 
अभ्यास के कानूनी ढांचा ० परिदृश्य नैतिक और | एमसीक्यू 
विभिन्‍न कानूनी कानूनी मुद्दे 
पहलुओं को आईएमएनसी अधिनियम 
ARAT करना Je परिषद्‌ /आईसीएम आचार संहिता 
और इसके पहलू 
मिडवाइफरी मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए 
अभ्यास को अभ्यास मानक और इसका 


नियंत्रित करने | औचित्य 
वाले प्रमुख 


56 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SECc.4] 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 


गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


० नीतियां और प्रक्रियाएं 

० स्थायी आदेश और प्रोटोकॉल 
स्थापित करना 

० सूचित सहमति 

मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास का कानूनी 

ढांचा और इसके पहलू 

मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु देखभाल 

में नैतिक मुद्दे 


दत्तक-विधि, एमटीपी अधिनियम, 
प्रसवपूर्व नैदानिक परीक्षण 
(पीएनडीटी) अधिनियम, सरोगेट 
माताएं 


एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू के राष्ट्रीय 
एमएनएच दिशानिर्देशों का दायरा 
और विशिष्टताएं 


पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल LI: 
प्रसाविकाओं को गुणवत्तापरक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल कार्य, प्रबंधन और पर्यवेक्षण करने के लिए तैयार करना 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे; नैदानिक (सीएल): 20 घंटे 
पाठ्यक्रम का लक्ष्य 


एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक गुणवत्तापूर्ण मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा और अभ्यास के प्रावधान के लिए नेतृत्व, पर्यवेक्षण 
और प्रबंधन कौशल का प्रदर्शन करेंगे | 


पाठ्यक्रम विवरण 


यह मॉड्यूल एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को नेतृत्व, पर्यवेक्षण और प्रबंधन के सिद्धांतों की समझ विकसित 
करने में सक्षम बनाने के लिए तैयार किया गया है। यह एमएलसीयू के प्रबंधन, एमएनएच सेवाओं की 
गुणवत्ता आश्वासन और निरंतर व्यावसायिक विकास पर भी ध्यान केंद्रित करता है। 


पाठ्यक्रम के उद्देश्य 
4. मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए नेतृत्व, पर्यवेक्षण, प्रबंधन और समर्थन के महत्व का वर्णन करना। 


2. वर्तमान मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास की जानकारी तथा कौशल का प्रदर्शन करना और सतत व्यावसायिक 
विकास की भूमिका पहचानना। 


दक्षताएं (डब्ल्यूएचओ शिक्षक दक्षताएं) 
4. पदस्थापन के बाद एनपीएम को सुविधा-आधारित परामर्श प्रदान करना। (6.3) 


2. विविध देखभाल वितरण समायोजनों में विभिन्‍न तरीकों का उपयाग करके प्रभावी संचार प्रदर्शित 
PAT | (7.4) 


3. पाठ्यक्रम रूपरेखा तथा विकास और शिक्षण व मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में सांस्कृतिक क्षमता प्रदर्शित 
करना। (7.2) 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


37 


4. मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा तथा अभ्यास में सुधार के लिए अग्रणी और परिवर्तन एजेंटों के रूप में कार्य 


करना। (7.3) 


5. मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा और अभ्यास को बढ़ावा देने के लिए विभिन्‍न प्रकार की प्रतिपालन रणनीतियों का 


उपयोग करना। (7.4) 


6. मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा से संबंधित व्यावसायिक विकास गतिविधियों में भाग लेना। (7.5) 


अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 20 घंटे 


समय शैक्षिक अध्ययन ; 
इकाई |. अध्ययन के नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य [आंकलन विधि 
(घंटे) गतिविधियां 
टी--4 समकालीन नेतृत्व की|मिडवाइफरी नेतृत्व शिक्षण, ० सारांशात्मक 
सीएल-5 [*सझि प्रदर्शित करना | नेतृत्व aie शैलियां सामूहिक कार्य ae 
प्रभावी दल निर्माण और| (परिवर्तनकारी नेतृत्व) परिदृश्य हि ॒ 
= area सामुदायिक 
बातचीत ot को व्यक्तित्व शैलियां आधारित ae 
रेखांकित करने वाले अध्ययन a 
तत्वों की पहचान करना |* Wa ब्रिग्स व्यक्तित्व शैली ss यो 
ऑनलाइन 
सामुदायिक दल निर्माण, बातचीत संसाधन 
हर एज. हर हा e विवाद समाधान व्यक्तित्व 
प्रतिक्रिया ए त्तरी 
संचार प्रश्नो 
रणनीतियों की पहचान ie eae 
करना आपातकालीन प्रतिक्रिया, 
सामुदायिक विकास 
टी-4 [बदलाव के प्रमुखबदलाव का सिद्धांत और/ शिक्षण, 
divas सिद्धांतों की पहचान॑|परिवर्तनकारी अभ्यास सामूहिक कार्य 
करना ee ee परिदृश्य सारांशात्मक 
आधारित ais 
e परिवर्तन के एजेंट 
नंकारीं अध्ययन 
परिवर्त e परिवर्तनकारी देखभाल है 
मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास की ऑनलाइन 
व्याख्या करेना ates 
टी-4. |एमएलसीयू सहित[प्रबंधन जिसमें एमएलसीयू ole परिचर्चा और/# अभ्यास/ 
साले विभिन्‍न स्वास्थ्य प्रबंधन शामिल है अनुभवात्मक 
—5 


देखभाल समायोजनों में 
मातृ एवं नवजात शिशु 
देखभाल के प्रबंधन और 
पर्यवेक्षण में एनपीएम की 
भूमिका की व्याख्या 
करना 


० प्रबंधन 
परिभाषा, सिद्धांत व तत्व 
एमएलसीयू का 
सामग्री और 
प्रबंधन 
दल प्रबंधन 
० सामग्री प्रबंधन — उपकरण 
और आपूर्ति 


प्रज्ञता 
परिदृश्य 


मामले 
अध्ययन 


भूमिका निर्वहन 


अवलोकन 


36 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


इकाई ae अध्ययन के नतीजे 
(घंटे) 
मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा और 
एमएलसीसी को बढ़ावा 
देने के लिए समर्थन 
कौशल और सांस्कृतिक 
क्षमता का उपयोग करना 
IV  (टी--3 
tans विभिन्‍न प्रकार के 


अभिलेख और प्रतिवेदन 
का वर्णन व उपयोग 
करना और उनके महत्व 


प्रसाविकाओं की भूमिका 
के आधार पर नैदानिक 
परीक्षण करना 


प्रसाविकीय देखभाल में।अभिलेख और प्रतिवेदन 


विषय 


पर्यवेक्षण 


० पर्यवेक्षण की परिभाषा, 
उद्देश्य और प्रकार 


० परामर्श - एनपीएम के 
सुविधा 


लिए 
परामर्श 


आधारित 


गुणवत्ता आश्वासन 


० नर्सिंग और मिडवाइफरी 


परीक्षण 
० एमएनएच सेवाओं 
गुणवत्ता आश्वासन 


का 


मिडवइफरी प्रशिक्षण 
गुणवत्ता आश्वासन 


का 


पक्ष-समर्थन 


० परिभाषा, सिद्धांत, 
पक्ष-समर्थन का प्रकार/ 
स्तर, प्रसाविकाओं के लिए 
पक्ष-समर्थन कौशल 


e अभिलेख रखने का महत्व 


e एमएलसीयू में रखे जाने वाले 
विभिन्‍न अभिलेख और 
प्रतिवेदन प्रारूप 


अभिलेख भंडारण प्रणालियां 
अभिलेखों की पुनर्प्राष्ति 
ई-रिकॉर्ड 


नैदानिक परीक्षण में 


प्रसाविकाओं की भूमिका — 
एमपीडीएसआर; नवजात शिशु 


मृत्यु परीक्षण; शल्य-प्रसव 
परीक्षण; मातृ एवं नवजात 
शिशु सेवा परीक्षण 

नियमित 


प्रतिवेदन 
उपयोगिता 


अभिलेख और 
की व्यावहारिक 


सुरक्षित प्रसव जांचसूची 
सहित एमएनएच के लिए 


शैक्षिक 
गतिविधियां 


अध्ययन 
निहित कार्य |आंकलन विधि 


अनुभवात्मक 
प्रज्ञता 
संगोष्ठी 


एमएनएच क्ष्षेत्र 


अभिविन्यास 
dread / 
सीएचसी / 
एचएससी / 
डीएच / 
एमसीएच में 
पर्यवेक्षित 
नैदानिक 
अभ्यास 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 59 


निहित कार्य आंकलन विधि 


एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू. नैदानिक 
केश शीट 

संकतकों के संदर्भ में विवरण 
समीक्षा और प्रत्तिवेदन में 
एनपीएम की भूमिका और 
प्रदान की जाने वाली 
देखभाल को केसे प्रभावित 
करते हैं पर चर्चा 


पाठ्यक्रम मॉड्यूल IV: 
प्रसाविकाआं को साक्ष्य-आधारित मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए तैयार करना 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे; नैदानिक (सीएल): 20 घंटे 
पाठ्यक्रम का लक्ष्य 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में साक्ष्य की पहचान करेगा और उसका उपयोग करेगा। 
पाठ्यक्रम विवरण 


यह मॉड्यूल एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को दैनिक प्रसाविकीय कार्य में शोध प्रक्रिया और साक्ष्य के उपयोग 
की समझ विकसित करने में सक्षम बनाने के लिए तैयार किया गया है। 


पाठ्यक्रम के उद्देश्य 

4. साक्ष्य के आधार पर प्रभावी अध्ययन और शिक्षण अभ्यास तथा संसाधनों का विकास करना। 

2. मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास का गंभीर विश्लेषण करने और बढ़ाने के लिए आंकलन और निर्धारण विवरण का 
उपयोग करना | 

3. शिक्षा में गुणवत्ता संकेतकों की समझ प्रदर्शित करना और वे मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास से केसे संबंधित हैं। 

दक्षताएं (डब्ल्यूएचओ शिक्षक दक्षताएं) 

4. शोध का उपयोग करना और शिक्षण एवं अभ्यास को सूचित करना। (8.4) 


2. आलोचनात्मक पूछताछ और साक्ष्य-आधारित अभ्यास का समर्थन करने वाली संस्कृति विकसित 
करना। (8.2) 


3. एनपीएम को शोध संचालित करने, संचार करने और उपयोग करने के कौशल विकसित करने के लिए 
प्रशिक्षित करना। (8.3) 


अध्य्यन विषयवस्तु 
सैद्धांतिक (टी): 45 घंटे और नैदानिक (सीएल): 20 घंटे 


समय अध्ययन के शैक्षिक अध्ययन ene 
इकाई (घंटे) नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 
U टी--45 शोध व साक्ष्य की जानकारी और je परिचर्चा और |» एमएनएच |e निबंध/ 


उपयोग अनुभवात्मक देखभाल संक्षिप्त उत्तर 


सीएल-20 
प्रज्ञता पर और 


- गुणात्मक व मात्रात्मक शोध 
शोध प्रक्रिया का |“ पोर्टफोलियो साहित्यिक | एमसीक्यू 


60 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SECc.4] 


शैक्षिक अध्ययन 
गतिविधियां 


अध्ययन के 
नतीजे 


समय 


(घंटे) विषय 


इकाई निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 


वर्णन करना, 
मात्रात्मक और 
गुणात्मक तरीके 


मातृत्व देखभाल 
में सर्वोत्तम 
प्रथाओं के संदर्भ 
में साक्ष्य के मूल्य 
पर चर्चा करना 


शैक्षणिक 
अखंडता सिद्धांतों 
के अनुप्रयोग को 
प्रदर्शित करना 
और प्रासंगिकता 
का सही उपयोग 
करना 


साहित्यिक 
समीक्षा और 
मिडवाइफरी 
अभ्यास के लिए 


साक्ष्य की पहचान 
करना और 
उनका उपयोग 


गुणात्मक व मात्रात्मक शोध 
प्रतिमानों का अवलोकन 


मात्रात्मक व गुणात्मक शोध में 
शोध प्रश्न 


शोध दृष्टिकोण व डिजाइन 
कार्यप्रणाली 
० नमूनाकरण 


० आंकड़ों का संग्रहण - 
उपकरण और तकनीकें 


आंकड़ों का विश्लेषण और 
विवेचन 


संचार, प्रसार और शोध का 
उपयोग - शैक्षणिक अखंडता, 
सही संदर्भ 

शोध समालोचना 

साहित्य खोज रणनीतियां - 
प्रासंगिक साहित्य का चयन 
महत्वपूर्ण मूल्यांकन, विश्लेषण 
और संश्लेषण 

साहित्यिक समीक्षा लेखन 
सांख्यिकी 

आंकड़ों के स्रोत और प्रस्तुति 


सांख्यिकीय पैकेज और उसका 


अनुप्रयोग 


प्रतिबिंबित 
गतिविधियां 
और निर्धारित 
मॉड्यूल 

कार्य क्षेत्र पर 
आधारित शोध 
अध्ययन (जैसे, 
डब्ल्यूएचओ 
इंट्रापार्टम 
सिफारिशें या 
लक्ष्य संकेतक) 


ईबीएमपी - 
जर्नल क्लब 
(मिडवाइफरी 
अभ्यास पर 
साक्ष्य की 
परिचर्चा) 


e निहित कार्य 
का आंकलन 
पूरा किए गए 
शोध अध्ययन 
का आंकलन 


० शोध प्रस्ताव तैयार करना 


साक्ष्य आधारित मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास 


० आंकड़ों /साक्ष्य क अनुशंसित 
ala - सुविधा / जिला / राज्य — 
उपलब्ध रजिस्टर, एचएमआईएस, 
डीएलएचएस, भारतीय - 
एनएफएचएस, आरएचएस, 
एसआरएस, एचएमआईएस, 
डीएलएचएस, एएचएस, 
जनगणना, एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू 
भारत सरकार के दिशानिर्देश 


शोध साहित्य का 
विश्लेषण और 
संश्लेषण करना 


साक्ष्य के विभिन्‍न 


वैश्विक मानक - डब्ल्यूएचओ 
स्तरों की समझ हक 


सिफारिशें; आईसीएम सिफारिशें; 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 6l 


समय अध्ययन के शैक्षिक अध्ययन ee 
इकाई (घंटे) नतीजे विषय गतिविधियां निहित कार्य | आंकलन विधि 
प्रदर्शित करना कानक्रेन; स्टेट ऑफ वर्ल्ड 
मिडवाइफरी 


ee साहस प्रसाविकीय कार्य में शोध 


न प्राथमिकताएं 

व्याख्या करना स्वास्थ्य सेवाओं में सुधार के 
लिए सुविधा आंकड़ों का 
उपयोग; स्वास्थ्य परिणाम 


43. संरचित परामर्श 


शैक्षणिक क्षमताओं को विकसित करने के साथ-साथ यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए कि नैदानिक कौशल 
अद्यतन हैं, नैदानिक आवासीय कार्यक्रम 6 माह की अवधि का है। 42 माह की मेंटरशिप और पोर्टफोलियो 
दृष्टिकोण को एकीकृत करके इसे और अधिक प्रभावी बनाया जा सकता है, जिसे आवासीय कार्यक्रम के विस्तार के 
रूप में देखा गया है। 


पोर्टफोलियो अनुभवों और प्रतिबिंबन का एक संग्रह है जिसे छात्र मेंटरशिप अवधि के दौरान एकत्रित करता है 
और इसमें देखभाल के अनुभवों की निरंतरता शामिल हाती है और अध्ययन व मूल्यांकन के लिए 
योग्यता-आधारित दृष्टिकोण प्रदान करता है। पोर्टफोलियो अध्ययन को प्रासंगिक बनाकर इसे सैद्धांतिक और 
व्यावहारिक से जोड़ते हुए अध्ययन और क्षमता का प्रमाण प्रदान करता है। छात्रों को अपने नैदानिक अभ्यास 
अनुभव के लिए अध्ययन आवश्यकताओं और उद्दश्यों की पहचान करके अपनी अध्ययन योजना विकसित करने की 
आवश्यकता होती है। पोर्टफोलियो छात्र को स्व-निर्देशित अध्ययन और आलोचनात्मक प्रतिबिबन विकसित करने में 
मदद करता है। यह छात्र के अध्ययन का व्यक्तिगत और व्यावसायिक साक्ष्य प्रदान करता है और इसका उपयोग 
छात्रों और गुरुओं, सलाहकारों और/या शिक्षकों के बीच बातचीत को बढ़ावा देने के साधन के रूप में किया 
जाता है। छात्रों को हासिल की गई दक्षताओं और प्रलेखित चिंतनशील अभ्यास के आधार पर प्रतिक्रिया प्राप्त होती 
है। शुरुआत में पोर्टफोलियो लिखित आधारित होगा लेकिन ई-पोर्टफोलियो के विकास की उम्मीद है। संरचना में 
छात्र के नाम, प्रशिक्षण वर्ष और सलाहकार के नाम के साथ एक मुखपृष्ठ, सामग्री पृष्ठ, अध्ययन के उद्देश्यों की 
सूची, नैदानिक अनुभव अभिलेख और प्रत्येक अनुभव पर एक संक्षिप्त प्रतिबिंबन शामिल हो सकता है। नैदानिक 
पदस्थापन के दौरान एक योग्यता आंकलन एकत्र किया जाएगा और आईसीएम आवश्यक दक्षताओं के अनुसार 
योग्यता के लिए विशिष्ट कौशल का आंकलन किया जाएगा। एक अंतिम प्रतिबिंबित अवलोकन पिछली पोर्टफोलियो 
समीक्षा के बाद के अध्ययन का सारांश प्रस्तुत करेगा। 

योग्यता-आधारित अध्ययन और आंकलन के लिए प्रीसेप्टरशिप और मेंटरिंग महत्वपूर्ण हैं, क्योंकि यह प्रतिपुष्टि 
प्रक्रिय को बढ़ाती है और आईसीएम दक्षताओं के संबंध में छात्रों के प्रतिबिंबन को प्रोत्साहित करती है। छात्रों को 
उनके मेंटरशिप अनुभव के लिए अलग-अलग सलाहकार आवंटित किए जाएंगे। मार्गदर्शन के उद्देश्य इस प्रकार हैं: 
प्रतिपुष्टि प्रदान करना; प्रतिबिंबन को प्रोत्साहित करना; पोर्टफोलियो संकलित करने में छात्रों का समर्थन करना; 
छात्रों के योग्यता विकास की निगरानो करना; छात्रों को उनकी ताकतों और कमजोरियों के बारे में बेहतर 
जागरूकता और समझ विकसित करने में सहायता करना; पदस्थापन के लिए अध्ययन योजना बनाने में छात्रों की 
सहायता करना; और छात्रों को प्रेरित / प्रोत्साहित करना। सलाहकारों को सामान्य और विशिष्ट अभ्यास काशल का 
योग्यता आंकलन पूरा करने की आवश्यकता होगी। 


यदि समायोजन और प्रचालन तंत्र अनुमति देते हैं तो छात्रों को कम से कम 4, 2 या 3 गहन कार्यशालाओं के 
लिए एक साथ लाया जाना चाहिए जिसमें वे शिक्षक के सहयोग से अनुभव साझा करते हैं, कि क्‍या अच्छा हुआ, 
क्या मुश्किल था। छात्र तैयार की गई शिक्षण सामग्री अपने साथ लाएंगे। वे अपनी लॉग बुक का उपयोग करेंगे, 
अपना पोर्टफोलियो रखेंगे और अनुभव पर विचार करेंगे। 


इस अवधि के दौरान छात्रों को एक-दूसरे का सहकर्मी समर्थन प्राप्त करने के लिए प्रोत्साहित किया जाना 
ater | 


62 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


परामश योजना 


उद्देश्य: स्थानीय हितधारकों का ऑनसाइट अभिविन्यास, अंतर विश्लेषण और मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास शुरू करने हेतु समर्थन 


आधारभूत आंकलन - प्रशिक्षण अवसंरचना, नैदानिक अभ्यास wie और प्रसाविकीय सेवाएं | 


प्रथाओं को भूलना और जन्म के सामान्य शारीरिक पहलुओं को शामिल करना। 

नैदानिक सलाह — एएनसी क्लिनिक, प्राथमिकता निर्धारण क्षेत्र, शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षेत्र, प्रसव कक्ष के आयोजन पर ध्यान 
देना। 

नैदानिक सलाह - प्रसवपूर्व क्लिनिक, प्राथमिकता निर्धारण क्षेत्र और शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षेत्र चलाने में सहायता करना। 
प्रसवपूर्व और अंतर्ग्भाशयी देखभाल में सहायता करना | 

नैदानिक सलाह - प्रसवपूर्व fran, प्राथमिकता निर्धारण क्षेत्र और शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षेत्र चलाने में सहायता करना। 
प्रसवपूर्व और अंतर्ग्भाशयी देखभाल में सहायता करना | 


शिक्षकों के साथ गहन चिंतन। 


vez: नैदानिक सहायता, योग्यता आंकलन और पीपीएच पर प्रशिक्षण 


चुनौतियों की पहचान करने के लिए प्रशिक्षकों, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षुओं और प्रसूति प्रवीणों के साथ विचार विमर्श करना। 
नैदानिक सलाह - प्रसवपूर्व क्लिनिक, प्राथमिकता निर्धारण क्षेत्र और शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षेत्र चलाने में सहायता करना। 
प्रसवपूर्व और अंतर्गर्भाशयी देखभाल के लिए सहायता करना। 

प्रसवपूर्व स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा, पेट की जांच, योनि की जांच के लिए योग्यता का आंकलन करना। 

प्रसूति आपातकालीन ड्रिल - पीपीएच | 


नैदानिक सलाह - प्रसवपूर्व क्लिनिक, प्राथमिकता निर्धारण क्षेत्र और शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षेत्र चलाने में सहायता करना। 


उद्देश्य: नैदानिक सहायता, सीटीजी पर नैदानिक प्रशिक्षण, प्री-एक्लेम्पसिया और एक्लेम्पसिया की पहचान और प्रबंधन, 
योग्यता आंकलन 


e सीटीजी निगरानी और व्याख्या पर नैदानिक शिक्षण | 
e प्रसूति आपातकालीन ड्रिल - प्री-एक्लेम्पसिया / एक्लेम्पसिया | 


e योग्यता आंकलन — प्रसव के पहले चरण का प्रबंधन, दूसरे चरण की देखभाल, प्रसव का दैहिक तीसरा चरण और 
एएमटीएसएल | 


e नेदानिक सलाह - प्रसवपूर्व क्लिनिक, प्राथमिकता निर्धरिण क्षेत्र और शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षेत्र चलाने में सहायता करना। 


उद्देश्य: नैदानिक सहायता, प्रसव dear शुरु करने पर नैदानिक प्रशिक्षण, एनबीआर और योग्यता आंकलन 


e प्रसव वेदना शुरु करने पर नैदानिक प्रशिक्षण | 


e प्रसूति आपातकालीन ड्रिल — एनबीआर।| 


e नेदानिक कौशल का योग्यता आंकलन - सोटीजी निगरानी, नवजात शिशु देखभाल और आंकलन, प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल | 


[भागवा---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 63 


e नेदानिक सलाह - प्रसवपूर्व क्लिनिक, प्राथमिकता निर्धारिण क्षेत्र और शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षेत्र चलाने में सहायता करना। 


उद्देश्य: नैदानिक सहायता, नैदानिक प्रशिक्षण, परिवार नियोजन और योग्यता आंकलन 


चुनौतियों की पहचान करने के लिए शिक्षकों, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षुओं और प्रसूति प्रवीणों के साथ विचार विमर्श करना। 
नैदानिक शिक्षण -- परिवार नियोजन परामर्श और आईयूसीडी अंतर्वेशन (अंतराल और पीपीआईयूसीडी) | 


नैदानिक कौशल का योग्यता आंकलन - एपिसीओटॉमी, मूलाधार आंकलन और टांके लगाना। 


नैदानिक सलाह - प्रसवपूर्व क्लिनिक, प्राथमिकता निर्धारण क्षेत्र और शिशु जन्म शिक्षा क्षत्र चलाने में सहायता करना। 


प्रसवपूर्व और अंतर्ग्भाशयी देखभाल के लिए सहायता। 


उद्देश्य: प्रसाविकीय देखभाल - गर्भपात संबंधी सेवाओं पर नैदानिक सहायता और नैदानिक शिक्षण 


e योग्यता आंकलन - कौशल को समेकित करना | 
e नेदानिक शिक्षण - प्रसाविकीय देखभाल - गर्भपात संबंधी सेवाएं (शोक परामर्श, सुरक्षित गर्भपात के संदर्भ में सलाह)। 


० नेदानिक मेंटरिंग — एनपीएम प्रशिक्षुओं के लिए योग्यता आंकलन आयोजित करने में सहायता करना। 


उद्देश्य: शोध प्रोटोकॉल की तैयारी के लिए नैदानिक सहायता, योग्यता आंकलन और समर्थन 


०» योग्यता आंकलन - कौशल को समेकित करना। 


० शिक्षण - शोध प्रस्ताव विकास | 


उद्देश्य: नैदानिक सहायता, योग्यता आंकलन और आईएमएनसीआई प्रोटोकॉल पर समीक्षा 


e योग्यता आंकलन — कौशल को समेकित करना। 


e शिक्षण - आईएमएनसीआई प्रोटोकॉल | 


उद्देश्य: नैदानिक सहायता, योग्यता आंकलन और सुविधा आधारित नवजात शिशु देखभाल प्रोटोकॉल पर समीक्षा 


e योग्यता आंकलन - कौशल को समेकित करना। 


e शिक्षण - सुविधा आधारित नवजात शिशु देखभाल प्रोटोकॉल | 


उद्देश्य: नैदानिक सहायता, योग्यता aloe 


उद्देश्य: नैदानिक सहायता, योग्यता आंकलन 


64 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


उद्देश्य: मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षकों की योग्यता का आंकलन और शोध अध्ययन की समीक्षा 


डॉ. टी. दिलीप कुमार, अध्यक्ष 
[विज्ञापन-/4/असा./796/2023-24] 
44. परिशिष्ट 


af frec—I 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक की भूमिकाएं एवं उत्तरदायित्व 


एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक, नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) कार्यक्रम के कार्यान्वयन को सुनिश्चित 
करेंगे और राजकीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थानों में पाठ्यक्रम के लिए प्रवेश लेने वाले प्रशिक्षुओं को 
प्रशिक्षण प्रदान करेंगे | 


«» एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक यह सुनिश्चित करेंगे कि एनपीएम पाठ्यक्रम में प्रवेश लेने वाले एनपीएम प्रशिक्षुओं 
को पूरे कार्यक्रम के दौरान सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक रूप से पर्याप्त अवगत कराया जाए। 


© एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक मानकीकृत प्रशिक्षण के लिए पाठ योजनाओं के साथ सैद्धांतिक, area और 
इंटर्नशिप में सामग्री का विवरण प्रदान करने के लिए परिषद्‌ द्वारा निर्धारित पाठ्यक्रम का पालन 
करेंगे | 

© एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक प्रत्येक एनपीएम प्रशिक्षु की लॉगबुक रखने के लिए भी उत्तरदायी होंगे। इसकी एक 
प्रति एनपीएम प्रशिक्षु के पास भी रहेगी। सहभागी अध्ययन सुनिश्चित करने के लिए इसे एक संयुक्त 
जिम्मेदारी के रूप में निभाया जाएगा। 


०» एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक को अपने ज्ञान को लगातार अद्यतन करने और मिडवाइफरी शिक्षा के लिए प्रासंगिक 
व्यावसायिक विकास गतिविधियों में भाग लेने की आवश्यकता होगी। 


© अपनी योग्यता को बनाए रखने के लिए एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक, प्रशिक्षण संस्थान की नैदानिक सुविधाओं 
में भी अभ्यास करेंगे और अपनी देखभाल के तहत महिलाओं को व्यापक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान 
करेंगे। वह कम जोखिम वाली गर्भवती महिलाओं की देखभाल पर ध्यान केंद्रित करेंगे, जिनके लिए 
वह प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल प्रदान करते हैं और प्रसव और प्रसव के दौरान महिलाओं को सहायता प्रदान 
करते हैं। जन्म के बाद वह यह सुनिश्चित करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं कि मां और बच्चा स्वस्थ 
हैं, घनिष्ठ संबंध विकसित करते हैं और यह सुनिश्चित करते हैं कि बच्चे के जीवन की शुरुआत 
सर्वोत्तम हो। वह सामान्य गर्भावस्‍था, प्रसव और प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल से विचलन की पहचान करने के 
लिए अपने ज्ञान और दक्षताओं का उपयोग करते हैं, प्रारंभिक प्रबंधन प्रदान करते हैं और Gad के 
अनुसार उचित चिकित्सा सहायता प्राप्त करते हैं। 


परिशिष्ट-ता 
मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए आईसीएम आवश्यक दक्षताएं - 
आईसीएम एसेंशियल कंपीटेंसीज फॉर मिडवाइफरी प्रैक्टिस (2049) 


दक्षता / कौशल श्रेणी I: सामान्य कौशल 

एनपीएम, परिषद्‌ द्वारा अपनाए गए मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास में नैतिक, परोपकारी और मानवतावादी 
सिद्धांतों के अनुरूप आईसीएम मानकों के अनुसार प्रसाविकीय देखभाल के वितरण में एक स्वायत्त 
व्यवसायी के रूप में व्यावसायिक जवाबदेही प्रदर्शित करते हैं। 
दक्षताएं 
iU एक स्वायत्त व्यवसायी के रूप में अपने निर्णयों और कार्यों की जिम्मेदारी लेना। 
ft. एक प्रसाविका के रूप में स्व-विकास और स्व-झसुरक्षा के साथ स्व-देखभाल की जिम्मेदारी लेना। 


[भाग ता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 65 
i. देखभाल के पहलुओं को उचित पैमाने पर दूसरों को सौंपना और पर्यवेक्षण करना। 

ist. सुविज्ञ अभ्यास में शोध का उपयोग करना। 

ig. प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करते समय वैयक्तिक मौलिक मानवाधिकारों को कायम रखना। 


iw. मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के लिए क्षेत्राधिकार संबंधी कानूनों, नैतिक, विनियामक आवश्यकताओं, आचार 
संहिता का पालन करना। 


io. महिलाओं को देखभाल के बारे में व्यक्तिगत विकल्प चुनने में मदद करना। 


iva. महिला व परिवार, स्वास्थ्य देखभाल दल और सामुदायिक समूहों के साथ प्रभावी पारस्परिक संवाद 
का प्रदर्शन करना। 


ig. महिला के घर सहित Pema और सामुदायिक समायोजनों में दैहिक प्रसव प्रक्रिया को 
सुविधाजनक बनाना। 


ot. महिला व शिशुओं की स्वास्थ्य स्थिति का आंकलन करना, स्वास्थ्य संबंधी खतरों की जांच करना 
और सामान्य स्वास्थ्य तथा सुख का संवर्धन करना। 

im. प्रजनन और प्रारंभिक जीवन से संबंधित आम स्वास्थ्य समस्याओं की रोकथाम और उपचार करना। 

iva. मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास के दायरे से बाहर की स्थितियों को पहचानना और उचित परामर्श हेतु भेजना। 


iva. ऐसी महिलाओं को देखभाल प्रदान करना जो शारीरिक या यौन हिंसा और दुर्व्यवहार की शिकार 
हुई हों। 
दक्षता / कौशल श्रेणी I: गर्भावस्‍था-पूर्व और प्रसवपूर्व 
एनपीएम महिला तथा भ्रूण का स्वास्थ्य आंकलन करते हैं, उनका स्वास्थ्य व सुख सर्वधन करते हैं, 
गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान जटिलताओं का पता लगाते हैं, और अप्रत्याशित गर्भावती महिलाओं को देखभाल 
प्रदान करते हैं। 


दक्षताएं 

2ए. गर्भावस्‍था-पूर्व और प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल प्रदान करना। 

2बी. महिलाओं की स्वास्थ्य स्थिति का निर्धारण करना । 

2सी. भ्रूण स्वास्थ्य का आंकलन करना। 

2डी. गर्भावस्‍था की प्रगति की निगरानी करना। 

2g. ऐसे स्वास्थ्य व्यवहारों को बढ़ावा और समर्थन देना जिससे उनके स्वास्थ्य में सुधार हो। 

2एफ. गर्भावस्‍था, जन्म, स्तनपान, माता-पिता बनने और परिवार में बदलाव से संबंधित अग्रिम मार्गदर्शन 
प्रदान करना | 


2जी. जटिलता वाली गर्भवती महिलाओं का पता लगाना, प्रबंधन करना और उनको उचित परामर्श हेतु 
भेजना | 


ova. महिला और उसके परिवार को प्रसव के लिए उचित स्थान चुनने में सहायता करना। 
2आई. अनपेक्षित या गलत समय पर गर्भवती हुई महिलाओं को देखभाल प्रदान करना। 
दक्षता / कौशल श्रेणी I: प्रसव के दौरान और बच्चे के जन्म के समय देखभाल 


एनपीएम प्रसव के दौरान महिला की निगरानी और देखभाल करना जारी रखते हैं जिससे दैहिक 
प्रक्रियओं और सुरक्षित जन्म, नवजात शिशु की तात्कालिक देखभाल और मां और शिशु में जटिलताओं 
का पता लगाने में मदद मिलती है। 


66 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


दक्षताएं 

3ए. दैहिक प्रसव प्रक्रिया और शिशु जन्म को बढ़ावा देना। 

3बी. सुरक्षित सहज योनि जन्म का प्रबंधन करना और जटिलताओं से रोकथाम करना। 
3सी. जन्म के तुरंत बाद नवजात शिशु की देखभाल करना। 

दक्षता / कौशल so IV: महिलाओं और नवजात शिशुओं की निरंतर देखभाल 


एनपीएम मां और शिशु का स्वास्थ्य आंकलन करना, स्तनपान क लिए स्वास्थ्य शिक्षा और सहायता 
प्रदान करना, जटिलताओं का पता लगाना और परिवार नियोजन सेवाएं शुरू करना जारी रखते हैं। 


दक्षताएं 

4ए. स्वस्थ महिला को प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल प्रदान करना | 
4बी. स्वस्थ नवजात शिशु की देखभाल करना। 

4सी. स्तनपान को बढ़ावा देना और इसमें सहायता करना। 


4डी. महिला में प्रसवोत्तर जटिलताओं का पता लगाना और उनका इलाज करना या उनको उचित 
परामर्श हेतु भेजना | 


4ई. नवजात शिशु की स्वास्थ्य समस्याओं का पता लगाना और उनका प्रबंधन करना। 


4एफ. परिवार नियोजन सेवाएं प्रदान करना | 


परिशिष्ट-गा 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों के लिए नैदानिक लॉगबुक (कार्यविधिक दक्षताएं / कौशल) 
स्वतंत्र रूप से करता ones 
DI विशिष्ट कार्यविधिक क्षमताएं / कौशल है / चिकित्सक के सहयोग से हस्ताक्षर 
करता है / प्रक्रिया में सहायता रत तिथि 


करता है (पी / पीसी / ए)' 


महिला का प्रसवपूर्व स्वास्थ्य आंकलन: पी 
वृत्त लेखन, दैहिक जांच तथा प्रासविक जांच 


4.2 War गर्भावस्‍था जांच 


4.3 |सहली हीमोग्लोबिनोमीटर / ट्र्‌ एचबी-पी का उपयोग 
कर हीमोग्लोबिन का अनुमान लगाना 


a 
कद 
4.5 |एल्बुमिन एवं मधुमेह @ लिए मूत्र की जांच क्र 


.9 यूएसजी करना 


4.0 |भ्रूण का स्वरूप / किक चार्ट / डीएफएमसी 
(दैनिक भ्रूण गतिविधि की गणना) 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 67 


स्वतंत्र रूप से करता 


सिकित्सेक व हा संकाय के 
DI विशिष्ट कार्यविधिक क्षमताएं / कौशल है / चिकित्सक के लक से हस्ताक्षर 
करता है / प्रक्रिया में सहायता ea तिथि 


करता है (पी / पीसी / ए)' 


4.4. |कार्डियोटोकोग्राफो (सीटीजी) / नॉन--स्ट्रेस tC पी 
(एनएसटी) / oer wea exc (सीएसटी) की 
तैयारी तथा रिकॉर्डिंग 

4.2 प्रसवपूर्व जांच (अम्नियोसेंटेसिस, कॉर्डो्सेंटेसिस, ए 
कोरियोनिक विलस सैंपलिंग) के लिए महिला की 
तैयारी / सहायता 


.5 आयरन तथा फोलिक एसिड औषधियों का निर्धारण | 


.46 प्रसवपूर्व परामर्श तथा सामान्य और कमजोर वर्ग 
जैसे कि गर्भवती नवयुवति जननियों की देखभाल 
। 
2.4 प्रसव dea से पीड़ित महिला की पहचान, आंकलन 
तथा दाखिला 
2.2 |सीटीजी करना 


2.3 प्रसव के दौरान योनि परीक्षण, नैदानिक श्रोणिमिति 
सहित 


2.4 पार्टोग्राफ प्लॉटिंग तथा उसकी व्याख्या 


४० कब | ख| 
४ कब 
z — 
z — 


S| >| | S| S| S| S| S| S| +| S ily 


| 


68 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


स्वतंत्र रूप से करता सं के 

है / चिकित्सक के सहयोग से oe me 
करता है / प्रक्रिया में सहायता as 
करता है (पी / पीसी / ए)' penne 


3 
3.4 प्रसवोत्तर आंकलन तथा देखभाल हर 
४ = 
जाता 
— 


DM विशिष्ट कार्यविधिक क्षमताएं / कौशल 


प्रसवोत्तर परिवार नियोजन 


4 नवजात शिशु की देखभाल 


44 गर्भकाल सहित नवजात शिशु का आंकलन 
4.2 शिशु को स्नान कराना 


5.5 |आपातकाल में /स्वैच्छिक शल्य जनन के लिए महिला 
की तैयारी तथा शल्य जनन में सहायता करना 


_ 
5.6 ltl को तैयार करना तथा अनुकूल होने पर 


5.8 गर्भनाल स्थिति / गर्भनाल Aa का निदान एवं प्रबंधन पी एवं पीसी ae 


5.0 ब्रीच डिलीवरी के लिए जननी को तैयार करना, पी 
उपयुकक्‍तता का आंकलन करना तथा उपयुक्त होने 
पर ब्रीच डिलीवरी में सहायता करना 


[भाग Wi—ave 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 69 
स्वतंत्र रूप से करता eee 
है / चिकित्सक के सहयोग से antes 
aoe में सहायता | SRR 
करता है / प्रक्रिया में सहायता ea तिथि 
करता है (पी / पीसी / ए)' 


5.42 प्रसव तथा नवजात शिशु देखभाल के दौरान संक्रमण पी 


5.43 लंबे समय तक चलने वाली प्रसव dea का निदान 
एवं प्रबंधन 

544 लो फोर्सेप्स ऑपरेशन के लिए तैयार करना तथा 
निष्पादित करना 


5.45 गर्भनाल को हाथ से निकालना 


5.46 |पीपीएच का निदान तथा प्रारंभिक प्रबंधन पी एवं पीसी 
० गर्भाशय का द्विअक्षीय संपीडन 
¢ एटोनिक गर्भाशय के लिए बैलून टेम्पोनेड 
¢ पीपीएच के लिए महाधमनीय संपीड़न 
० अंतःशिरा के माध्यम से द्रव एवं इलेक्ट्रोलाइटस 
निर्धारण तथा चढ़ाना 


5.47 पिरिनियल एवं वेजिनल टीयर्स की मरम्मत (द्वितीय 
डिग्री तक) 

5.48 पिरिनियल एवं वेजिनल cad की मरम्मत (द्वितीय पीसी 
डिग्री से ऊपर) 

5.49 |प्रसूति झटकों की पहचान तथा प्राथमिक चिकित्सा 
प्रबंधन 


उन जोन बाते नवजात हि 


DM विशिष्ट कार्यविधिक क्षमताएं / कौशल 


6 उच्च जोखिम वाले नवजात शिशु 


6.2 AMT नवजात शिशु को पुनर्जीवित करना 


6.3 |नवजात शिशु की नैदानिक प्रक्रियाओं में सहायता 
करना 

6.4 [उच्च जोखिम वाले नवजात शिशु को खिलाना 
ईबीएम (चम्मच / पलादाई) 


6.5 नासो /ओरोगैस्ट्रिक ट्यूब लगाना / हटाना / खिलाना पी 


70 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


स्वतंत्र रूप से करता सं के 

है / चिकित्सक के सहयोग से oe me 
करता है / प्रक्रिया में सहायता es 
करता है (पी / पीसी / ए)' pens 


66 अज प्रबंधन - Gs ERI ae —_ 
87 नवजात शिशु हेतु औषधि गणना वी 


6.8 ऑक्सीजन चढ़ाना 


6.9 इनक्यूबेटर / वार्मर / वेंटिलेटर में नवजात शिशु की 
देखभाल 


6.0 नवजात शिशु इंटुबेषण / वेंटिलेटर 


6.44 फोटोथेरेपी पर नवजात शिशु की देखभाल पी || | ः 


6.i2 विनिमय आधान में सहायता 


करना 


ca उच्च जोखिम वाले नवजात Reg को ले जाना oT 


DM विशिष्ट कार्यविधिक क्षमताएं / कौशल 


7 परिवार कल्याण 


74 परिवार नियोजन wer जा 


अस्थायी गर्भ निरोधकों का वितरण - कंडोम, पी 


ओसीपी, आपातकालीन गर्भ निरोधक 


7.3 |इंटरवल आईयूसीडी लगाना तथा निकालना 


7.4 पीपीआईयूसीडी / पीएआईयूसीडी लगाना तथा पी 
निकालना 


7.5 महिला को प्रसवोत्तर नसबंदी के लिए परामर्श देना  ऋऋए"एज"श"”!, 


76 [महिला नसबंदी के लिए तैयारी करना तथा उसमें ए 
सहायता करना 
। 
डी एंड सी /डी एंड ई ऑपरेशन के लिए तैयार ए 
करना तथा उसमें सहायता करना 
8.2 मैनुअल वैक्यूम एस्पिरेशन करना पी एवं पीसी फार्म 
84 गरनयात के बाद परिवार Radar से गा] 
गर्भाधान से पहले पोषण संबंधी आंकलन करना 
एचआईवी तथा सर्वाइकल Ga के लिए जांच करना 
87 (rarer से पहले परागर्श तथा देखभाल a 


r a 
8.9 (एसिटिक एसिड / आयोडीन के साथ दृश्टिक निरीक्षण आए 


8.40 [स्व-स्तन जांच पर परामर्श 


करना रना 


8.2 रजिस्टर का रखरखाव 


8.3 aire का रखरखाव tT 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 7 


*शिक्षार्थी के कौशल प्रदर्शन करने के लिए सक्षम पाए जाने पर संकाय /प्रशिक्षक द्वारा इस पर हस्ताक्षर 
किए जाएंगे 

शिक्षार्थी: शिक्षार्थिओं से सूचीबद्ध कौशल / दक्षताओं का निष्पादन बार-बार करना तब तक अपेक्षित है जब 
तक कि वे स्तर-3 की दक्षता तक नहीं पहुंच जाते हैं, उसी के बाद संकाय द्वारा प्रत्येक दक्षता के समक्ष 
हस्ताक्षर किए जाएंगे | 


संकाय / प्रशिक्षक: यह सुनिश्चित किया जाना चाहिए कि शिक्षार्थिओं के स्तर-3 तक पहुंचने पर ही प्रत्येक 
दक्षता के समक्ष हस्ताक्षर किए जाएं 


० ha योग्यता दर्शाती है कि शिक्षार्थी बिना किसी पर्यवेक्षण के उस दक्षता का निष्पादन करने में 
सक्षम है। 
० से योग्यता दर्शाती है कि शिक्षार्थी पर्यवेक्षण के साथ प्रत्येक दक्षता का निष्पादन करने में सक्षम 
| 
© स्तर-4 योग्यता दर्शाती है कि शिक्षार्थी पर्यवेक्षण के साथ भी उस कौशल / दक्षता का निष्पादन करने 
में सक्षम नहों है। 
पोर्टफोलियो 


जिन कौशलों के लिए सहयोगात्मक प्रदर्शन की आवश्यकता होती है और जिनमें केवल सहायता की 
जाती है, उन्हें Ferra के दौरान भी अपनाया जा सकता है और पोर्टफोलियो के माध्यम से बनाए रखा 
जा सकता है। लेकिन, जिन कौशलों को स्वतंत्र रूप से निष्पादित करने की आवश्यकता है और शिक्षार्थी 
स्तर-3 के प्रदर्शन तक पहुंचने में सक्षम हैं, उन्हें 6 माह के अंत में अंतिम परीक्षा में उपस्थित होने से 
पहले पूरा करना होगा। 


ufeRrse—IV 


एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक प्रशिक्षण कार्यक्रम: नैदानिक अहर्ताएं 
is तिथि हा J प्रीसेप्टर 
हस्ताक्षर 


epee 
a आजा 
a आन 
a + व जान 


सामान्य प्रसव प्रक्रिया का अवलोकन — 5 
प्रथम चरण से सामान्य प्रसव प्रक्रिया निष्पादित करना (स्वतंत्र) 
- 40 


ete mera twee 


ie केवल संकेत दिए जाने पर भगछेदन करना एवं Clo लगाना — माफ 
0 


arate omen Re 
जी 7. एन 
pepe Rasa 
ae बात 
a 
जि tee 


नैदानिक अहर्ताए 


है THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IHI—SECc.4] 


सं नैदानिक अहर्ताए तिथि संकाय / प्रीसेप्टर 
| के हस्ताक्षर 


प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल अध्ययन - 2 (सामान्य - 4, उच्च जोखिम 
— 4 ) 


निदान: 


प्रसवकालीन देखभाल अध्ययन - 2 (सामान्य -- 4, उच्च 


जोखिम - ॥) 


प्रसवोत्तर देखभाल अध्ययन - 2 (सामान्य -- 4, उच्च जोखिम 
— 4 ) 


निदानः 


47. नवजात शिशु देखभाल अध्ययन - 4 


निदान: 


है 8. नैदानिक प्रस्तुति - 4 
« प्रसवपूर्व 
«० प्रसवकालीन 
* प्रसवोत्तर 
e नवजात शिशु 


स्वास्थ्य परिचर्चा 


*» नवजात शिशु - विषय : 


० परिवार कल्याण - विषय : 


20. (जननी एवं परिवार के सदस्यों को परामर्श देना 
. 


2. 


24. प्रसवपूर्व शय्यागत निदानिका - 2 


22. नैदानिक संगोष्ठी / नैदानिक सम्मेलन 
विषय: 


23. औषधि अध्ययन, प्रस्तुति एवं प्रतिवेदन — 4 


औषधि: 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 73 


a प्रीसेप्टर 
के नैदानिक अहर्ताएं तिथि Te aa : 
सं. के हस्ता 
ह | 

25. (परियोजना: साक्ष्य आधारित मिडवाइफरी अभ्यास 
(व्यक्तिगत / सामूहिक) — 4 
| 
कार्यक्रम समन्वयक के हस्ताक्षर 
परिशिष्ट-५ 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक प्रशिक्षण कार्यक्रम: नैदानिक अनुभव विवरण 
पदस्थापन का देखभाल प्रदान किए | संकाय / प्रीसेप्टर 


क्षेत्र नैदानिक अवस्था गए दिनों की wear के हस्ताक्षर 


है 
| 


4 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


कार्यक्रम समन्वयक के हस्ताक्षर 
परिशिष्ट-५शा 
अध्ययन संसाधन 
भारत सरकार के दिशानिर्देशों की सूची (आरएमएनसीएच) 
भारत में प्रसाविकीय सेवाओं पर दिशानिर्देश (2048) 


लक्ष्य: प्रसव कक्ष गुणवत्ता सुधार पहल दिशानिर्देश 


प्रसव बिंदु पर प्रसव कक्ष के मानकीकरण हेतु दिशानिर्देश 


दक्षता: संस्थागत प्रसव के दौरान बेहतर एमएनएच देखभाल प्रदाताओं का सशकतीकरण 


एसबीए: एएनएम / एलएचवी / एसएन द्वारा प्रसवपूर्व देखभाल तथा जन्म के समय कुशल उपस्थिति हेतु 
दिशानिर्देश, हस्त-पुस्तिका एवं प्रशिक्षक संदर्शिका 


आईएमएनसीआई प्रशिक्षण मॉड्यूल, छायाचित्र तथा चार्ट पुस्तिका 


नवजात शिशु सुरक्षा कार्यक्रम दिशानिर्देश 


स्वास्थ्य कर्मियों के लिए सामान्य टीकाकरण पुस्तिका 

सेवा प्रदाताओं के लिए प्रसवोत्तर परिवार नियोजन पुस्तिका 

चिकित्सा अधिकारियों तथा नर्सिंग कर्मियों के लिए आईयूसीडी संदर्भ पुस्तिका 
पीपीआईयूसीडी संदर्भ नियमावली 


परिचालन दिशानिर्देश: भारत के सार्वभौमिक टीकाकरण कार्यक्रम में पेंटावैलेंट वैक्सीन के रूप में 
हीमोफिलस इन्फ्लुएंजा बी (एचआईबी) का समावशन 


समय से पहले प्रसव वेदना में एंटिनेटल कॉर्टिकोस्टेरॉइड का उपयोग 


सुविधा आधारित आईएमएनसीआई (एफ-आईएमएनसीआई) (प्रतिभागी नियमावली तथा चार्ट पुस्तिका) 
प्रसव वेदना के दौरान यूटेरोटोनिक्स के उपयोग पर निर्देशन टिप्पणी 

सुविधा केंद्रों में जन्म के समय विटामिन के प्रोफाइलैक्सिस 

गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान कैल्शियम अनुपूरण के लिए राष्ट्रीय दिशानिर्देश 

गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान हाइपोथायरायडिज्म के प्रबंधन पर राष्ट्रीय दिशानिर्देश 


गर्भकालीन मधुमेह की पहचान एवं प्रबंधन के लिए राष्ट्रीय दिशानिर्देश 


गर्भावस्‍था के दौरान उपदंश (सिफलिस) की जांच 


[भाग पा---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 75 
«» Ree नवजात शिशु देखभाल पर राष्ट्रीय दिशानिर्देश - बाल स्वास्थ्य प्रभाग, एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू 
«मार्गदर्शन तथा समर्थन दौरों के लिए दिशानिर्देश - दक्षता 

«  एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों के चयन के fay आंकलन दिशानिर्देश — एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू दिशानिर्देश 

अन्य स्रोत 

« डब्ल्यूएचओ रिपोर्ट ऑन स्ट्रेग्थनिंग क्वालिटी मिडवाइफरी केयर एंड मिडवाइफरी wor 

* adc सीरीज 2044, 2048 - मिडवाइफरी क्वालिटी मैटरनल Us न्यूबोर्न केयर (क्यूएमएनसी) फ्रेमवर्क 
© आईसीएम एसेंसियल कंपीटेंसीज फॉर मिडवाइफरी प्रैक्टिस (2048 अपडेट) फ्रेमवर्क स्ट्रक्चर 

« डब्ल्यूएचआ मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर कंपीटेंसीज 

« सुरक्षित डिलीवरी ऐप 

© पेयरमैन व अन्य, मिडवाइफरी प्रेपरेशन फॉर प्रैक्टिस (2049) 

© डाउनी और बायरोम, स्क्वेरिंग द सर्कल (2049) 

© डाउनी और बायरोम, रोर कंपसियोनेट केयर 

«»  मिडवाइफरी कंटिन्यूइटी ऑफ केयर, दूसरा संस्करण 

© केरोलीन होमर, Uc बॉडी, जेन सैंडल और निकी लीप 


०»  एम्पावरिंग डिसीजन-मेकिंग इन मिडवाइफरी: a ग्लोबल पर्सपैक्टिव, प्रथम संस्करण, wea जेफर्ड 
(संपादक), जूली जोमीन (संपादक) 


© डाहलेन va, Ras वी., हैजर्ड बी., बर्थिग आउटसाइड द सिस्टम: द Oa इन द कोलमाइन (2049) 

०»  विसारिया एल., मिडवाइफरी एंड मेटरनल eee इन इंडिया (2040) 

« डब्ल्यूएचओ, मिडवाइव्स वॉयसेज, मिडवाइव्स रियलिटीज (2046) 

©  यूएनएफपीए, स्टेट ऑफ desu मिडवाइफरी (2044) 

ई-रिसोर्सेज 

e =https://www.who.int/maternal_child_adolescent/topics/quality-of-care/midwifery/strengthening- 
midwifery-education/en/ 

e =https://www.who.int/hrh/nursing_midwifery/educator_competencies/en/ 


e =https://www.internationalmidwives.org/our-work/policy-and-practice/essential-competencies-for- 
midwifery-practice.html 


e https://www.cochrane.org/CD004667/PREG_midwife-led-continuity-models-care-compared-other- 
models-care-women-during-pregnancy-birth-and-early 


e =https://www.whiteribbonalliance.org/wp-content/uploads/207/] l/Final_RMC_Charter.pdf 

e https://transform.childbirthconnection.org/reports/physiology/ 

e = https://www. whiteribbonalliance.org/whatwomenwant/ 

संदर्भ 

e बिएस्टा जी. (2045) व्हाट इज एडूकेशन फॉर? ऑन गुड एडूकेशन, टीचर जजमेंट एंड एडूकेशनल 
प्रोफेशनलिज्म, यूरोपियन ote ऑफ एडूकेशन, 50(4), 75-87 


« shea पी. (2009) अंडरस्टेंडिंग एंड प्रमोटिंग ट्रांस्फोर्मेटिव एडूकेशन: ए गाइड फॉर एडूकेशन ऑफ 
एडल्टस, कैनेडियन जर्नल ऑफ यूनिवर्सिटी कंटीन्यूइंग एडूकेशन, 35(4) 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


चोराजी एम. और feertiste के. (2049) लर्निंग बाय gga: ए मॉडल फॉर इंकॉर्पोरेटिंग हाई-इम्पेक्ट 
एक्सपीरियंसियल लर्निंग इनटु एन अंडरग्रेजुएट पब्लिक हैल्थ कुरिकुलम; wiead इन पब्लिक हेल्‍थ 
जर्नल, 7(3): 4-6 

डेवी जे. (i938) एक्सपीरियंस एंड एडूकेशन; न्यूयॉर्क, एनवाई: कोलियर बुक्स 

फिनले एल. (2008) रिफलेक्टिंग ऑन “रिफलेक्टिव प्रैक्टिस', प्रथम संस्करण (ई-बुक), द ओपन 


यूनिवर्सिटी, 42 जुलाई 2049 को http://www.open.ac.uk/opencetl/files/opencetl/file/ecms/web- 
content/Finlay-(2008)-Reflecting-on-reflective-practice-PBPL-paper-52.pdf पर देखा गया 


फ्रेयर पी. (4972) पीडागॉगी ऑफ द ऑप्रेस्ड, पेंगुइन बुक्स, हेमोंड्सवर्थ, यूके 


गिब्स जी. (:988) लर्निंग बाय डूइंग: ए गाइड टू टीचिंग एंड लर्निंग मेथड्स, फर्दर एडूकेशन यूनिट, 
ऑक्सफोर्ड पॉलिटेक्निक: ऑक्सफोर्ड 


aay सी.एस.ई., फ्राइबर्ग आई.के., डायस एम.ए.बी., टेन हूप-बेंडर पी., सैंडल जे., स्पेशल ए.एम. और 
बार्टलेट एल.ए. (2044) द प्रोजेक्टेड इफेक्ट ऑफ स्केलिंग अप मिडवाइफरी, द लैंसेट, 384 (9948), 
4446-4457 


कोल्ब डी.ए. (4984) एक्सपीरियंसियल लर्निंग: एक्सपीरियंस एज द aed ऑफ लर्निंग एंड डवलेपमेंट, 
एंगलवुड क्लिफ्स, एनजे: प्रेंटिस-हॉल 


मेजिरो जे. (4994) ट्रांस्फोर्मेटिव डायमेंशंस ऑफ एडल्ट लर्निंग, जोसी-बास, सैन फ्रांसिस्को 


रेनफ्रू एम.जे., tober ए., बैस्टोस एम.एच., oudd जे., चैनन ए.ए., ava एन.एफ., सिलवा डी.आर. 
ए.डी., डाउनी 
एस., GAS! एच.पी., मालटा ए., मैककोर्मिक एफ., विक एल. और डेक्लक ई. (2044) मिडवाइफरी एंड 
क्वालिटी केयर: फाइंडिंग्स फ्रोम ए न्यू एवीडेंस-इनफोर्म्ड फ्रेमवर्क फॉर मेटरनल एंड न्यूबोर्न केयर, द 
लैंसेट, 384, 4429--4445 


मिलर एस., अबालोस ई., चमिलार्ड एम., सियापोनी ए., कोलासी डी., कोमांडे डी., डियाज वी., गलर 
एस., हेनसन सी., लेंगर ए., मनुअली वी., मिलर के., मोरहसन-बेलो आई., कस्ट्रो सी.पी., पिलेगी वी. 
एन., रॉबिन्सन एन., war एम., gor जे.पी., वोगेल जे.पी. और अल्थाबे एफ. (2046) “बियॉंड दू 
लिटल, दू लेट एंड टू मच, टू YA: ए पाथवे टुवार्ड्स एवीडेंस dw, रेस्पेक्टफुल मेटरनिटी केयर 
desdigs’, द लैंसेट, 388 (40056): 2476--2492 


आईसीएम एसेंशियल कपीटेंसी स्टैंडर्ड्स फॉर द मिडवाइफ (आईसीएम 2048) 42 जुलाई 2049 को 


https://www.internationalmidwives.org/our-work/policy-and-practice/essential-competencies-for- 


midwifery-practice.html पर देखा गया 

संडाल जे., सोल्टनी va, गेट्स एस., शेनन ए., sda डी. (2046) मिडवाइफ-लेड कंटिन्युइटी मॉडल्स 
वर्सस अदर मॉडल्स ऑफ केयर फॉर चाइल्डबीयरिंग वूमेन, कोचरेन डेटाबेस ऑफ सिस्टेमैटिक रिव्यू, 
अंक 4. आर्टिकल नंबर CD004667. DOT: 0.002/I465858.CD004667.pub5 

स्मिथ एम., ade एस. और वनहोएस्टेनबर्ग ए. (2048) सिनेरियो-बेस्ड लर्निंग इन टीचिंग एंड लर्निंग 
इन हायर wow: पर्सपेक्टिव्स फ्रोम यूसीएल, अध्याय 40, संपादक डेविस जे. और पैचलर एन., 
यूसीएल इंस्टीट्यूट ऑफ एडूकेशन प्रेस, यूनिवर्सिटी कॉलेज, लंदन 

ट्रेसी एस.के., dea ए., हॉल बी., ecu डी., लैंचबरी u, बिसिट्स ए., व्हाइट जे. और ट्रेसी एम.बी. 
(2044) केसलोड मिडवाइफरी कंपेयर्ड ¢ esd aie प्राइवेट ऑस्स्टेट्रिक केयर फॉर फर्स्ट टाइम acd 
इन ए पब्लिक टीचिंग हॉस्पिटल इन ऑस्ट्रेलिया, बीएमसी प्रिगनेंसी एंड चाइल्डबर्थ, 44, 46 

यूनाइटेड नेशंस पोपूलेशन फंड (यूएनएफपीए) 2044. द स्टेट ऑफ द desu मिडवाइफरी, ए 
यूनीवर्सल पाथवे, ए वूमेंस राइट टु हेल्‍थ 

विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन (डब्ल्यूएचओ) 2043ए. मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर कोर कंपीटेंसीज, जिनेवा 


[भाग ता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण rai 
«विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन (डब्ल्यूएचओ) 2043बी. डब्ल्यूएचओ रिकमेंडेशंस ऑन पोस्टनेटल केयर ऑफ द 
मदर एंड न्यूबोर्न, जिनेवा 
«विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन (डब्ल्यूएचओ) 2044ए. मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर कोर कंपीटेंसीज एडेप्टेशन टूल्स, 
जिनेवा 
«विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन (डब्ल्यूएचओ) 2044बी. डब्ल्यूएचओ मिडवाइफरी एडूकंटर कंपीटेंसीज: बिल्डिंग 
कैपेसिटीज ऑफ मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर्स, जिनेवा 
« विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन (डब्ल्यूएचओ) 2046. डब्ल्यूएचओ रिकमेंडेशंस ऑन एंटीनेटल केयर फॉर ए 
पॉजिटिव प्रिगनेंसी एक्सपीरिएंस, जिनेवा 
«विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन (डब्ल्यूएचओ) 2048. डब्ल्यूएचओ रिकमेंडेशंस: इंट्रापार्टमस केयर फॉर ए पोजिटिव 
चाइल्डबर्थ एक्सपीरिएंस, जिनेवा 
«विश्व स्वास्थ्य संगठन (डब्ल्यूएचओ) 2049. स्ट्रेग्थनिंग क्वालिटी मिडवाइफरी wow फॉर यूनिवर्सल 
हेल्‍थ कवरेज 2030: फ्रेमवर्क फॉर एक्शन, जेनेवा 
परिशिष्ट- शा 
नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम के लिए परीक्षा दिशानिर्देश 
भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ 
परिचय 
भारत सरकार (जीओआई) गर्भावस्‍था, प्रसव वेदना, प्रसव और प्रसवोत्तर अवधि के दौरान महिला और 
उसके परिवार को दी जाने वाली देखभाल की गुणवत्ता में बदलाव लाने के लिए भारत में 'मिडवाइफरी 
पहल' लागू कर रही है। इस पहल से नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर्स इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) नामक एक नए संवर्ग 
की स्थापना हुई है, जो ‘Ad प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफ' शीर्षक के तहत Pree, सम्मानजनक, सक्षम और 
महिला केंद्रित प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करेगा। 


इन एनपीएम को राजकीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थानों (एसएमटीआई) में एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों द्वारा 
प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों के ज्ञान और कौशल को एक विशेष एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक 
कार्यक्रम के माध्यम से मानकीकृत किया जाता है जिसमें राष्ट्रीय प्रसाविका प्रशिक्षण संस्थान (एनएमटीआई) 
में 6 माह का गहन आवासीय प्रशिक्षण और उसके बाद 42 माह के लिए ऑनसाइट मेंटरशिप शामिल है। 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को 48 माह के अंत में कार्यक्रम के सफल समापन पर अपना प्रमाणन प्राप्त होगा। यह 
प्रशिक्षण कार्यक्रम 6 अंतराष्ट्रीय प्रशिक्षकों और 6 राष्ट्रीय प्रशिक्षकों के एक समूह द्वारा संचालित किया 
जाता है जो इस कार्यक्रम के लिए संकाय प्रशिक्षक हैं। 


अपने प्रशिक्षण कार्यक्रम के दौरान, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक 3 आंकलन / परीक्षाओं से गुजरते हैं: 
(0) 3 माह के प्रशिक्षण के बाद पहला आंकलन 
Gi) अनंतिम प्रमाणीकरण के लिए 6 माह के आवासीय प्रशिक्षण के बाद दूसरा आंकलन 
(॥)48 माह के अंत में, यानी मेंटरशिप के साथ 42 माह के ऑनसाइट प्रशिक्षण के बाद, प्रमाणीकरण 
के लिए अंतिम आंकलन / परीक्षा | 
यह दस्तावेज परीक्षा और प्रमाणन के संचालन की तैयारी और प्रक्रिया का पूरा विवरण प्रस्तुत करना 
है। 


परीक्षा प्राधिकरण 


एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम के लिए परीक्षा प्राधिकरण परिषद्‌ द्वारा अनुमोदित राज्य परीक्षा बोर्ड होंगे। 
परिषद्‌ पाठ्यक्रम दिशानिर्देशों के अनुसार बोर्ड द्वारा परीक्षा की अभिकल्पना, संचालन और मूल्यांकन 
किया जाएगा और प्रमाणपत्र भी इसी प्राधिकरण द्वारा जारी किए जाएंगे। अंतिम प्रमाणीकरण के लिए 


78 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


निर्दिष्ट अंतराल पर तीन परीक्षाएं / आंकलन आयोजित किए जाएंगे। प्रवेश के समय अभ्यर्थियों को 
पंजीकरण संख्या आवंटित की जाती है। 
परीक्षाओं के प्रकार 
एनपीएम कार्यक्रम की परिवर्तनकारी प्रकृति के मद्देनजर, एनपोएम प्रशिक्षकों को अनुकंपनीय और 
सम्मानजनक प्रसाविकीय देखभाल प्रदान करने में बदलाव लाने के लिए एनपीएम को पढ़ाने और प्रशिक्षित 
करने के लिए अत्यधिक कुशल, सक्षम और प्रेरित होना चाहिए। इस मांग को पूरा करने के लिए मूल्यांकन 
और प्रमाणन की प्रक्रिया को सुदृढ़ किया गया है। 
(i) पहला आकलन 
3 माह के अंत में, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों को पाठ्यक्रम जारी रखने की Baga का आंकलन करने के 
लिए एक सैद्धांतिक प्रश्नपत्र और एक व्यावहारिक परीक्षा में बैठना होगा। हालांकि, यदि एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक 
परीक्षा में उत्तीर्ण नहीं होता है, तो उसे एक और मौका दिया जा सकता है और यदि फिर भी उत्तीर्ण नहीं 
होता है, तो उसे कार्यक्रम से बाहर कर दिया जाएगा। (मॉड्यूल 4 और मॉड्यूल 2: अनुभाग 4-3 को इस 
परीक्षा में शामिल किया जाएगा। 
(ii) दूसरा आकलन 
6 माह के अंत में, अभ्यर्थियों को दूसरे आंकलन की सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक परीक्षा में बैठना 
होगा। परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण करने पर, कार्यक्रम के आंशिक समापन पर एक अनंतिम प्रमाणपत्र जारी किया 
जाएगा। इस परीक्षा में सभी मॉड्यूल शामिल किए जाएंगे। 
(ii) अंतिम आंकलन 
42 माह के ऑनसाइट मेंटरशिप अनुभव के पूरा होने के बाद, एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक संबंधित एनएमटीआई 
में आयोजित सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक में अपनी अंतिम परीक्षा में बैठेंगे। इस परीक्षा में सभी मॉड्यूल 
शामिल किए जाएंगे। सफल समापन पर, अभ्यर्थियों को एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक के रूप में प्रमाणित किया 
जाएगा | 
नोट: तीनों परीक्षाओं के लिए परीक्षा का एक ही प्रारूप अपनाया जाएगा। 
परीक्षा में प्रवेश हेतु पात्रता 
जो अभ्यर्थी निम्नलिखित मानदंडों को पूरा करते हैं वे ही परीक्षाओं में बैठने के पात्र होंगे। 
(i) पहला आकलन 
"० सेद्धांतिक और नैदानिक अभ्यास दोनों के लिए निर्धारित उपस्थिति (3 माह) का कम से कम 90% 
पूरा करना | 
© लॉगबुक और नैदानिक आवश्यकताओं का 40% पूरा करना। 
« नर्सिंग कॉलेज के प्राचार्य / कार्यक्रम समन्वयक (संकाय प्रशिक्षक) द्वारा उपस्थिति और 
आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने का प्रमाणपत्र। 
(Gi) दूसरा आकलन 
* सेद्धांतिक और नैदानिक अभ्यास दोनों के लिए निर्धारित उपस्थिति (6 माह) का कम से कम 90% 
पूरा GAT | 
© लॉगबुक और नैदानिक आवश्यकताओं का 80% पूरा करना। 


० नर्सिंग कॉलेज के प्राचार्य / कार्यक्रम समन्वयक (संकाय प्रशिक्षक) द्वारा उपस्थिति और 
आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने का प्रमाणपत्र | 


[भाग ता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 79 
(४) अंतिम परीक्षा 
¢ सैद्धांतिक और नैदानिक अभ्यास दोनों के लिए निर्धारित उपस्थिति (6 माह) का कम से कम 90: 
पूरा करना | 
© योजना के अनुसार एसएमटीआई में 42 माह का मेंटरशिप अनुभव पूरा करना। 
«» लॉगबुक और नैदानिक आवश्यकताओं को 400% पूरा करना। 
«» ऑनसाइट प्रशिक्षण के 42 माह के दौरान एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक का मार्गदर्शन करने वाले संबंधित 
संकाय प्रशिक्षक द्वारा बनाए गए रिकॉर्ड के आधार पर प्रधानाचार्य, कॉलेज ऑफ नर्सिंग / प्रोग्राम 
समन्वयक (संकाय प्रशिक्षक) द्वारा लॉगबुक और नैदानिक आवश्यकताओं को पूरा करने का 
प्रमाणन | 
«» एसएमटीआई में एनपीएम के लिए प्रशिक्षण का सफल संचालन | 
उत्तीर्ण: निर्धारित सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक परीक्षा में आंतरिक और बाह्य दोनों में मिलाकर 70% 
पूरक परीक्षा 

जो अभ्यर्थी पहले आंकलन में अनुत्तीर्ण हो जाते हैं, उन्हें 2-4 सप्ताह के अंदर, केवल सैद्धांतिक या 
व्यावहारिक जिसमें वे अनुत्तीर्ण हुए हैं, परीक्षा में बैठने का एक और मौका दिया जाएगा, और यदि d 
दोबारा अनुत्तीर्ण होते हैं और उपयुक्त नहीं पाए जाते हैं, तो उन्हें कार्यक्रम से बाहर कर दिया जाएगा। 
जो अभ्यर्थी 6 माह के अंत में दूसरे आंकलन में अनुत्तीर्ण हो जाते हैं, वे 6 सप्ताह क बाद, केवल 
सैद्धांतिक या व्यावहारिक जिसमें वे अनुत्तीर्ण हुए हैं, परीक्षा में बैठ सकते हैं। कार्यक्रम के आंशिक समापन 


का अनंतिम प्रमाणपत्र दूसरे आंकलन में उत्तीर्ण होने के बाद ही दिया जाएगा। हालांकि, अभ्यर्थी मेंटरशिप 
के तहत ऑनसाइट प्रशिक्षण के लिए आगे बढ़ सकते =| 


परीक्षा प्रारूप 


परीक्षा का प्रारूप तीनों आंकलन /परीक्षाओं के लिए एक-समान है। एक सैद्धांतिक प्रश्नपत्र और एक 
व्यावहारिक परीक्षा होगी। 


सैद्धांतिक 
आंतरिक आंकलन बाह्य परीक्षा 
सैद्धांतिक कुल = 25 अंक कुल = 75 अंक; अवधि = 3 घंटे 
आंतरिक (25 अंक) |e “टेस्ट: 3 टेस्ट X 5 अंक = 45 अंक e बहु विकल्‍पीय प्रश्न: 40 xX 4 5८ 40 अंक 
a iG sel she *निहित कार्य / प्रस्तुतिकरण: ० संक्षिप्त उत्तर: 5 X 2 = 40 अंक 
= 400 अंक 
5X 2 अंक = 40 अंक संक्षिप्त नोट्स: 5 » 5 = 25 अंक 
e निबंध,/ परिदृश्य: 30 अंक 
2X 45 = 30 अंक 
व्यावहारिक कुल = 50 अंक कुल = 50 अंक 
आंतरिक (50 अंक) |e नैदानिक प्रदर्शन = 40 अंक e ओएससीई (5 स्टेशन) = 20 अंक 
il ue bi ale नैदानिक निहित कार्य / प्रस्तुतियां - 40 aH # प्रत्यक्ष अवलोकित व्यावहारिक परीक्षा = 30 


मु अंक 
e ओएससीई = 40 अंक 


० प्रत्यक्ष अवलोकित व्यावहारिक परीक्षा = 20 अंक 


“परीक्षण 25 अंकों (एमसीक्यू - 3 अंक, लघु उत्तर - 4 » 2 = 2 अंक, लघु उत्तर 2 xX 5 = 40 अंक 
और निबंध परिदृश्य प्रकार — 40 अंक) के लिए आयोजित किए जाने चाहिए और समेकन के लिए 


७0 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


5 अंकों में परिवर्तित किए जाने चाहिए। निहित कार्य /प्रस्तुतियों की गणना 40 अंकों के लिए की जा 
सकती है और समेकन हेतु 2 अंकों में बदला जा सकता है। 


परीक्षक 
सैद्धांतिक 


« प्रश्नपत्र समायोजन - बोर्ड 2 परीक्षकों का एक पैनल नियुक्त करता है, जिसमें से प्रत्येक परीक्षक को 
प्रश्नपत्र की रूपरेखा (अनुलग्नक-#) के अनुसार प्रश्नपत्र के 2 सेट तैयार करने होते हैं। प्रश्नपत्र 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों के संकाय प्रशिक्षकों द्वारा तैयार किए जाने चाहिए। रूपरेखा और प्रश्नपत्र प्रारूप के 
अनुसार इन 4 प्रश्न पत्रों से प्रश्नों का चयन किया जाता है और अंतिम प्रश्नपत्र परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा 
तैयार किया जाता है। गोपनीयता बनाए रखी जानी चाहिए और प्रश्नपत्र तैयार करने वाले प्रत्येक 
संकाय को गोपनीयता शपथ पत्र पर हस्ताक्षर करने चाहिए | 


© अन्वीक्षण - परीक्षा का अन्वीक्षण बोर्ड द्वारा नियुक्त एक बाह्य संकाय द्वारा किया जाना चाहिए। जिस 
नर्सिंग कॉलेज में एनएमटीआई स्थित है, उसके प्राचार्य / कार्यक्रम समन्वयक (संकाय प्रशिक्षक) परीक्षा 
के मुख्य अधीक्षक होंगे | 

© मूल्यांकन - सैद्धांतिक प्रश्नपत्रों का मूल्यांकन परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा आवंटित केंद्र पर परीक्षा बोर्ड के 
सचिव / अध्यक्ष की देखरेख में संकाय प्रशिक्षकों द्वारा किया जाना afer 


¢ अंक तालिका - अंक तालिका का नमूना अनुलग्नक-9 में संलग्न है। 
व्यावहारिक परीक्षा 


* व्यावहारिक परीक्षा 2 से ३ दिन के लिए आयोजित की जानी चाहिए - पहल दिन ओएससीई आयोजित 
की जाती है और उसके बाद के दिनों में सीधे अवलोकित व्यावहारिक परीक्षा का अवलोकन किया 
जाता है। 

«» ओएससीई — ओएससीई संचालन के लिए, बोर्ड द्वारा 5 स्टेशनों के लिए 5 मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं का एक 
दल एनएमटीआई से नियुकक्‍त किया जाना चाहिए, जिसमें नर्सिंग कॉलेज के प्रधानाचार्य / कार्यक्रम 
समन्वयक (संकाय प्रशिक्षक) शामिल होंगे जो इस परीक्षा के लिए मुख्य अधीक्षक eft) ओएससीई 
सत्रों के संचालन को देखने और नियंत्रित करने के लिए बोर्ड द्वारा एक बाह्य परीक्षक (संकाय 
प्रशिक्षक) नियुक्त किया जाता el परीक्षा के लिए ओएससीई स्टेशनों की सूची बोर्ड द्वारा तय की 
जाती है और एक सीलबंद लिफाफे में परीक्षा केंद्र को भेजी जाती है — 3 बुनियादी कौशल और 2 
utd कौशल (सूची परिशिष्ट-7) में संलग्न है)। 

© प्रत्यक्ष अवलोकित व्यावहारिक परीक्षा - यह 3 परीक्षकों के एक दल द्वारा आयोजित किया जाता है। 2 
संकाय प्रशिक्षक — एक आंतरिक और एक बाह्य और 4 चिकित्सा उपदेशक जो एनपीएम प्रशिक्षकों के 
शिक्षण कार्यक्रम में शामिल थे। 

« परीक्षकों की योग्यता: प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग विशिष्टता में एम.एससी. नर्सिंग के साथ स्नातकोत्तर उपाधि 
के पश्चात 5 वर्ष का प्रशिक्षण या नदानिक अनुभव दोहरी भूमिका के साथ / प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग में 
एम.एससी. नर्सिंग के साथ संकाय के रूप में 5 वर्ष के अनुभव के साथ कम से कम 2 वर्ष का 
प्रसाविकीय नैदानिक कार्य अनुभव। मेडिकल प्रीसेप्टर को स्नातकोत्तर उपाधि के पश्चात 3 af के 
अनुभव के साथ प्रसूति एवं स्त्री रोग, बाल रोग और सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य विभाग के चिकित्सीय 
संकाय / सलाहकार होना चाहिए | 

परीक्षा का संचालन 


० बोर्ड द्वारा सेद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक परीक्षा दोनों के लिए परीक्षा कार्यक्रम परीक्षा से कम से कम 2 
सप्ताह पहले दिया जाता है। 


० हॉल टिकट परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा परीक्षा केंद्र तक भेजे जाते हैं। 
० परीक्षा के fay og परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा आवंटित किया जाता है। 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण Sl 


पर्यवेक्षकों और व्यावहारिक परीक्षकों की नियुक्ति परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा की जाती है। 


प्रश्नपत्रों को सील करके परीक्षा केंद्र पर भेजा जाता है या ऑनलाइन भी भेजा जा सकता है। मुख्य 
अधीक्षक, जो या तो प्रधानाचार्य / कार्यक्रम समन्वयक (संकाय प्रशिक्षक) होता है, प्रश्नपत्रों की सुरक्षा के 
लिए उत्तरदायी होता है। 


अभ्यर्थियों को केवल अपनी पंजीकरण संख्या का उपयोग करना चाहिए। उत्तर पुस्तिकाओं में कहीं भी 
नाम नहीं लिखा होना चाहिए। 


सैद्धांतिक 


परीक्षा हॉल में पर्याप्त रोशनी और शुद्ध हवा की व्यवस्था की जाती है। बैठने की व्यवस्था पंजीकरण 
संख्या के अनुसार की जाती है। 

अभ्यर्थियों को हॉल टिकट दिखाने पर परीक्षा शुरू होने से 45 मिनट पहले हॉल में जाने की अनुमति 
दी जा सकती है। 

परीक्षा की अवधि 3 de है। 


किसी भी अभ्यर्थी को परीक्षा शुरू होने से तीस मिनट के बाद परीक्षा हॉल में प्रवेश नहीं दिया जाना 
चाहिए और परीक्षा शुरू होने से साठ मिनट की समाप्ति से पहले परीक्षा हॉल नहीं छोड़ना चाहिए। 


परीक्षा हॉल में किसी भी इलेक्ट्रॉनिक उपकरण की अनुमति नहीं दी जानी चाहिए। 

परीक्षा शुरू होने से पहले उत्तर पुस्तिकाओं पर पर्यवेक्षक द्वारा हस्ताक्षर किए जाने चाहिए। 

प्रश्नपत्र का पुलिंदा परीक्षा प्रारंभ होने से 45 मिनट पहले मुख्य अधीक्षक और पर्यवेक्षकों द्वारा 
अभ्यर्थियों की उपस्थिति में खोला जाना चाहिए। (यदि ऑनलाइन है तो इसी प्रकार डाउनलोड करें) 
अभ्यर्थियों को सचेत करने के लिए परीक्षा के हर आधे घंटे में एक घंटी बजाई जानी चाहिए। 

परीक्षा के पूरा होने पर, उत्तर पुस्तिकाओं को क्रम में एकत्र किया जाना चाहिए, पैक किया जाना 


चाहिए, सील किया जाना चाहिए, मुख्य अधीक्षक द्वारा हस्ताक्षरित किया जाना चाहिए और परीक्षा के 
दिन पंजीकृत डाक या स्पीड पोस्ट द्वारा परीक्षा बोर्ड को भेजा जाना चाहिए। 


व्यावहारिक परीक्षा 


(i) 


(ii) 


वस्तुनिष्ठ संरचित नैदानिक परीक्षा (ओएससीई) 

«» ओएससीई परीक्षा के पहले दिन की जाती है। 

«» ओएससीई स्टेशन सूची परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा दी जाती है जिसे परीक्षा शुरू होने से 60 मिनट पहले 
खोला जा सकता है। 5 स्टेशनों का चयन किया गया है - 3 बुनियादी कौशल और 2 od 
कौशल (कौशल सूची — ufeferee—D) | 

* प्रत्येक स्टेशन को आवश्यक सामग्री और जांचसूची के साथ तैयार किया जाना चाहिए। 

* प्रत्येक अभ्यर्थी को प्रत्येक स्टेशन पर 40 मिनट की अनुमति दी जा सकती है। 

«» 4 ओएससीई सत्र के लिए आवंटित समय 50 मिनट है। एक दिन में अधिकतम 6 बार ओएससीई 
हो सकते हैं। उसी दिन 30 अभ्यर्थियों का मूल्यांकन किया जा सकता है। जिन अभ्यर्थियों ने 
ओएससीई पूरा कर लिया है उन्‍हें परीक्षा की प्रतीक्षा कर रहे अन्य अभ्यर्थियों से मिलने की अनुमति 
नहीं दी जानी चाहिए। यदि अभ्यर्थियों की संख्या अधिक है, तो परीक्षा अगले दिन अलग--अलग 
कौशल स्टेशनों के साथ की जा सकती है। 

«» ओएससीई के लिए स्कोर प्रत्येक स्टेशन के लिए व्यक्तिगत मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं द्वारा किया जाता है 
और अंतिम स्कोरिंग शीट को बाह्य मूल्यांकनकर्ता और मुख्य अधीक्षक द्वारा संयुक्त रूप से 
संकलित और समेकित किया जाता है। ओएससीई अंक तालिका परिशिष्ट-+: में संलग्न है। 

प्रत्यक्ष अवलोकित व्यावहारिक परीक्षा (डीओपी) 


§2 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


« परीक्षा के दूसरे दिन डीओपी fear जाता 2 | 


* प्रत्येक अभ्यर्थी को लॉटरी पद्धति द्वारा प्रसवपूर्व, प्रसवकालीन या प्रसवोत्तर परीक्षा के लिए एक 
जननी आवंटित की जाती है। oe जननी और नवजात शिशु (यदि प्रसव के बाद) के आंकलन 
और देखभाल के लिए 3-4 घंटे का समय दिया जाएगा। 

«» दी गई देखभाल का मूल्यांकन आंतरिक परीक्षक, बाह्य परीक्षक और मेडिकल प्रीसेप्टर द्वारा 
व्यक्तिगत रूप से किया जाता है और उनके अंकों को अंतिम अंकों के लिए जोड़ा जाता है। 
मौखिक परीक्षा नैदानिक क्षेत्र में बेडसाइड / सम्मेलन कक्ष में आयोजित की जाती है। Send 
आंकलन प्रपत्र परिशिष्ट-- में संलग्न है। 

© एक दिन में अधिकतम 45-20 विद्यार्थियों की परीक्षा ली जा सकती है। 

«» इन अंकों को ओएससीई अंकों स्कोर के साथ संकलित किया जाता है और परीक्षकों और मुख्य 
अधीक्षक द्वारा हस्ताक्षरित किया जाता है। अंक तालिका परीक्षा बोर्ड को परीक्षा के दिन पंजीकृत 
डाक या स्पीड पोस्ट द्वारा भेजी जाती है। 

परिणाम 

परीक्षा के परिणाम परीक्षा बोर्ड द्वारा परीक्षाओं के आयोजन से 45 दिनों से एक माह की अवधि के 
भीतर घोषित किए जाते हैं। प्रश्नपत्र मूल्यांकन केंद्र का निर्णय बोर्ड द्वारा किया जा सकता el एक 
अभ्यर्थी सफलतापूर्वक परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण कर लेता है यदि उसने सैद्धांतिक और व्यावहारिक दोनों प्रश्नपत्रों में 
मिलाकर कम से कम 70: अंक प्राप्त किए हैं जो कि “उत्तीर्ण माना जाता है। अंक तालिका और प्रमाणपत्र 
का प्रारूप (अनंतिम और अंतिम) परिशिष्ट--3 और परिशिष्ट-९? में संलग्न है। 
प्रमाणी करण 
a). शीर्षक - नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर (एनपीएम एडूकेटर) 

ब) निर्धारित अध्ययन कार्यक्रम के सफल समापन पर एक उपाधि प्रदान की जाती है, जिसमें उल्लिखित 
होगा कि अभ्यर्थी ने 
.. नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर का निधारित पाठ्यक्रम पूरा कर लिया है। 
ii प्रमाणपत्र प्रदान करने से पहले सैद्धांतिक के 90% और व्यावहारिक अनुदेश के 400% घंटे पूरे 
कर लिए हैं। 
9. निर्धारित सैद्धांतिक व व्यावहारिक परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण (आंतरिक और बाह्य दोनों में मिलाकर 70% 
अंक) कर ली है। 
a) एसएनआरसी द्वारा एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक को एक अतिरिक्त योग्यता के रूप में पंजीकृत किया जाएगा। 

6 माह के अंत में दूसरी परीक्षा उत्तीर्ण करने पर, कार्यक्रम के आंशिक समापन का एक अनंतिम 
प्रमाणपत्र जारी किया जाएगा। अंतिम परीक्षा के सफल समापन पर, अभ्यर्थियों को एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक का 
प्रमाणपत्र प्रदान किया जाएगा। प्रमाणपत्रों का मॉडल परिशिष्ट-९(? में संलग्न है। 

aRRre—VII के उप-परिशिष्ट 
परिशिष्ट--*: प्रश्नपत्र की रूपरेखा 


परीक्षा: प्रारंभिक / अंतरिम / अंतिम परीक्षा अंक : 75 
तिथि : समय : 3 घंटे 
क्र. प्रश्नों के प्रकार एमसीक्यू | संक्षिप्त उत्तर | लघु नोट्स | निबंध /स्थिति | अंक | प्रतिशत 


4 याद रखना (ज्ञान आधारित सरल प्रश्न, तथ्य, 
शब्दावली, अवधारणा, नियम, सिद्धांतों को याद 2 42% 
करना, जानकारी को पहचानना, परिभाषित 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


करना) 


2 |समझना (अवधारणा, वैचारिक रूप से समझना, 
व्याख्या करना, तुलना करना, निरूपण, व्याख्या 
करना, टीका करना, जानकारी की व्याख्या 


करना) 


3 अनुप्रयोग (साकार स्थिति में अमूर्त जानकारी 
का उपयोग करना, जानकारी को नई स्थिति में 
लागू करना, समस्याओं का समाधान करना) 


5 मूल्यांकन (मूल्यांकन, निर्णय, किसी निर्णय या 
परिणाम के मूल्य या परिणाम को उचित 
ठहराना, मूल्यों के आधार पर परिणामों की 


भविष्यवाणी करना) 


कुल योग 4024540 4X5=20 [22(40+2<45535 


II. 


If. 


IV. 


अरनपत्र का नमूना 


oo 


सैद्धांतिक परीक्षा का नाम — प्रथम / द्वितीय / अंतिम परीक्षा 


अधिकतम अंक: 75 अंक 


दी गई उत्तर पुस्तिका में सभी प्रश्नों के उत्तर दीजिए 


बहुविकल्पीय प्रश्न: सर्वोत्तम उत्तर चुनें 


(4 विकल्पों वाला एक प्रश्न) 


संक्षिप्त उत्तर: एक या al aaa में उत्तर दें 5x 2 


(परिभाषाएं, अर्थ, अनुप्रयोग, अंतर, सूची आदि) 


संक्षिप्त नोट्स: 


(विश्लेषण, व्याख्या, समझना, 


निबंध / स्थिति: 


संक्षिप्तीकरण, समझाना) 


40 & 4 5-55 40 अंक 


40 अंक 


20 अंक 


(2 x 40) + (4 X 45) = 35 अंक 


(चर्चा, संप्रयोजन, वर्णन, मूल्यांकन, तुलना और विरोधाभास) 


a) 


URfre—B: अंक तालिका का प्रारूप 


परीक्षा बोर्ड का नाम 


राज्य 


अंक विवरण - एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम 


एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक 


प्रतीक / चिन्ह 


पंजीकरण संख्या 


83 


९4 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


परिशिष्ट--(?: प्रमाणपत्र का प्रारूप (अनंतिम और अंतिम) 


परीक्षा बोर्ड का नाम अभ्यर्थी का 

अतीक जिन्हे अभिप्रमाणित 

प्रतीक / चिन्ह छायाचित्र 

राज्य 
आंशिक पूर्णता का अनंतिम प्रमाणपत्र 

हि नकद कह 2 ec ce tet मन मल मन तन en res परीक्षा बोर्ड एतद्द्वारा प्रमाणित करता है कि ....... 
मर कि के शक मम tte को जनों ४ जननी events ata atte डक कल > कप कल: ७ कब eased need aes 
be मल ence te हक को नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफरी Vener (एनपीएम एडूकेटर) कार्यक्रम में प्रवेश दिया गया 
है ओर पंजीकरण संख्या .....०6003४5-४० ४ Ohalemuenmnense के: साथ दिनाक ५ .५०७०३७थ४३ ३ पैक मिला: को आयोजित परीक्षा में 


इसे आंशिक रूप से पूरा करने पर विधिवत नियुक्त परीक्षकों द्वारा अनंतिम प्रमाणपत्र प्राप्त करने के लिए योग्य प्रमाणित 


किया गया है। 


बोर्ड की मुहर 


स्थान: 


तिथि: रजिस्ट्रार सचिव » अध्यक्ष 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 85 


प्रतीक / चिन्ह 
परीक्षा बोर्ड का नाम अभ्यर्थी का 
अभिप्रमाणित छायाचित्र 
राज्य 
आंशिक पूर्णता का अनंतिम प्रमाणपत्र 

मा ate eet परीक्षा बोर्ड एतदद्वारा प्रमाणित करता है कि ....... 

कक सक नर पक जि ललर मे के की की कम की जीत ४ Air ns Ce eR Ree YD RT TE  पदप पत प 

shies ee eens nee को नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर (एनपीएम एडूकेटर) कार्यक्रम में प्रवेश दिया गया 

हैं! ओर गजीकरंण संख्या ...6०>उ>कर जल जज 250 का शाथ/ दिनाक cae ee को आयोजित परीक्षा में 


इसे आंशिक रूप से पूरा करने पर विधिवत नियुक्त परीक्षकों द्वारा अनंतिम प्रमाणपत्र प्राप्त करने के लिए योग्य प्रमाणित 


किया गया है। 
बोर्ड की मुहर 
स्थान: 
तिथि: रजिस्ट्रार सचिव » अध्यक्ष 


बोर्ड की मुहर 


86 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


प्रमाणपत्र का प्रारूप - अंतिम प्रमाणपत्र 


परीक्षा बोर्ड का नाम 
अभ्यर्थी का 
राज्य अभिप्रमाणित 


प्रतीक / चिन्ह छायाचित्र 
डिप्लोमा प्रमाणपत्र 


नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफरी प्रशिक्षक 


eae eee ee eee कह eee en ene eee परीक्षा बोर्ड एतद्द्वारा प्रमाणित करता है 
गा ee ae को जन्मे / जनमी ................................................................................................ 
ee ee ee ne ee ee को नर्स प्रेक्टिशनर मिडवाइफरी एडूकेटर (एनपीएम एडूकेटर) 
कार्यक्रम में प्रवेश दिया गया है और पंजीकरण संख्या .......................................----- के जाय दिनाक ०२०० 
हित मे नम मम को आयोजित परीक्षा में इसे seal प्रमाणपत्र प्राप्त करने के लिए योग्य प्रमाणित किया गया है। 


बोर्ड की मुहर 


स्थान: 


तिथि: रजिस्ट्रार सचिव » अध्यक्ष 


[भागता--खण्ड 4] 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 87 


परिशिष्ट--2: ओएससीई कौशल सूची 


बुनियादी (बेसिक) कौशल 


प्रसवपूर्व आंकलन: ईडीडी की गणना 


प्रसवपूर्व आंकलन: गर्भावस्‍था परीक्षण किट का उपयोग 
करते हुए गर्भावस्‍था का पता लगाना 


प्रसवपूर्व जांच: रक्तचाप मापना 

प्रसवपूर्व जांच: नाड़ी मापना 

गर्भावस्‍था के दारान पेट की जांच 

प्रयोगशाला जांच: रक्‍त परीक्षण — हीमोग्लोबिन 
प्रयोगशाला जांच: शर्करा के लिए मूत्र परीक्षण 
प्रयोगशाला जांच: प्रोटीन के लिए मूत्र परीक्षण 
प्रयोगशाला जांच: मलेरिया के लिए आरडीटी 

. ग्लूकोज चैलेंज परीक्षण / ग्लूकोज टॉलरेंस परीक्षण 
. प्रसवपूर्व सामान्य जांच 

. टो.टी. का इंजैक्शन लगाना 

. प्रसवपूर्व महिला को परामर्श देना 

. प्रसव कक्ष/इकाई की स्थापना 


. प्रसव के पहले चरण के दौरान alec: नैदानिक श्रोणी 
सहित श्रोणी (पीवी) परीक्षण 


_ प्रसव के दौरान दर्द प्रबंधन — गैर-औषधीय 

. प्रसव के दूसरे चरण के दौरान आंकलन और देखभाल: 
सामान्य प्रसव कराना 

. प्रसव के तीसरे चरण के दौरान आंकलन और देखभाल: 
सक्रिय प्रबंधन 


. नवजात शिशु की आवश्यक देखभाल 


. नाल की जांच 
- नवजात शिशु का आंकलन एवं वनज करना 


. नवजात शिशु टीकाकरण - बीसीजी, हेपेटाइटिस बी 
dai लगाना 


. प्रसव के चौथे चरण के दौरान देखभाल 
. शिशु स्नान 

. पेरिनियल / एपीसीओटॉमी देखभाल 

- स्तन की देखभाल 

. प्रसवोत्तर महिला को परामर्श देना 


. मौखिक गर्भ निरोधक गोलियों का वितरण 


उन्नत (एडवांस्ड) कौशल 
प्रसवरपर्व जटिलताओं का प्रबंधन: प्री-एक्लेम्पसिया और 
एक्लेम्पसिया 
Sey, इंजैक्शन लगाना 
गर्भावस्‍था में रक्‍तस्राव की पहचान एवं प्रबंधन 


कार्डियोटोकोग्राफी (सीटीजी) / नॉन-स्ट्रेस टैस्ट 
(एनएसटी) / कॉनट्रेक्शन we cee (सीएसटी) की तैयारी 
तथा रिकॉर्डिंग 


प्रसव के पहले चरण के दौरान Bleeds: Wels की 
प्लॉटिंग 


अंतर्गर्भाशयी जटिलताएं: पहचान और प्रबंधन 

नवजात शिशु को पुनः: होश में लाना 

कंगारू जैसी मातृत्व देखभाल 

कम संदंश ऑपरेशन की तैयारी करना और निष्पादित 
करना 


. ब्रीच डिलीवरी का संचालन करना 


. पीपीएच का प्रारंभिक प्रबंधन: ऑक्सीटासिन ड्रिप की 


तैयारी और प्रशासन 


. पीपीएच का प्रारंभिक प्रबंधन: गर्भाशय का द्वि-हस्तीय 


संपीडन 


. एटोनिक गर्भाशय के लिए बैलून टैम्पोनैड 
. पीपीएच के लिए महाधमनीय संपीड़न 


. अंतःशिरा के माध्यम से तरल पदार्थ और इलेक्ट्रोलाइट्स 


का निर्धारण और प्रशासन 


. नाल को हाथ से निकालना 

. कंथीटेराइजेशन - प्लेन कैथेटर 

. कैथीटेराइजेशन - इनड्वैलिंग कंथेटर 
. प्ट लाइन की शुरुआत 


. पेरिनियल एवं वेजिनल टीयर्स की मरम्मत (टद्वित्तीय डिग्री 


तक) 


. प्रसूति आघात की पहचान एवं प्राथमिक चिकित्सा प्रबंधन 
. प्रसवोत्तर जटिलताओं का प्रबंधन 

. ऑक्सीजन प्रशासन 

. फोटोथेरेपी आर वेंटिलेटर पर नवजात शिशु की देखभाल 
. पीपीआईयूसीडी / पीएआईयूसीडी को लगाना और हटाना 


88 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IHI—SECc.4] 


बुनियादी (बेसिक) कौशल उन्नत (एडवांस्ड) कौशल 


. प्रसवोत्तर परिवार नियोजन पर परामर्श . मैनुअल वैक्यूम एस्पिरेशन संपादित करना 

. परिवार नियोजन पर परामर्श - विधि विशिष्ट . गर्भपात के बाद देखभाल 

. गर्भपात के बाद परामर्श . आईयूसीडी प्रविष्टि -- अंतराल 

. स्तन स्व-परीक्षण पर परामर्श . ty ore 

. एसिटिक एसिड / आयोडीन के साथ दृश्टिक निरीक्षण 


“कुल 5 कौशल - प्रत्येक ओएससीई सत्र के लिए 3 बुनियादी (बेसिक) और 2 oa (एडवांस्ड) कौशल 
चुने जाते हैं। 
URE: ओएससीई अंक तालिका 


ओएससीई परीक्षा योजना और संकलन पत्रक 


(बाह्य परीक्षा) 

परीक्षा केंद्र का नाम 
परीक्षा का नाम : प्रथम / द्वितीय / अंतिम परीक्षा 
तिथि 
छात्रों की कुल संख्या : 30 
प्रति स्टेशन समय : 40 मिनट 
कुल अवधि : 6 घंटे (4 घंटे सुबह, 2 घंटे शाम) 
मूल्य निर्धारक है." 

2. 

3. 

4. 

5. 
परीक्षा नियंत्रक 
मुख्य अधीक्षक 

क्र.सं. स्टेशन श्रेणी कौशल आंकलन अंक 


~ 
~ 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 89 


a ट बुनियादी (बेसिक) 20 


कुल अंक 400,// 5 = 20 अंक 


ओएससीई संकलन waa 


परीक्षा केंद्र का नाम 


परीक्षा का नाम : प्रथम / द्वितीय / अंतिम परीक्षा 

तिथि - 

आवंटित छात्रों का रोल नंबर :...............................-.....- से ........................-....--....---- तक 
छात्रों की कुल संख्या : आवंटित: उपस्थित: 


ओएससीई स्टेशन की कुल संख्या :बुनियादी कौशल - 03 उन्‍नत कौशल - 02 
ओएससीई स्कोर सारांश शीट : 


ओएससीई स्टेशन का नाम 


पंजीकरण संख्या (400 में से)।| (20 में से) 


कि eee eee 


परीक्षा नियंत्रक के हस्ताक्षर मुख्य अधीक्षक के हस्ताक्षर 
परिशिष्ट--< प्रत्यक्ष अवलोकित व्यावहारिक परीक्षा के लिए आंकलन प्रपत्र 
परीक्षा केंद्र का नाम 
एनपीएम प्रशिक्षक कार्यक्रम 
प्रायोगिक परीक्षा के लिए आंकलन प्रपत्र - प्रथम /द्वितीय / अंतिम परीक्षा 
(आंतरिक परीक्षक, बाह्य परीक्षक और मेडिकल प्रीसेप्टर के लिए एक-समान लेकिन अलग--अलग फॉर्म) 


परीक्षक: आंतरिक / बाह्य / मेडिकल प्रीसेप्टर 


SEC.4] 


[PART III 


: EXTRAORDINARY 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA 


90 


ie” 


a a ४०७ "ee 


परीक्षक के हस्ताक्षर 


बाह्य व्यावहारिक परीक्षा समेकन शीट 


परीक्षा केंद्र का नाम 


प्रथम / द्वितीय / अंतिम 


ओएससीई — 


परीक्षा का नाम 


डीओपी - 


परीक्षा की तिथियां 


[भागवता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 9] 


आवंटित छात्रों का रोल नंबर eee fete ee से ................ 
मा तक 
छात्रों की कल संख्या : आवंटित: उपस्थित: 


peers eer werner आंतरिक बाह्य मेडिकल 
Pe: परीक्षक परीक्षक प्रीसेप्टर डी 


अधिकतम अंक 30 90 /3-30 


७3 
Q| 


कुल योग 


= 
= 


—_ 


आंतरिक परीक्षक बाह्य परीक्षक मेडिकल प्रीसेप्टर 
स्थान: 
तिथि: 
मुहरः 
मुख्य अधीक्षक के हस्ताक्षर 
(प्रधानाचार्य / कार्यक्रम समन्वयक /संकाय प्रशिक्षक) 
परिशिष्ट-शाा 
नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर इन मिडवाइफरी (एनपीएम) प्रशिक्षक 
और 
नर्स प्रैक्टिशनर मिडवाइफ 
के लिए 
अभ्यास का दायरा 
एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू और भारतीय उपचर्या परिषद्‌ द्वारा तैयार दस्तावेज (जून 2024) 
संदर्भ: एमओएचएफडब्ल्यू और आईएनसी वेबसाइटों पर उपलब्ध है 


92 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


INDIAN NURSING COUNCIL 
NOTIFICATION 
New Delhi, the l6th February, 2024 


Indian Nursing Council {Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) Educator Program}, Regulations, 2023 


F.No. -4/2022-INC(i).—In exercise of the powers conferred by sub-section (l) of Section 6 of Indian 


Nursing Council Act, 947 (XLVIII of 947), as amended from time to time, the Indian Nursing Council hereby 
makes the following regulations, namely: — 


l. SHORT TITLE AND COMMENCEMENT 


i. 


il. 


These Regulations may be called the Indian Nursing Council {Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) 
Educator Program}, Regulations, 2023. 


These shall come into force on the date of notification of the same in the Official Gazette of India. 


2. DEFINITIONS 


In these Regulations, unless the context otherwise requires 


L. 


il. 


‘the Act’ means the Indian Nursing Council Act, 947 (XLVIII of 947) as amended from time to time; 


‘the Council’ means the Indian Nursing Council constituted under the Act; 


ili. ‘BEmONC’ means Basic Emergency Obstetric and Newborn Care; 

. ‘DOP’ means Directly Observed Practical; 

. ‘Gol’ means Government of India; 

i. ‘HDU’ means High Dependency Unit; 

i. ‘ICM’ means International Confederation of Midwives; 

. ‘ICU’ means Intensive Care Unit; 

. ‘IMNCI means Integrated Management of Neonatal Childhood Illnesses; 

. ‘LaQshya’ means Labor Room and Maternity Operation Theatre Quality Improvement Initiative; 
i. ‘MCQ’ means Multiple Choice Questions; 

i. ‘MLCC’ means Midwife-led Continuity of Care; 

. ‘MLCUs’ means Midwife-led Care Units; 

. ‘MMR’ means Maternal Mortality Rate; 

. ‘MoHFW’ means the Ministry of Health & Family Welfare, Government of India; 
i. ‘NMTI means National Midwifery Training Institute; 

. ‘NPM’ means Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery; 

. ‘OBG’ means Obstetrics and Gynecology; 

. ‘OPD’ means Out Patient Department; 

. ‘OT’ means Operation Theatre; 

i. “QMNC’ means Quality Maternal and Newborn Care; 

. ‘RMNCH ’ means Reproductive, Maternal and Newborn Child Health; 

. ‘RN&RM’ means a Registered Nurse and Registered Midwife (RN&RM) and denotes a nurse who has 


completed successfully, recognised Bachelor of Nursing (B.Sc. Nursing) or Diploma in General Nursing 
and Midwifery (GNM) course, as prescribed by the Council and is registered in a SNRC as Registered 
Nurse and Registered Midwife; 


. ‘SBL’ means Scenario-based Learning; 
. ‘SDA’ means Safe Delivery App; 
. ‘SDGs’ means Sustainable Development Goals; 


. ‘SMTI means State Midwifery Training Institute; 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 93 


XXvill. ‘SNRC’ means the State Nurse and Midwives Registration Council, by whichever name constituted, by the 
respective State Governments; 


xxix. ‘UHC’ means Universal Health Coverage; 
xxx. ‘UNFPA’ means United Nations Population Fund; 
Xxxl. ‘WHO’ means World Health Organisation. 
NURSE PRACTITIONER IN MIDWIFERY (NPM) EDUCATOR PROGRAM! 
l. INTRODUCTION AND BACKGROUND 
.l Introduction 


In 205, India became one of the !93 countries to commit to the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs), which 
aim to transform the world by 2030 to a more prosperous, more equal, and more secure planet for all. Needless to say, 
India’s responsibility is immense as these ambitious goals cannot be achieved without accelerating progress in one- 
sixth of the world that resides in our country. 


Health is central to commitments made by the Government of India. For us to be able to ensure healthy lives and 
promote wellbeing for all at all ages, it is critical to focus on improving our core health indicators, which include 
maternal and infant mortality. 


When a pregnant woman enters the health system, she puts her faith in the system to receive high quality services 
for herself and her newborn. Responding to this faith India has strengthened maternal and child health services in our 
country under the National Health Mission. India has made tremendous progress over the last few decades in 
increasing institutional deliveries through the National Health Mission and schemes like the Janani Suraksha Yojana 
and Janani Shishu Suraksha Karyakram, and this has greatly reduced the maternal and infant mortality. India’s 
maternal mortality ratio has declined from 254 per lakh live births in 2004-06 to 30 per lakh live births in 204-6 
(Sample Registration System). India has shown impressive gains in reduction of maternal mortality evident from the 
fact that the compound annual rate of decline of MMR has increased significantly from 5.8% during (2007-09 to 
20-3) to 8.0!% (20I-3 to 20l4-6). Similar achievements are also visible in reduction of under-five and infant 
mortality rates. 


Investments on maternal and child health remain a key focus area under the National Health Mission. 
Operationalizing First Referral Units, new Maternal and Child Health Wings, Obstetric High Dependency Units and 
Intensive Care Units; capacity building initiatives such as Dakshata trainings; quality antenatal care strengthening 
programs such as the Pradhan Mantri Surakshit Matritva Abhiyan etc. continue to be a key priority. 


In addition to above, the Government of India has recently launched the LaQshya - Labor Room and Maternity 
Operation Theatre Quality Improvement Initiative. Substantial global evidence exists that addressing the time around 
and immediately after childbirth is critical for saving the lives of mothers and newborns. Studies conducted by White 
Ribbon Alliance have also highlighted the need to focus on respectful maternity care. The LaQshya program has thus 
been launched to provide quality intrapartum and immediate postpartum care and promote respectful maternity care. 


Despite the tremendous progress, nearly 32,000 pregnant women each year still lose their lives during pregnancy, 
childbirth and the postnatal period. In addition, 5,90,000 newborns die every year in the first month of life. Additional 
efforts are needed in India to increase Universal Health Coverage (UHC) and to achieve Sustainable Development 
Goals (SDGs) for maternal and newborn and child health. The National Health Policy 20!7 aims at the reduction of 
maternal mortality ratio to l00 per lakh live births by 2020. 


The survival of women and newborns is closely correlated with the care and attention received during pregnancy 
and, most importantly, at the time of delivery. Delayed management of cases, due to lack of access to skilled care, is 
one of the major reasons for the deaths, particularly in the rural areas. Skilled and respectful care during childbirth is 
important because millions of women and newborns develop serious and hard to predict complications before, during 
or immediately after delivery. 


Evidence shows that quality midwifery care, provided by midwives educated to international standards, reduces 
maternal and newborn mortality and stillbirth rates by 83%. And with 56 improved maternal and newborn health 
outcomes, it is also evident that 87% services can be delivered by midwives educated to international standards. There 
also has been an increasing body of evidence globally that Midwife-led Care Units (MLCUs) can address maternal 
and neonatal mortality and morbidity by promoting quality and continuity of care through provision of women -centric 
care and promoting natural births. Where a model of Midwife-led Continuity of Care (MLCC) is introduced, this 
reduces preterm birth by 24%. Beyond survival, quality midwifery care improves breastfeeding rates and psychosocial 


'This document has been developed by Ministry of Health & Family Welfare, Government of India and the Indian Nursing Council in 
collaboration with the International Confederation of Midwives and based on inputs from the curriculum sub-committee of the National 
Midwifery Task Force. 


94 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


outcomes, and reduces the use of unnecessary interventions, in particular caesarean sections and increases access to 
family planning (Lancet Series, 20l4; UNFPA, 20l4 & WHO, 207). 


The International Confederation of Midwives outline the midwifery philosophy and model of care’. Midwifery 
has a unique body of knowledge, skills and professional attitudes drawn from disciplines shared by other health 
professions such as science and sociology, but practised by midwives within a professional framework of autonomy, 
partnership, ethics and accountability. Midwifery is an approach to care of women and their newborn infants whereby 
midwives optimise the normal biological, psychological, social and cultural processes of childbirth and early life of 
the newborn; work in partnership with women, respecting the individual circumstances and views of each woman; 
promote women’s personal capabilities to care for themselves and their families; and collaborate with midwives and 
other health professionals as necessary to provide holistic care that meets each woman’s individual needs. Midwifery 
care is provided by an autonomous midwife. 


.2 The ‘Midwifery Services Initiative’ of India 


Considering the need for trained human resources to provide quality care to 30 million pregnancies every year in 
India and at the same time recognizing the challenges earlier, Government of India has proposed an alternative model 
of service provision for strengthening reproductive, maternal and neonatal health services by nurse practitioners in 
midwifery through MLCUs. Quality maternity care provided by midwives through the MLCUs is vital to this 
transformation. The recognition that quality of care will not only save lives but will also provide a positive experience 
of childbirth means that the change required must be transformative. This will require making fundamental change to 
the way services are delivered, and the culture of care provided to women. The ‘Guidelines on Midwifery Services 
in India’ set transformative change must be at the heart of midwifery education. 


The ‘midwifery services initiative’ aims to create a new cadre of midwives titled “Nurse Practitioners in 
Midwifery” (NPM) who are skilled in accordance with ICM competencies, knowledgeable and capable of providing 
compassionate women centered, reproductive, maternal and newborn child health services (RMNCH) and to develop 
an enabling environment for integration of this cadre into the public health system in order to achieve the SDGs for 
maternal and newborn health (MoHFW, 208). 


.3 Preparing Nurse Practitioners in Midwifery (NPM) and NPM Educators for the future of India 


Quality education is essential to prepare international-standard midwives with ICM competencies with the 
knowledge and skills to provide the full scope of care that women and newborns need. Evidence indicates that the 
optimum duration of training required to acquire needed midwifery skills and competencies is |8 months. The existing 
one-year Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery Post Basic Diploma Program of the Council is re-designed and upgraded to 
an |8-month intensive residency program to develop more NPMs for providing respectful, highest standards of quality 
and evidence-based care at the institutional and community levels with specific emphasis on providing safe and 
competent midwifery care. The essential components for quality midwifery based on the Quality Maternal and 
Newborn Care (QMNC) framework is also integrated in the curriculum. 


The Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) will be responsible for promotion of health of women throughout 
their life cycle, with special focus on women during their childbearing years and their newborns. He/She will be 
responsible for care during preconception, pregnancy, childbirth, and post-natal period and care of newborn. He/She 
will be responsible and accountable for her practice. The NPM will practice independently and collaboratively with 
the doctors in the hospital and within the existing peripheral health system consisting of skilled birth attendants, 
auxiliary nurse midwives, nurses, doctors and specialists. Midwife-led Care Units would be established at high case 
load facilities. Midwives posted in these MLCUs would be expected to handle the low risk and normal births and will 
also be expected to ensure initial management and stabilization of women with complications before safely referring 
them to doctors for further collaborative management. 


The aspirations and plans for the quality of India’s midwives and their contribution to the transformation of 
RMNCH services in India, call for a midwifery education program that will combine the ability to practice 
autonomously to meet the emotional, social, geographical, physical, medical and personal needs of childbearing 
women, their newborns and families, while shifting the culture of care, learning continuously and working within a 
novel organization of midwife led care. Such education can only be provided by midwifery educators who have 
engaged in a curriculum based on international standards and that supports relationship building, critical thinking, 
reflection, creativity and a good understanding of theory from midwifery and health sciences and apply to judgment, 
problem solving, diagnostic, communication and clinical skills that are basic to midwifery. 


Therefore, it is necessary to train a pool of nurse practitioner in midwifery (NPM) educators with the ability to 
train nurse practitioners in midwifery as per the WHO/ICM competencies and regulations of the Council. It is 
essential that midwifery educators are well versed with these competencies before they take their role as educators in 


*https://www.internationalmidwives.org/assets/files/definitions-files/208/06/eng-philosophy-and-model-of-midwifery-care.pdf 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 95 


order to bring about transformation in the midwifery services provided by the NPMs. The need for this transformative 
change and the paradigm shift of maternity care must be at the heart of education for midwife educators who will be 
leaders in the change and ensure the sustainability of education into practice. 


Responding to this urgent need, the NPM educator curriculum is designed in line with WHO midwifery educator 
core competencies alongside ICM competencies, that emphasize humanizing transformation and autonomous role of 
midwives. The curriculum is developed in four course modules, MODULE I: Preparing midwives for relationship 
based and transformative midwifery care, MODULE II: Preparing midwives for care during pregnancy, birth and 
puerperium, MODULE III: Preparing midwives to lead, manage and supervise quality midwifery care, MODULE IV: 
Preparing midwives for evidence-based midwifery practices. It aims to strengthen the technical knowledge, clinical 
skills and facilitation skills of the midwifery educators alongside role modeling the core values underpinning the 
midwifery practice. The midwifery educator program prepares competent NPM educators, who can effectively 
educate and train NPMs to provide quality, compassionate, women-centered, respectful care to woman, neonate and 
family. The program will also equip the NPM educators in leadership, supervision and management skills and enable 
them to understand and utilize the research end evidence relevant to midwifery practice. 


2. PHILOSOPHY AND VISION 
2.l Philosophy 


The Council believes that registered nurses need to be given additional education and training to work as nurse 
practitioners in midwifery (NPMs) in clinical and community settings in the present context of emerging expanded 
and specialist roles of nurses and advances in technology. Strengthening midwifery education is fundamental to 
quality midwifery and that the NPM educators need to be trained to international standards before they take their role 
as educators in order to bring about transformation in terms of humanization and autonomous role in the midwifery 
services provided by the NPMs. 


The Council believes that competency-based training would enable the nurse practitioner in midwifery (NPM) 
educators to demonstrate knowledge, skills and behaviors based on sound evidence-based knowledge, focusing on the 
concept of ‘women-centered and respectful care’ that is central to midwifery practice. To achieve a respectful 
environment and to develop students’ knowledge and practice of the relationship-based care that is central to 
midwifery practice, there is also an emphasis on the student-teacher relationship, communication and attention to 
power relationships (Cranton, 2009) and emphasis on the role and responsibility of the educator to shape educational 
experiences for developing the next generation of practitioners (Biesta, 20I5). The trained educators will be able to 
combine their knowledge, attitude and skills with interpersonal and cultural competencies to work independently as 
well as collaboratively with the inter-professional team. 


The curriculum for NPM educators, who will play a critical part in developing midwifery into the future and 
provide ongoing leadership, will therefore need to develop the ability to be responsive to this much-needed radical and 
complex transformative change, in educating and making fit for practice this new cadre of educated, skilled and 
compassionate midwives who are prepared for autonomous role in providing midwifery led care for the future of 
India. 


Therefore, the NPM educator curriculum philosophy is based on the idea of transformative learning centred on 
critical reflection, problem-posing and dialogue, as well as attention to praxis (reflection/action/dialectic). The 
teaching learning approaches will integrate adult learning principles, competency-based education, collaborative 
learning, experiential learning, mastery learning and self-directed learning. Teaching and learning will be led by 
midwifery educators supported by medical faculty from Obstetrics and Gynecology, Pediatrics and Public Health for 
collaborative and interdisciplinary learning as required. 


The Council believes that the NPM educators involved in training the nurse practitioners in midwifery should be 
competent in all midwifery skills (knowledge, attitude and practice), well qualified to lead by example in the clinical 
field and support the management and implementation of the NPM training across the country. 


The Council also believes that a variety of innovative educational strategies can be used in the clinical settings to 
provide best clinical learning experiences. It is hoped to facilitate developing policies towards creation of cadre 
positions for appropriate placement of these NPMs to function in midwifery lead care units. 


2.2 Vision 


The program aims to prepare midwifery educators who are able to engage students in transformative education, 
with a vision for midwifery and midwifery education for India, who meet the WHO competencies for midwifery 
educators, and lead development of the midwifery practice and scholarship, through education and research. 


96 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


3. AIM & OBJECTIVES 
3.l Aim 


The aim of this educational program is to prepare competent NPM educators to function in the capacity of 
educators and trainers for nurse practitioners in midwifery, to provide quality and compassionate care to woman, 
newborn, and family, manage and supervise care of woman and newborn at all the three levels of care, teach NPMs in 
areas related to woman and newborn care using latest educational technology and prepare them to conduct or 
participate in research areas of woman and newborn care. 


3.2 Objectives 
The program prepares NPM educators to - 
l. Develop and provide transformational education and leadership. 
2. Demonstrate achievement of the WHO Midwifery Educator Competencies (20]3a). 


3. Demonstrate achievement of the ICM Essential Competencies for Midwifery Practice and practice midwifery as 
per the Council regulations and MoHFW guidelines. 


4. Role model skilled, woman-centered, compassionate, respectful midwifery care that meets the needs of women, 
their newborns and families, and the communities they live in. 


5. Demonstrate the ability to use experiential learning methodologies to teach NPMs that prepare NPMs who will 
practice autonomously within the scope of practice in designated midwife-led services in India. 


6. Show a commitment to humanization, professional development, lifelong learning, and leadership in the practice 
of midwifery. 


4. CURRICULUM CONCEPTUAL MODEL 


The conceptual model places relationships (woman/newborn, educator/student) at the heart of the midwifery 
educator curriculum as the program seeks to equip educators who will drive the aspirations for a positive childbirth 
experience in India. The curriculum will reinforce or model woman-centered care by also placing the student at the 
center of learning. A transformative, competency-based experiential learning approach will equip midwives to become 
educators who will promote quality midwifery care to address the needs of women in India. Quality midwifery care 
and transformative midwifery education are underpinned by ICM essential midwifery competencies (ICM, 20I9) and 
WHO Midwifery educator competencies (WHO, 20]3). 


The content, values and philosophy that form this program are informed by current pedagogical best practice. 
Advancements in learning and teaching show that student learning is enhanced when students are immersed in an 
intensive experience based on experiential/theoretical learning, with support for professional and personal self- 
reflection. It is essential that NPM educator receive and provide respectful education, including role modeling 
respectful behavior while educating and communicating with students in both classroom and clinical practice 
settings, in order to teach respectful maternity care attitudes. The model is illustrated in Figure | below: 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 97 


en IN| \WEWilbw FER VE, 
०0 
८६ 


Figure |. Curriculum Conceptual Model 


The curriculum focuses on preparing Midwifery Educators attuned to the core values, integrated concepts 
and maternity care priorities weaved into the curriculum for Nurse Practitioners in Midwifery so that the 
educators are empowered and capable of providing the transformational education to the upcoming Midwives. 
The core values, integrated concepts and maternity care priorities weaved into the NPM Educator and NPM 
curriculums are outlined below: 


4. Core Values 


The core values provide a foundation to develop midwives who are committed to promoting a positive childbirth 
experience for all women and were derived from core government, WHO and ICM documents. These values include: 
(i) compassion, (ii) respect, (iii) woman, baby and family-centredness, (iv) equity and rights, (v) collaboration 
and teamwork, (vi) ethical practice, (vii) moral courage. 


4.2 Integrated Concepts 


Within the curriculum there are seven concepts which represent key approaches that inform contemporary 
midwifery practice. These concepts include: (i) social inequities and midwives as primary health practitioners, (ii) 
evidence-based midwifery practice, (iii) cultural competence, (iv) quality maternity and newborn care, (v) 
continuity of midwifery care, (vi) midwifery as a relationship between a woman, baby, family and a midwife, 
(vii) optimizing physiological birth, (viii) community knowledge. 


4.3 Maternity Care Priorities 


The program provides a strong focus on identified maternity care needs and priorities which are addressed across 
the curriculum, e.g., (i) improving maternity and newborn care for vulnerable and hard to reach women, (ii) 
reducing maternal and newborn mortality and morbidity, (iii) effective management of emergency care, (iv) 
Human rights and gender-based violence, (v) strengthening midwifery-led care, (vi) humanising and de- 
medicalising birth. 


5. QUALITIES OF NPM EDUCATOR 


The NPM Educator graduating from this program will be an educator, leader and practitioner of midwifery, with 
an in-depth understanding of midwifery, its role in primary health care, how midwifery could/should evolve in India, 
the impact on midwifery on women and their families, and how education will enable this. The values of woman- 
centered care, student-centered teaching, equity and justice, human and reproductive rights, and compassion 
for others, will be foundational for practice. Midwife educators for the future of India will have vision, leadership 
qualities, the courage to question, and the ability to form collaborative working relationships to achieve change 
particularly in changing the existing paradigm of physician led midwifery care to a new paradigm of midwife led care. 


96 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IHI—SEC.4] 


6. SCOPE OF PRACTICE 


On completion of the educational program, the NPM educator will be certified by the Examination Boards 
approved by the Council and get registered as additional qualification at the SNRC. The NPM educators will ensure 
the implementation of Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) program and provide education and training to those 
who enroll for the course at the State Midwifery Training Institutes. The NPM educator will also practice midwifery 
in all settings including hospitals and health centers particularly in midwife led care units (MLCUs), utilizing the 
knowledge and clinical competencies acquired during the training, alongside mentorship support in strengthening the 
clinical midwifery competencies. The NPM educator will be able to perform full scope of practice as per education 
and training and the Council regulations and MoHFW guidelines (Annexure-VIID. 


The specific roles of the NPM educator and midwifery practitioner are listed in the Annexure-I. 
7. COMPETENCIES 


The Council adapts WHO Core Competencies for Midwifery Educators (WHO, 20]3) in educating and training 
midwifery educators for India with minor modifications in the competencies relevant to NPM program and the 
framework is given below: It also adapts ICM Essential competencies for midwifery practice (20l9) found in 
Annexure-II. 


i 
Ethical and 
legal 
principles of 
midwifery 2. 
Midwifery 
practice 


7 


Communication, Competency : 
3. Theoretical 


learning 


leadership and in Midwifery 
advocacy education 


6. 
Organization 4. Learning 
management in clinical 
and 5, area 
supervision Assessment 
हा and 
evaluation of 
students and 
program 


Figure 2. NPM Educator Competencies 
The competencies are organized under 8 competency domains with a total of 28 competencies for all the domains. 
Competency Domain |: Ethical and legal principles of midwifery 


Midwifery educators incorporate and promote ethical and legal aspects of midwifery care in teaching/ learning 
activities and by consistent role modelling. 


Competencies: 


l.] Demonstrate professional accountability for the delivery of midwifery care as per the Council standards that are 
consistent with moral, altruistic and humanistic principles in midwifery practice. 


.2 Demonstrate understanding of the legal and regulatory principles in midwifery practice within the legal 
framework of India. 


.3 Demonstrate understanding of midwifery philosophy of care focused on respectful maternity care placing the 
woman’s sexual and reproductive health rights at the center of the care process. 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 99 


Competency Domain 2: Midwifery practice 


Midwifery educators maintain current knowledge and skills in midwifery theory and practice based on the best 
evidence available. 


Competencies: 


2.l Demonstrate knowledge, attitude and skills as per the ICM competencies adopted by the Council to practice 
midwifery. 


2.2 Provide care for normal birth and pregnancy. 
2.3 Demonstrate skills in providing safe, competent and effective midwifery care to women and their neonates. 
2.4 Practice midwifery that reflects evidence based and up-to-date knowledge. 
2.5 Demonstrate respect and empathy towards mother, family and society at all levels of care. 
Competency Domain 3: Theoretical learning 
Midwifery educators create an environment that facilitates learning. 
Competencies: 


3.l Incorporate educational strategies to enhance active learning to develop students’ critical thinking, critical 
reasoning skills and innovative thinking. 


3.2 Select and use effective and appropriate teaching and learning resources. 


3.3 Demonstrate skill in providing competency-based skill training using simulation for the students of the NPM 
course. 


3.4 Recognize and support the learning styles and unique learning needs of NPM students. 
Competency Domain 4: Learning in clinical area 

Midwifery educators maintain an environment for effective clinical teaching of midwifery care. 
Competencies: 
4.] Facilitate a safe and effective clinical learning environment. 
4.2 Promote individualized experiential learning. 
4.3 Demonstrate skills in clinical education and training. 
Competency Domain 5: Assessment and evaluation of students and program 

Midwifery educators conduct regular monitoring and evaluation of students and programs. 
Competencies: 
5.] Assess student competency using various assessment strategies, tools and maintain accurate records. 
5.2 Monitor, assess and evaluate the effectiveness of the NPM program. 
Competency Domain 6: Organization, management and supervision 

Midwifery educators organize and implement the NPM curriculum effectively. 
Competencies: 
6.] Participate actively in planning and organizing the NPM curriculum. 
6.2 Implement the NPM curriculum effectively and provide feedback for quality improvement. 
6.3 Provide facility-based mentoring for the NPM’s after placement. 
Competency Domain 7: Communication, leadership and advocacy 

Midwifery educators communicate effectively and function as advocates, change agents and leaders. 
Competencies: 
7.. Demonstrate effective communication using variety of methods in diverse care delivery settings. 
7.2 Demonstrate cultural competence in course design and development and teaching and midwifery practice. 


7.3 Function as leaders and change agents to improve midwifery education and practice. 


l00 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


7.4 Use a variety of advocacy strategies to promote midwifery education and practice. 
7.5 Participate in professional development activities relevant to midwifery education. 
Competency Domain 8: Research 
Midwifery educators promote the use of research and use it to inform midwifery education and practice. 
Competencies: 
8.l Use research and inform teaching and practice. 
8.2 Cultivate a culture supporting critical inquiry and evidence-based practice. 
6.3 Train NPM’s to develop skills to conduct, communicate and utilize research. 
8. PROGRAM DETAILS 
8.l Program Description 


The NPM educator training is a six month’s residency program with a main focus on competency-based 
training facilitated by mastery and experiential learning centered around transformational and relationship-based 
teaching and learning. The curriculum comprises of four course modules, MODULE I|: Preparing midwives for 
relationship based and transformative midwifery care, MODULE II: Preparing midwives for care during pregnancy, 
birth and puerperium, MODULE III: Preparing midwives to lead, manage and supervise quality midwifery care, 
MODULE IV: Preparing midwives for evidence-based midwifery practices. The curriculum encompasses hands on 
skill training and orientation to the treatment protocols and drugs permitted for use by NPMs trained to function in 
various health care settings. 


This will be followed by a |2-month structured mentorship program where the NPM educators would teach the 
NPM students as well as practice midwifery simultaneously. The NPM educators maintain the logbooks, keep their 
portfolio and reflect on experience during the interaction with the mentor individually or in groups, face to face or 
online. Peer support alongside mentor support is essential component of the mentorship program. A balance of clinical 
and classroom teaching using a variety of teaching methods will be maintained. 


As the program sets the standard of midwifery education in India, it is important that these students engage with a 
program that models contemporary experiential learning. As such the curriculum will be taught incorporating 
experiential and scenario-based learning approaches (Chorazy M. and Klinedinst K. 20I9; Smith et al. 20I8; Kolb 
984; Dewey 938). The curriculum will also utilize a competency-based approach drawing on the eight competency 
domains from the WHO Midwifery Educator Core Competencies (20l3a) and 28 competency statements formulated 
under these domains. It is expected that, upon completion of the course the midwifery educators of this program will 
incorporate the same approaches when they begin teaching the new generation of midwives through the ]8-month 
NPM training. 


8.2 Program Structure 


Practicum (Hours) 


Theory 
Course Modules (Hours) Skills Lab Clinical 
(Hours) (Hours) 
MODULE I: Preparing midwives for relationship based and transformative midwifery 
care 


MODULE II: Preparing midwives for care during pregnancy, birth & puerperium ) 80 


MODULE III: Preparing midwives to lead, manage and supervise quality midwifery | 
care 


MODULE IV: Preparing midwives for evidence-based midwifery practices LS 
Total Hours 40 hours 840 hours 


8.3 Guidelines for Starting the Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery Educator Program 
8.3.l Staffing 


l. Faculty Trainer (Teacher): M.Sc. OBG/Pediatrics/Community Health Nursing with minimum 2 years of 
clinical maternity experience and 5 years of teaching experience. (International Midwifery Educators would be 
engaged along with Indian midwifery faculty trainers for training initial batches). 


2. Medical Preceptors: Medical faculty from Obstetrics and Gynecology, Pediatrics and Public Health with 3 years 
post PG experience/as a consultant. 


3. 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 0] 


Guest Faculty: NHM/MoHFW officials/Experts from other fields. 
Faculty student ratio: |:5 
Preceptor student ratio: :5 


No. of seats: Maximum 30 per batch 


8.3.2 Physical Facilities 


l. 
2: 
Be 


ay 


Classroom - | 
Skills/simulation lab - | with necessary equipment and supplies (Annexure-IID) 


Library - Current nursing textbooks including midwifery, maternal, neonatal & journal (National and 
International publications), relevant GoI guidelines/modules 


Teaching Aids 

e LCD projector 

e Screen for projection 

e Computer 

e Laptop 

e Tablet for IT applications (For ex. Safe Delivery App, e-Partograph and other apps) 
e Connectors to project tab screens to external screen 

e 4 Mbps internet leased line 

e Midwifery related equipment such as Gym balls, Floor mats, Rebose cloth etc. 


Office facilities for educators 


8.3.3 Clinical Facilities 


Minimum Bed strength and other Clinical Facilities: 


00-200 bedded Parent Hospital having minimum 50 maternity beds or 50 bedded maternity hospital with an 
established MLCU 


Labour room as per the LaQshya guidelines of Government of India 

Minimum 6 labour rooms/spaces 

Maternal and neonatal units 

Case load of minimum 6000 deliveries per year 

Maternity OT and Obstetric HDU/ICU 

Separate Kangaroo Mother Care Unit 

8-l0 level II neonatal beds 

Affiliated Heath Sub-Centre, Community Health Centre and Primary Health Centre 
Referral links to tertiary care hospital 

Affiliation to Tertiary Hospital - Medical College Hospital 


Affiliation with level III neonatal beds 


8.4 Admission Requirements 


8.4.l Eligibility for Admission 


The candidate seeking admission to this program should have the following qualifications: 


Be a registered nurse and registered midwife (RN&RM). 


M.Sc. Nursing with specialty in Obstetrics and Gynaecology, Pediatrics or community health with minimum 2 
years of clinical maternity working experience. 


B.Sc. Nursing with Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery with 2 years of clinical experience. 


l02 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


e Inservice candidates are also eligible for admission and will be receiving their regular salary. Being a residency 
program, the other students undergoing the program will be given salary/stipend equivalent to their counterparts 
in the respective organization. 


Note: 


e In the initial batches, any M.Sc./B.Sc. Nursing candidate with a minimum of 5 years of clinical maternity working 
experience, with passion towards midwifery, clinical/hands on experience of conducting deliveries and 
willingness to continue clinical practice and conduct deliveries. Candidates with teaching experience in OBG 
nursing will be given preference. Research experience is an added advantage. 


e The candidate in order to be trained and practicing in midwifery has to obtain registration to practice (RN&RM) 
in the State where enrolled in the NPM educator program. 


8.4.2 Selection Process 
Selection Criteria and Process Overview for Recruitment of Midwifery Educators is outlined below: 


e The entrance will be conducted in two parts with certain percentage weightage for each component. The overall 
score for entrance examination is |00 marks (60 for written test & OSCE and 40 for interview). 


e Part : Written Test and OSCE 


- Written Test (40%): Multiple Choice Questions and two short essays (2 hours duration) covering the areas 
of antenatal, intrapartum, postnatal, complication management and neonatal care. Short essays will be 
screened for technical proficiency as well as fluency in written English. Some weightage should be given for 
proficiency in written English. 


- OSCE - Objectively Structured Clinical Examination (20%): An OSCE bank based on current protocols 
under LaQshya is annexed for reference. 


e Part 2: Interview (40%) 
Successful candidates who clear the written test and OSCE will be screened for the following at the interview: 
l) Motivational Screening (20%) 
Based on the information provided in the personal statement of the candidate: 
a) Passion for woman’s health - to provide respectful care for a positive birthing experience. 


b) Willingness to undergo the 6-month residential course at the designated NMTI in a different State and 2 
months mentorship at their home State in the designated training centre. 


c) Willingness to serve as individual practitioners of midwifery care - low-risk pregnancies and normal 
births as posted after the training. 


d) Willingness to continue with her clinical practice throughout her career, though the distribution between 
teaching and clinical practice may vary depending on the stage of her career. 


e) Commitment to program goals and Gol’s vision of providing quality of care around the time of birth. 
Candidates should have clear understanding of the |8-month training and midwifery-led-model of care. 


2) Aptitude Assessment (20%) will be a part of interview process to ascertain spoken English language 
proficiency and communication, technical knowledge, leadership and advocacy for client’s rights, and team 
spirit. 

8.5 Organization of the Program 
8.5. Distribution of the program in weeks (26 weeks): 


l. Teaching: Theory & Clinical Residency 23 weeks 


2. Examination (including preparation) ] weeks 
3. AL+CL + Public holidays 2 weeks 
26 weeks 


8.5.2 Distribution of the courses for teaching: 23 weeks = 020 hours 
Block Classes (Theory & Skill Lab): 3 weeks = 3 x 40 = 20 hours 
Clinical Residency (Clinical Practice, Theory & Skill Lab): 20 weeks = 20 x 45 = 900 hours 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 03 


Details 


Full Theory Block Classes: 3 weeks x 40 hours per week = [20 hours (Theory 00 hours + Skill Lab 20 hours) 


Clinical Residency (20 weeks): 20 weeks x 45 hours per week = 900 hours (Theory 40 hours + Skills Lab 20 hours + Clinical 
840 hours) 

e 40 hours of theory and 20 hours of skills lab to be integrated during clinical experience. They can be covered in the form of skill 
lab learning, faculty lecture, clinical rounds, clinical presentations, drug presentations etc. (3-4 hours per week for 8 weeks: 
First |0 weeks - 2 hours per week x |0 weeks = 20 hours for skill lab and 2 hours per week x 0 weeks = 20 hours of theory and 
Next 8 weeks - 3 hours per week x 8 weeks = 24 hours of theory). 

e The NPM educators would be posted in different shifts as per the duty roster of the clinical facility in maternity service areas 
only (ANC clinic, Triage, Labour room, Antenatal/postnatal ward, SNCU etc.). 


e Minimum 45 hours per week and on call duties every fortnight should be given. 


Total = 40 hours (theory) + 40 hours (skills lab) + 840 hours (clinical practice) = 020 hours 


8.6 Course of Instruction 


Practicum 
S.No. Courses Theory (Skills Lab + | Areas of Clinical Postings 
Clinical) 
I MODULE I: Preparing midwives for relationship-based SL-5 
and transformative midwifery care CL-0 


SL-2 
CL-5 


Section l: Relational education: preparing midwives for 
relationship-based midwifery care 


Integrated clinical practices 


Section 2: Transformative education: preparing 
midwives for transformative midwifery care (Teaching 
and Learning Approaches) 


Unit : Developing knowledge for practice and putting 
knowledge into practice 
Unit 2: How we learn to be competent - knowledge, skills 
and behaviour for practice 
Unit 3: Experiential and scenario-based learning for 
practice 
Unit 4: Develop educational approaches based on principles 
of adult learning 
CL-3 


Unit 5: Teaching and clinical training skills 
SL-3 


Unit 6: Assessment/Evaluation Methods 3 


II. | MODULE II: Preparing midwives for care during SL-35 

Pregnancy, Birth & Puerperium CL-790 

Section 4: Maternal, Fetal and Newborn Physiology 6 foes fo 
es 


Antenatal OPD/ward 


SL-I 
CL-5 


SL-3 
CL-5 


Integrated clinical 


practices 


— 
N 
a 
_ 


Unit l: Review of anatomy and physiology 
Unit 2: Embryology and Fetal growth and development 
Unit 3: Physiological changes in pregnancy 


SL-2 
CL-450 


Section 2: Normal Pregnancy, Birth and Puerperium 


N 
पा 
_ 


04 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IIJ—SECc.4] 
Practicum 
S.No. Courses Theory (Skills Lab + | Areas of Clinical Postings 
Clinical) 


Unit |: Beginning the pregnancy journey 


SL-I 
CL-40 


Unit 2: Pregnancy assessment and midwifery care during |“ Antenatal OPD/ward 


Trimester 
SL-I 
CL-40 


Unit 3: Midwifery care during 2™ trimester of pregnancy Antenatal OPD/ward 


SL-I 
CL-40 


Unit 4: Midwifery care during 3"¢ trimester of pregnancy Antenatal OPD/ward 


SL-3 
CL-70 


Unit 5: Midwifery care during |* stage of labour Labour room/casualty 


Nn 
se 
Oo 


Unit 6: Midwifery care during 2™ stage of labour Labour room 


CL-40 
SL-2 
CL-70 


Unit 7: Midwifery care during 37 stage of labour Labour room 


SL-I 
CL-70 


Unit 8: Midwifery care during 4" stage of labour Labour room 


Unit 9: Postnatal midwifery care CL-80 Postnatal ward/OPD 


SL-2 
CL-40 


Section 3: Care of the Newborn 


Unit l: Family centered care Postnatal ward 


Unit 2: Ongoing care of newborn CL-0 Postnatal ward/OPD 


SNCU/NICU/Postnatal 
ward/OPD 


] SL-2 Postnatal ward/OPD 
CL-0 
Unit 5: Disease prevention and immunization ] CL-5 Postnatal OPD/Family 
Planning ward/ 
Immunization OPD 
SECTION 4: COMPLEX CARE OF THE WOMEN 22 5].-6 
AND NEWBORN, HEALTHY FAMILIES AND CL-300 
COMMUNITIES 
SL-2 ANC OPD/ANC Ward/ 
CL-70 Obstetric HDU 


SL-4 Labour ward/Obstetric 
CL-70 HDU/Maternity OT 


Unit 3: Risk identification and referral of newborn CL-5 


Unit 4: Nutritional needs of the newborn and establishing 
breastfeeding 


Unit l: Recognition and management of problems during 
pregnancy 


Unit 2: Recognition of deviations from the normal and 
management during labour 


4 SL-4 Postnatal Ward/ Obstetric 


CL-70 HDU 


Unit 3: Recognition and Management of postnatal problems 


SL-3 
CL-50 


Unit 4: Recognition and Management of neonatal problems SNCU/NICU 


SL-3 
CL-40 


Postnatal ward/ 
Family Planning ward 


Unit 5: Healthy families and communities 


SECTION 5: PHARMACOLOGY, INFECTION 


i) 


SL-2 
CONTROL & LEGAL AND ETHICAL ISSUES 


Unit l: Applied pharmacology and fundamentals of 
prescribing 


Unit 2: Infection Control SL-2 Integrated clinical practice 


>) 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 05 


Practicum 
S.No. Courses Theory (Skills Lab + | Areas of Clinical Postings 
Clinical) 


Il. | MODULE III: Preparing midwives to lead, manage and 5 CL-20 
supervise quality midwifery care 
Unit : Midwifery leadership All maternity areas/ 
MH/DH/CHC 
Unit 2: Change theories and transformative practice 
Unit 3: Management of MLCU’s CL-5 
Unit 4: Records and reports CL-5 


Total = 020 hours 40 hours | 40+840 hours 


9. TEACHING AND LEARNING 


Teaching learning within the NPM Educator curriculum draws on Experiential Learning theories. Experiential 
learning recognizes that learning is an active process that occurs as students interact with authentic activities, 
experiences and social encounters. The educational process is underpinned by respect, with educators modelling the 
respectful care and communication that these graduates will engage in with women. The student is intentionally 
situated at the center of learning and becomes directly involved in the process of constructing knowledge. As such, 
experiential learning relies on experience, as the source material and thoughtful reflection to facilitate learning. 
Providing ‘real world’ context to activities and experiences aligns students learning to the types of practice and 
complexities they might encounter as midwifery graduates. Motivation and engagement increase as students work 
with real-life situations that require decision-making that reflect the nature of maternity care environments and 
promote autonomous roles that need to be assumed upon completion of the program and called to lead midwifery care 
in MLCUs. 


Experiential learning is also committed to minimizing the theory-practice gap that has been recognized as a 
challenge in contemporary tertiary health care education. Experiential learning integrates practice with theory, 
avoiding teaching and learning which occurs in silos. As part of the experiential learning pedagogy students will 
engage in significant practice experience through midwifery practicums. Practicums will be organized to reflect a 
diversity of clinical settings across the continuum of childbirth, pre-conception to postpartum and will include hospital 
and community settings. Students will also be required to engage in defined continuity of care experiences where they 
follow women through their pregnancy, labour, birth and puerperium. 


Complementing experiential learning in this program is scenario-based learning (SBL) and reflective practice. 
SBL uses scenarios which reflect realistic situations, for example they may be based on case studies, critical incidents 
or narratives, which provide contextual material and/or learning triggers and provide an ideal environment for 
exploring practice, complexities and encourage critical thinking, problem solving and decision-making skills. The 
learning processes in SBL moves through phases that requires students to engage in the scenario, analyze the situation, 
identify learning needs, construct knowledge, reflect and apply learning. Scenario based learning is best provided 
through tutorials and flipped classroom, where students can access pre-tutorial readings and recorded lectures to 
support the interactive nature of the learning. 


A dedicated simulated environment will be developed to provide a safe learning environment where students will 
have the opportunity through simulation workshops to develop midwifery skills, work in teams, explore scenarios and 
problems, and practice clinical decision-making. Carefully designed simulation activities will also provide the 
opportunity to develop communication skills relevant to the women’s needs and health problems, including interacting 
with scenarios representing families from different demographic and cultural backgrounds, which is vital considering 
India’s cultural and demographic diversity. Interprofessional learning may also be fostered through implementing 
team simulation scenarios. 


06 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEc.4] 


Reflective practice assists students to learn from experience, both positive and negative and to gain new insights 
about themselves and practice. Gibbs cyclic model provides a six-stage approach to systematically reflect on an 
experience or activity; including description, feelings, evaluation, analysis, conclusion and an action plan. 


Description () Feeling (2) 


Action plan (6) | GIBBS CYCLE | Evaluation (3) 


Conclusion (5) Analysis (4) 


Experiential learning supported by scenario based learning and reflective practice will be integrated 
throughout the curriculum in both theoretical and practice components. Teaching and learning arrangements will be 
organized to encourage collaboration and interaction, examples of teaching modes include tutorials and group work, 
online resources and lectures, smart classrooms, personal research and reflection, experiential workshops, journal 
club, post clinical reviews. 


9,] Teaching and Learning Methods 


Tutorials and workshops Skill demonstration Clinical practice under supervision 
Lecture cum Discussion Simulation Independent clinical practice 
Experiential learning Scenario-based Bed side clinics 

Self-directed learning (Learning reflective learning Reflective learning 

resources - Annexure-IV) OSCE (plan and Experiential learning 

Problem based learning conduction) Case presentation 

Practice teaching mole play Case studies/discussions 

Micro teaching Drills Health talk 


Audio-video assisted teaching peace skill Clinical rounds/conference 
Virtual learning - virtual Drug discussion and presentation 


classroom Videos ; ; 
Microteaching - theory/skill demonstrations 


*Safe Delivery App/any other 
apps as self-directed learning 


Field visit/report 
Logbook (Annexure-IID) 


Example: *ETech based learning may be incorporated throughout the curriculum by integration of Safe Delivery App 
into the various teaching methodologies. The Safe Delivery App is a smartphone application that provides direct and 
instant access to evidence-based and up-to-date clinical guidelines on BEMONC. The SDA can be used as a teaching 
and learning tool that covers ll modules: Infection Prevention, Post Abortion Care, Hypertension, Active 
Management of Third Stage Labour, Prolonged Labour, Post Partum Haemorrhage, Manual Removal of Placenta, 
Maternal Sepsis, Neonatal Resuscitation, Newborn Management, Low Birth Weight. 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 07 


9.2 Assessment Methods 
Continuous formative assessments 


e Self-assessment through reflective learning, as well as peer review 

e Group work 

e Objective Structured Clinical Examinations (OSCEs) 

e Essays, case discussions, literature review, written assignments 

e Written examinations 

e Practical assessments - teaching activities, simulation 

e Teaching observation assessment - direct observation of teaching practice (practice teaching) 
e Competency assessment 

e Clinical practice evaluation 

0. EXAMINATION REGULATIONS 

EXAMINING AUTHORITY: Examination boards approved by the Council. 


The candidates are expected to undergo six months intensive residential training at the National Midwifery 
Training Institute. During the training, i.e., at the end of three months of training, the educators would be expected to 
undergo a competency-based examination. However, if the educator does not clear the examination, he/she would be 
given one chance to reappear for the examination failed either in theory or practical only within 2-4 weeks and if 
failed again and found unsuitable would be discontinued from the program. The educators who clear the examination 
at the end of three months would be re-assessed at the end of six months of training followed by final assessment at 
the end of 8 months. The examination pattern for the 3-month exam would be similar to the examination pattern for 
the final examination at the end of |8 months. (The examination guidelines are detailed and given separately in 
Annexure-VIT.) 


0. Eligibility for Admission to Examination 
e Percentage of attendance in theory and practical before appearing for final examination should be 90%. 


e Candidate who successfully completes all the requirements such as logbook and clinical requirements is eligible 
and can appear for the final exam. 


e Completion of l2-month mentorship experience is mandatory requirement for admission to final examination. 


e The details of eligibility to appear for first assessment after 3 months and second assessment after 6 months are 
outlined in the exam guidelines. 


0.2 Supplementary Examination 


e Failed candidates can appear for the supplementary examination after 6 weeks in the final exam failed either 
theory or practical only. 


e Number of attempts - 3 
0.3 Examination Pattern (One theory paper and one practical examination) 


Internal (formative assessment) External (summative assessment) 


Theory 25 marks (tests, assignments, presentations) 75 marks (0 marks - MCQ, 30 marks - short 
answers, 35 marks - essay/scenario) 


Practical 50 marks (0 for clinical performance + 0 for clinical 50 marks (20 in OCSE + 30 in DOP 
assignments + l0 for OSCE + 20 for DOP) 


0.4 Practical Examination 


e A panel of three examiners - Faculty trainer - 2 (one internal and one external) and medical preceptor — | (the 
examiners as well as the medical preceptor who are involved in teaching the program and are familiar with the 
curriculum) 


0.5 Qualification of Examiner 


e M.Sc. Nursing, OBG specialty with 5 years of teaching or clinical experience after PG with a dual role/M.Sc. 
OBG nursing with 5 years of experience as faculty with a minimum of 2 years midwifery clinical working 
experience. 


e Medical faculty from Obstetrics and Gynecology, Pediatrics and Public Health with 3 years post PG 
experience/consultant. 


l08 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


ll. CERTIFICATION 
A. Title - Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) Educator 


B. The title is awarded upon successful completion of the prescribed study program, which will state that the 
candidate 


i. Has completed the prescribed course of Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) Educator. 


ii. Has attended 90% of the theoretical and l00% of the practical instruction hours before awarding the 
certificate. 


il. Has passed (70% marks both internal and external together) in the prescribed theory and practical 
examination. 


C. Certification will be done by the Examination Boards approved by the Council. The SNRC will be registering 
NPM Educator as an additional qualification. 


Midwifery Educators, who clear the examinations at the end of six months, should be posted at State Midwifery 
Training Institutes for training of Nurse Practitioners in Midwifery (NPMs). Six Month training of Midwifery 
Educators would be followed by one year of onsite mentorship to ensure proficiency of Midwifery Educators. The 
Examination Boards approved by the Council would provide a provisional certificate to the candidates who have 
successfully completed six months of training and would further provide a final certification after they have completed 
the !2 months of mentorship. 


2. COURSE MODULES 


COURSE MODULE I 
PREPARING MIDWIVES FOR RELATIONSHIP BASED AND 
TRANSFORMATIVE MIDWIFERY CARE 


Theory (T): 30 hours 
Practicum: Skills Lab (SL): 5 hours, Clinical (CL): l0 hours 
Course Aim 


This course prepares the students to understand their role as an educator by building on their understanding of 
midwifery in Indian and global context, thus prepares future NPMs for relationship-based and transformative 
midwifery care. It aims to prepare educators who have imbibed the principles of midwifery philosophy and practice 
and are competent and skilled in the art of transformative teaching and learning practices. 


Course Description 


Central to this course are the dual concepts of woman-centered care and student-centered learning. The 
philosophy of midwifery practice based on the scope of practice, code of ethics, and essential competencies by the 
Council/ICM for the midwife will be explored. This will also enable the NPM educator to gain knowledge on adult 
learning principles and to develop the skills and attitude in effectively teaching and training nurse practitioners in 
midwifery. 


Course Objectives 


l. Explore the midwifery educator’s competencies in tangent with the ICM midwives’ competencies in Indian 
context. 


2. Demonstrate an understanding of the midwifery curriculum and key national & international documents and 
guidelines for midwifery and midwifery education. 


3. Demonstrate skills in effective communication and providing respectful maternity and newborn care. 


4. Describe current educational theories including experiential and scenario-based learning principles to create an 
environment to facilitate learning. 


Identify own learning needs and apply student-directed study goals. 
Describe group dynamics and the importance of peer review and self-reflection. 


Develop effective learning, teaching practices and resources based on evidence. 


Gos ae अत... 


Apply competency-based education in the context of midwifery practice across the continuum and the ICM 
essential competencies. 


9. Demonstrate current midwifery knowledge and skills and recognize the role of continuing professional 
development. 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 09 


Competencies (WHO educator competencies) 


l. Demonstrate professional accountability for the delivery of midwifery care as per the Council standards that are 
consistent with moral, altruistic and humanistic principles in midwifery practice. (.) 


2. Demonstrate understanding of midwifery philosophy of care focused on respectful maternity care placing the 
woman’s sexual and reproductive health rights at the center of the care process. (.3) 


3. Incorporate educational strategies to enhance active learning to develop students’ critical thinking, critical 
reasoning skills and innovative thinking. (3.]) 


4. Select and use effective and appropriate teaching and learning resources. (3.2) 


5. Demonstrate skill in providing competency-based skill training using simulation for the students of the NPM 
course. (3.3) 


Recognize and support the learning styles and unique learning needs of NPM students. (3.4) 


6 
7. Facilitate a safe and effective clinical learning environment. (4.) 
8. Promote individualized experiential learning. (4.2) 

9 


Demonstrate skills in clinical evaluation and training. (4.3) 
0. Assess student competency using various assessment strategies, tools and maintain accurate records. (5.) 
ll. Monitor, assess and evaluate the effectiveness of the NPM program. (5.2) 
]2. Participate actively in planning and organizing the NPM curriculum. (6.) 
3. Implement the NPM curriculum effectively and provide feedback for quality improvement. (6.2) 
4. Demonstrate effective communication using variety of methods in diverse care delivery settings. (7.]) 
The Course Module I is sub-divided into two Sections: 
Section | — Theory (T): |5 hours, Skill Lab (SL): | hour and Clinical (CL): 5 hours 
Section 2 — Theory (7): |5 hours, Skill Lab (SL): 4 hours and Clinical (CL): 5 hours 

Section l: Relational education: preparing midwives for relationship-based midwifery care 


Drawing on the WHO educator competencies and ICM midwifery philosophy and core documents, this this 
section will introduce students to their role as an educator by building on their understanding of midwifery in a global 
context and situating it within the new midwifery initiative for India. Central to this are the dual concepts of woman - 
centred care and student-centred learning. 


Philosophy of midwifery practice based on the ICM definition of a midwife, scope of practice, code of ethics, and 
essential competencies for the midwife; LaQshya guidelines; WHO guidelines and recommendations on antenatal, 
intrapartum and postnatal care; mother, baby and family attachment and psychology; literature, frameworks and 
guidelines around humanizing birth, cultural competence, respectful care, sexual health and reproductive rights, 
gender-based violence and the ethical and legal aspects of the Council will be explored and applied to teaching and 
clinical practice. This section will introduce the WHO Midwifery educator core competencies in conjunction with the 
new guidelines for midwifery-led care and the curriculum for the NPM in India; introduction to learning and teaching 
pedagogy. There will be a specific focus on the role of the educator, positive human relationships, respectful 
compassionate communication, development of confident active listening and communication skills. Students will 
start to use group work, peer support and reflective practice and to incorporate these into their teaching practice; 
development of lifelong learning skills, including critical thinking skills, reflective practice and evidence-based policy 
and practice. 


SECTION ।: CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): |5 hours, Skill Lab (SL): | hour and Clinical (CL): 5 hours 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


Unit | Hours Outcomes Activities 


I T-l |Build rapport Introduction e Icebreakers and e Development of |e Assessment of 
with other ‘getting to know you’| _ self-portfolio portfolio 
students and Vision of the midwifery activities 
educator educators training program 


Overview of courses and 


experience of Studying for success 
student peers 


0 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


Unit | Hours 


Learning 
Outcomes 


Confidently 
begin journey as 
midwife 
educator student 


Articulate 
understanding of 
becoming a 
midwifery 
educator 


Describe current 
scenario and 
status of 
midwifery in 
India and its 
future 


Describe the 


midwifery model 
of care in clinical 


accountability 
within the 
context of 
midwife led care 
and continuity of 
care 


Contextualize 
ICM midwifery 
practice 
standards 


woman, newborn 
and family 
centred care 


education and 
relationship- 
based midwifery 


Content 


Accessing resources 
(online) 

Seminar and tutorial 
expectations and working in 
groups 

Role of self-directed 
learning 

Overview of course 
assessments, academic 
policies and procedures, 
group norms 

WHO educator 
competencies 

Developing your portfolio 


Current scenario and status 
of midwifery in India and its 
future 
e Current scenario and status 
of midwifery in India and 
its future 
History of midwifery 
Current scenario: 
Midwifery in India 
Introduction to 
philosophy of midwifery 
practice 
The Council/ICM code 
of ethics 
Models of midwifery 
care - including distinction 
between midwives and 
other providers with 
midwifery skills 
Midwife led care and 
continuity of care (MLCC) 
Autonomy and 
accountability within the 
context of midwife led care 
and continuity of care 
Essential competencies 
for basic midwifery practice 
(ICM) 
The Council practice 
standards 
ICM global standards 
for midwifery practice 
Trends in midwifery 
Midwifery associations 
and its role 
Philosophy and practice of 
woman, newborn and 
family centred care for 
India 
“What women want’ - 
the expectations and 
experience of care 
Building positive 
relationships 
Key challenges in 
midwifery practice in India 
and influence of midwifery 
education for 
transformation 
Roles and scope of NPMs 
in India 


Teaching Learning 


Activities Assignments 


e Journal 
reference and 
presentation 


e Seminars (student 
led) 
Self-directed learning 
Talking with a 
pregnant woman/new 
mother about her 
experience 


Methods of 
Assessment 


e MCQ 
e Long Essays 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


Unit | Hours 


Learning 
Outcomes 


Describe 
universal rights 
of childbearing 
women and how 
they might be 
applied in India? 


Describe the 
importance of 
RMNC 


Link the practice 
of women 
centered care to 
the provision of 
respectful 
maternity care 


Develop 
strategies to 
promote 
respectful and 
compassionate 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Content 


Relational education and 
relationship-based 
midwifery 


Universal rights of 
childbearing women 


Universal rights of 
childbearing women and 
how they can be applied in 
India? 


International studies of 
human rights violations and 
their effects 


Respectful relationship-based |e 
care: Respectful maternity 
and newborn care (RMNC) 


What is RMNC? 

The nature of respectful 
care 

Type of care expected from 
women and family 
Importance of RMNC in 
improving quality of care 
Clients’ rights for health 
care and examples of social 
accountability practices 
Behavior change strategy 
for RMC services 

Creating Social and 
Cultural Barrier Free 


Environment 

RMC for women in 
MLCU’s 

RMC at all phases 

o Preconception 

o During ANC 

o During labour 

o During delivery 

o During postpartum 


period 
Newborn care integrated 
into RMC 
Client privacy 
Respectful communication: 
bereavement, maternal 
death, newborn death, IUD, 
still birth 
RMC in complication 
RMC during psychological 
morbidity of women 
postpartum 
RMC for differently- abled 
woman 
Effect of non-respectful 
care 
Role of NPM in assuring 
RMNC in MNH service 
Model respectful 


relationships in practice and 


in education 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 


Lectures, tutorials 
and seminars 
Observation in 
practice 


Discussion and 
experiential learning 
Video - RMNC 
Integrated clinical 
practice in maternity 
ward 

Clinical scenarios 
and role plays - e.g., 
domestic/ sexual 
abuse - students 
respond and bring in 
the evidence 
Encourage respectful 
educator/ student 
relationship 
Exercise: Build 
positive relationships 
within the clinical 
environment and 
sensitize everyone to 
the new role of the 
midwife practitioner 
Explore studies of 
relationship-based 
continuity of care 


l]] 


Methods of 


Assignments 
8 Assessment 


Develop a 
scenario to 
illuminate 
universal rights 
in practice 


e Assignment on 
scenario 


e Writing role e Essay, short 
play script answers and 

e Explore key MCQ 
challenges in e Assessment of 
midwifery clinical 
practice in performance 
implementing with rating scale 
RMNC during |e Feedback form 
antenatal care, from mothers 
intra-natal care (Particularly 
and postnatal designed for 
care assessing 

e Prepare a role delivery of 
play respectful care) 


e Assessment of 
the scenario on 
implementing 
RMNC during 
antenatal care, 
intra-natal care 
and postnatal 
care 


[42 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Unit | Hours Leas Content Peace one Assignments लक 
Outcomes Activities Assessment 
V Maternal and newborn e Discussion and e Preparation & |e Essay, short 
SL-I health scenario in India experiential learning presentation of answers and 
e Public health for midwives scenarios vital statistics MCQ 
(Self Learning) e Self-directed learning] records/Fact e Assessment of 
e Epidemiological aspects e Supervised practice sheet visit report 
Describe the and magnitude of maternal in HSC, PHC, CHC |e Literature search 
epidemiology of and neonatal health in India on MNH care 
maternal and (Self Learning) 
neonatal health | ७ Issues of maternal and 
in India neonatal health: age, 


gender, sexuality, psycho 

socio-cultural factors, 

gender disparities and 

women empowerment 

e Health care delivery 
system: National, State, 
District, and Village level 

Discuss various with reference to MCH 
national e National health programs 
RMNCH related to RMNCH 


cca e Quality of care in MNH 
including new 


midwifery 
service 
initiatives 
Identify and Chain of Referral system Discussion and Writing referral |e Essay, short 
implement the |e Limitations and possibilities} experiential learning slip/ note answers and 
chain of referral of other health care Supervised clinical Safe Delivery MCQ 
providers practice App (SDA) 
Policy and protocols for 
referral; range of strategies 
(Conditions requiring 
referral, when, where and 
how to refer for what 
stabilize women condition) 
for referral Transport arrangements: 
community resources, 
advice to families and 
referral note 
Follow up: feedback on 
cases referred 
Records and reports on 
referrals 


Section 2: Transformative education: preparing midwives for transformative midwifery care (Teaching and 
Learning Approaches) 


Section 2 will introduce educational theories such as experiential and scenario-based learning and competency- 
based education in the context of midwifery practice across the continuum and in primary health care settings. 


Students will be taught the skills to create an environment that facilitates learning in both theoretic and clinical 
environments. It will also draw on the student’s midwifery knowledge and clinical experience across the continuum of 
pregnancy, birth and postpartum care of women and newborns. Use of evidence in facilitating informed decision - 
making, risk management/wellbeing support, working in community and primary health settings, midwifery education 
for women and role in public health. Highlight the need for continuing professional competence; the role of clinical 
supervision; provide opportunity to develop teaching materials and resources; introduce experiential and scenario- 
based learning, simulation technologies, consolidate learning and teaching approaches. 


SECTION 2: CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): |5 hours, Skill Lab (SL): 4 hours and Clinical (CL): 5 hours 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


Unit | Hours Outcomes Activities 


I T-2 |Assessment of own |Developing knowledge |e Lecture, tutorial, e Prepare Development 


knowledge base for practice and putting student led seminar assignment on of portfolio and 
and areas for knowledge into practice |e Self-directed study application of log-book with 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


Learning 


emit Outcomes 


Hours 


development 


Demonstrate 
understanding of 
ICM competencies 
and assess against 
these 


Describe reflective 
practice and how 
this might be used 
to develop learning 
and knowledge 


Demonstrate 
understanding of 
educational 
theories including 
but not limited to 
experiential 
learning, skill 
learning, scenario- 
based learning, 
practice-based 
education 


Hl Develop a scenario 
from practice as a 
basis for learning 
ICM competencies 
and WHO 
educators’ 


competencies 


IV Demonstrate 
understanding and 
application of the 
educational 
approaches for 
transformational 
and relationship- 
based midwifery 
care 


of teaching and 
clinical training and 
strategies/ skills 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Content 


Power in education 
and in practice 

What are 
competencies, and 
different methods of 
learning, teaching? 
Creating experience 
for developing these 
What is unique about 
midwifery knowledge, 
reflective practice and 
different approaches? 


Educational theories 

applicable to midwifery 

education 

e Experiential learning, 
scenario- based 
learning, learning 
skills, teaching and 
assessment in practice, 
conceptual learning 


Experiential and 
scenario-based learning 
for midwifery practice 


Scenario-based 
learning, how to 
develop a scenario 
from practice, reading 
or online resources 
Practice based 
education including 
clinical decision 
making, using 
evidence in practice 
Shaping education for 
practice in the clinical 
area 

Using simulation 


Relational 
education - Preparing 
midwives for 
relationship-based 
midwifery care 
(student/teacher/ 
women/families) 

Transformative 
education - Preparing 
midwives for 
transformative 
midwifery care 

Student centered 
learning 

Competency 
based 
education/training 


training skills 


Teaching-learning 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 
e Development of a 
scenario using ICM 
competencies 


e Develop educational |e 
design, teaching 
approaches and 
lesson plans based on 
some of the ICM 
competencies and 
WHO midwifery 
educator competency 
domains 


Intensive workshops |e 
developing different 
scenarios, based on 
ICM competencies 

and integrating part 

of the range of WHO |e 
educator 

competencies 

The class will cover 
the whole range of 
WHO competencies 


Exercise: Build 
positive relationship 
between the student 
and teacher 

Role play: Scenario 


based learning 
e 


Discussion and 
experiential learning 
Practice teaching: 
theory and skill 


Assignments 


knowledge into 
practice, e.g., 
RMC in intra- 
natal care 


Prepare Lesson 
Plan based on 
ICM 
competencies in 
any area 


Written scenario |e 
and using that 
scenario for 
teaching in the 
class 

Development of 
portfolio 


Written script for 
role play 


Practice 
teaching: theory 
and skill 
demonstration 


l3 


Methods of 
Assessment 


plan for 
individual 
learning 


Development 
of portfolio 
Assessment of 
the Lesson Plan 


Assessment of 
the scenario 
based on ICM 
competencies 


Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 
Practice 


4 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


Unit 


VI 


Hours 


Learning 
Outcomes 


Utilize different 
teaching 
methodologies 
focusing on student 
centered and 
relationship- based 
learning 


Participate in peer 
review and self- 
reflection activities 


Promote 
interpersonal 
communication 


Identify 
communication 
skills required to 
establish successful 
midwife-woman 
partnership 


Recognize 
challenges to 
effective 
communication 
within diverse 
cultural 
communities 


Explain various 
methods of 
knowledge and 
skills assessment 


Develop 
assessment tools 


Participate in self- 


Assessment/ Evaluation 
Methods 


Teaching Learnin 
Content 8 eas 8 
Activities 

demonstration 
Practice reflective 
learning 


Role play 


process 

Adult learning 
principles 

Methods of 
teaching - simulation, 
projects, problem- 
based learning, drills 

Reflective 
learning 

Microteaching 

Preparation of 
lesson plans and skill 
checklist 

Preparation of AV 
aids 

Preparation of 
case studies, 
case/simulation 
scenarios 
Preparation of master 
and clinical rotation 
plan 

Clinical teaching 
methods - rounds and 
reports, bedside clinic, 
conferences 

Clinical 
preceptorship, 
mentoring and role 
modeling 

Peer-review, self- 
reflection 
Interpersonal 
communication 
o Communication 
o Team 

communication 
o Conflict 
management 

Effective and 
respectful 
communication 
between midwife and 
woman 
Communication within 
diverse cultural 
communities 
Guidance and 
counseling 


Discussion and 
experiential learning 
Self-directed learning 
Simulation 


Assessment of 
knowledge: 
Preparation of 
o Essay 
o Short answers 
o MCQs 

Assessment of 
skills 
o Assignments 
o Observation 

checklist 
o OSCE/OSPE 
o Practical 
examination 


Methods of 


Assignments 
8 Assessment 


using various 
teaching 
methodologies 
Preparation of 
lesson plan, 
checklists, AV 
aids 
Preparation 

of case studies, 
case/ simulation 
scenarios 

e Microteaching 


teaching 
sessions/ 
micro-teaching 


Preparation of 
knowledge 
assessment test 
Setting up of 
OSCE stations 
and simulation 
areas 

Prepare 
checklists for 
evaluation 


Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 
OSCE 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 5 


Unit | Hours earns Content - cache Leanne Assignments लक ot 
Outcomes Activities Assessment 
assessment/ o Viva voce 
appraisal Assessment of 
attitude: Attitude 
scales 
COURSE MODULE II 


PREPARING MIDWIVES FOR CARE DURING PREGNANCY, BIRTH AND PUERPERIUM 
Theory (T): 80 hours 
Practicum: Skills Lab (SL): 35 hours, Clinical (CL): 790 hours 
The Course Module II is sub-divided into five Sections: 
Section | — Theory (T): 6 hours and Skill Lab (SL): 3 hours 
Section 2 - Theory (T): 22 hours, Skill Lab (SL): 2 hours and Clinical (CL): 450 hours 
Section 3 - Theory (T): 6 hours, Skill Lab (SL): 2 hours and Clinical (CL): 40 hours 
Section 4 - Theory (T): 22 hours, Skill Lab (SL): 6 hours and Clinical (CL): 300 hours 
Section 5 - Theory (T): 24 hours and Skill Lab (SL): 2 hours 
Course Aim 


This course will equip the NPM educators to upscale their knowledge, clinical skill and competencies and lead by 
example to prepare competent NPMs to deliver skilled, knowledgeable, compassionate and respectful midwifery care 
across the continuum of childbirth. 


Course Description 


This module is designed to enable the NPM educators to review the principles of related biological and behavioral 
sciences and midwifery to promote physiological birth and provide respectful quality care. The course comprises of 
review of anatomy and physiology, pre pregnancy care, antenatal care, intrapartum care, postpartum care and care of 
newborn and applied pharmacology including fundamentals of prescribing, legal & ethical issues, and infection 
control. It also includes recognition and management of problems/complications during pregnancy, labour, and 
postnatal period, and neonatal problems. 


Course Objectives 
l. Discuss the anatomy and physiology of the female reproductive system and conception. 
2. Assess and provide pre pregnancy care including counseling. 


3. Assess and provide care for women in the antenatal, intra-natal and postnatal period including conduction of 
normal deliveries. 


Assess and provide care for neonates. 
Identify deviations from normalcy, stabilize and transport women and neonates to the higher health centers. 


Demonstrate sound knowledge of applied pharmacology and principles of prescribing. 


eee ae cae 


Identify and use medicines appropriately in midwifery, obstetric emergencies and complex situations as per Gol 
guidelines. 


8. Demonstrate professional accountability for the delivery of midwifery care as per the Council standards that are 
consistent with moral, altruistic, legal and ethical and regulatory and humanistic principles in midwifery practice. 


9. Implement infection control practices in maternal and newborn care facilities. 

0. Collaborate with the health care team in providing midwifery care to women and their neonates. 
l]. Promote health of families and communities and provide family welfare services. 

Competencies (ICM) 

l. Adhere to jurisdictional laws, regulatory requirements, code of conduct for midwifery practice. (If) 
2. Provide pre-pregnancy and antenatal care. (2a) 


3. Determine health status of women. (2b) 


l6 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Assess the fetal wellbeing. (2c) 


4 

5. Monitor the progression of pregnancy. (2d) 

6. Promote and support health behaviors that improve their wellbeing. (2e) 
yi 


Provide anticipatory guidance related to pregnancy, birth, breastfeeding, parenthood, and change in the family. 
(2f) 

8. Detect, manage, and refer women with complicated pregnancies. (2g) 

9. Assist the woman and her family to plan for an appropriate place of birth. (2h) 

l0. Provide care to women with unintended or mistimed pregnancy. (2i) 

ll. Promote physiologic labour and birth. (3a) 

2. Manage a safe spontaneous vaginal birth and prevent complications. (3b) 

3. Provide care of the newborn immediately after birth. (3c) 

4. Provide postnatal care for the healthy woman. (4a) 

I5. Provide care to healthy newborn infant. (4b) 

6. Promote and support breast feeding. (4c) 

l7. Detect and treat or refer postnatal complications in woman. (4d) 

l8. Detect and manage health problems in newborn infant. (4e) 

9. Provide family planning services. (4f) 

Section l: Maternal, Fetal and Newborn Physiology 


This section will review the students’ knowledge of anatomy and physiology of reproduction and fetal 
development in order to support the facilitation of normal physiological birth. 


This section will include but not be limited to anatomy and physiology of reproductive system, conception, 
menstruation and ovulatory cycle; anatomy of maternal pelvis and fetal skull. It will provide an in-depth study of the 
normal physiological changes that occur in pregnancy. It will review placental physiology and fetal growth and 
development, fetal circulation. Content will be sequentially aligned with the normal pregnancy, providing the bio- 
science to support midwifery knowledge and application of practice skills. 


SECTION ।: CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): 6 hours and Skills Lab (SL): 3 hours 


Unit | Hours Une Content sence one Assignments preuods OF 
Outcomes Activities Assessment 
I T-2 Review the Review of anatomy e Self-directing e Presentations/ e Essay, short 
SL2 reproductive and physiology of learning seminars answers and 
system human reproductive MCQ 
system e Discussion and e Demonstration - 
Understand the experiential learning female pelvis and 
female hormonal |e Female pelvis and fetal skull 
cycle (ovarian and Fetal skull (with 
uterine) feto-pelvic 
relationships) 
e Hormonal cycles 
T-2 | Understand the Embryology and fetal |e Tutorial e Foetal circulation|e Evaluation of 
sp-y | Process of growth and - schematic the assignment 
fertilization and _| development ¢ Group work representation 
पक ta e Fertilization and ¢ Online lecture 
तक conception e Self-directed 
placental 680 
development and |¢ Implantation ? 
function 


e Embryological 
Demonstrate development 
knowledge of fetal 


070 & e Placental 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 7 


development in development 


early pregnanc 
y pres y e Placental function; 


Understand the blood brain barrier 
role of the 
placenta in fetal 
wellbeing and 
nutrition 


e Fetal growth and 
development 


e Fetal circulation 


e Fetal nutrition 


T-2 | Recognize Physiological changes Tutorial Formative quiz 
physiological in early pregnancy (final course 


changes in early Bea ; Group work Se 
e 
pregnancy across ardiovascular, 


the body systems hematological, — Online lecture Educational 
endocrine, digestive, दे तहत resource 
Understand the respiratory, uterine, development 
interaction of renal, immune 
pregnancy system 
hormones musculoskeletal, 
integumentary 
changes 


learning 


Hormones of 
pregnancy 


Ongoing signs of 
pregnancy 


Section 2: Normal Pregnancy, Birth and Puerperium 


This section will prepare the student to provide skilled, knowledgeable, compassionate and respectful midwifery 
care across the continuum of childbirth in both community and institution. 


It will include knowledge and skills to promote physiological birth and provide respectful quality maternal and 
newborn care. This will include but not limited to Antenatal care: assessment of pregnancy, comprehensive health 
history, physical assessment, screening, managing existing disease/pathology, support for pregnancy discomforts, 
assessment of fetal growth and wellbeing, health information and informed consent, antenatal education; 
Intrapartum care: |‘, 2", 3 and 4" stage of labour, which includes the assessment of progress of labour, 
partograph, vaginal examination, observations and documentation, supporting women in labour and birth, promotion 
of physiological birth, non-pharmacological and pharmacological pain relief, assessment of perineal trauma, perineal 
suturing, observation and bleeding assessment, timely referral; Postnatal care: maternal care, transition to parenthood 
- mother, father and family, promoting attachment, skin-to-skin contact, establishing breastfeeding, managing 
breastfeeding challenges, documentation, reporting etc. Compassionate, woman centred midwifery care during normal 
pregnancy, labour, birth and postnatal period alongside evidence-based quality, holistic and continuity of midwifery 
care utilizing cultural competence and sensitivity are highly emphasized throughout. 


SECTION 2: CONTENT OUTLINE 


Theory (T): 22 hours, Skills Lab (SL): 2 hours and Clinical (CL): 450 hours 


Unit | Hours | Learning Outcomes Content पे enching Pine Assignments PERC ROCs OL 

Activities Assessment 

I T Facilitate a Beginning the pregnancy |e Discussion and e Pre- conception Evaluation of 
partnership? with journey experiential learning | counseling skills using 


women through checklist 


Pre-pregnancy Care e Demonstration e History taking 


continuity of care 
and assessment |e Assessment of 


3Note that in a partnership relationship between a midwife and a woman, both make equally essential (but different) contributions. The 
woman defines who her family are and how they will be involved. Information is shared, decisions are negotiated, and the woman makes 
decisions that are right for her. The midwife upholds the woman’s decisions. See chapter on partnership in practice in Pairman et al 
textbook. 


l8 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SECc.4] 


Unit | Hours 


I 


T-3 
SL-I 
CL-40 


Learning Outcomes 


Explain the 
significance of pre 
pregnancy care 


Recognize birth as a 
normal life event for 
women and their 
families 


Provide 
preconception care 
for eligible couples 


Provide information 
and develop skills to 
enable shared 
decision making in 
midwifery practice 


Understand and 
advocate for planned 
parenthood 


Respond effectively 


to women’s 
individuality, and 
lack of knowledge 
about their social and 
cultural contexts 


Explain the 
significance of 
antenatal care for the 
women and family 


Demonstrate skills in 
providing antenatal 
care, health 
education for 
pregnant women and 
continuity of care 


e Promote equity 
and access to care 
during pregnancy 


e Recognize birth as 
a normal life event 
for women and 
their families 


e Describe the need 
for documentation 
and record keeping 


Content T eaching Learning 
Activities 
Review of sexual 
development (Self 
Learning) 


e Role play - 
counselling 


e Tutorial, group work |¢ 
Socio-cultural aspects of 
human sexuality (Self 
Learning) 


e Case study 


e Evidence based screening 


for health problems such 
as diabetes, hypertension, 
thyroid conditions, and 
chronic infections that 
impact pregnancy 


Pre-conception 
counseling (including 
awareness regarding 
normal births) 


e Genetic counseling (Self 


Pregnancy assessment and |e 
midwifery care during 7 


Learning) 


Assess and confirm 
pregnancy 


Shared decision making 
in midwifery practice 


Planned parenthood 


Discussion and ७ 
experiential learning 


Assignments 


of health status 
of women 


Assessment of 
nutritional status 
and screening of |e 
women 


Health education |e 


Methods of 
Assessment 


clinical 
performance 
with using 
checklist 


Evidence based 
essay 


Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 


e Assess clinical 


trimester ° Case 
e Demonstrations presentation 
Review of 
e Bed side clinics e Bed side clinic 
e Normal pregnancy 
e Case discussions e Clinical 
e Maternal nutrition and ; Conference 
malnutrition e Seminar 
e Antenatal history |° 
e Diagnosis of pregnancy - |® Nursing rounds taking and 
signs and symptoms, assessment 


e Supervised clinical 
practice in antenatal 
OPD and ward 


differential diagnosis, 
confirmatory tests 


Definition, nature, 
objectives and 
importance of antenatal |e 
care 


e Self-directed learning |, 


Skilled Birth 
Attendant module 


० Building partnership |e 
with women following 
RMC protocol . 


Online lecture 


Scenario-based 
learning 

Antenatal assessment: 

History taking, physical 

examination, breast 

examination, obstetrical . 
and pelvic examination 

(Leopold’s maneuvers), 

laboratory investigation bs 


Identification and 
management of minor 
discomforts of pregnancy 


Antenatal care and 
counseling (lifestyles in 
pregnancy, nutrition, 


Draw a micro- 
birth plan 


Laboratory 
investigations: 
perform and 
interpret - UPT, 
Hb estimation, 
HIV/Syphilis 
testing; urine 
analysis for 
albumin and 
sugar 


Assessment of 
fetal well-being 


Antenatal 
counselling 


skills using 
procedure 
checklists 


Assess clinical 
performance 
using rating 
scale 


OSCE/ OSPE 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण l9 


Unit | Hours | Learning Outcomes Content : हलक oe Assignments Dees Or 
Activities Assessment 
shared decision making, 
risky behavior in 
pregnancy, counseling 
regarding sexual life 
during pregnancy etc.) 


Screening for antenatal 
anxiety 


Screening for family 
violence 


o Point of Care and One 
Stop Service during 
ANC 


Danger signs during 
pregnancy 


Birth preparedness and 
complication readiness 
(including promoting 
“Normalcy during 
pregnancy”’) 


Childbirth preparation 


Respectful care and 
compassionate 
communication 


Recording and reporting 


० Clinical procedures as 
per the Gol guidelines 


Various models of ANC 
and their evolution 


Gol current model of 


ANC provision 
Role of Doula/ 
ASHA’s 
Il Demonstrate Midwifery care during 2" |e Tutorial e Quiz, (end of 
knowledge of trimester of pregnancy course exam) 


midwifery practice e Group work 


throughout the 24 |® Education and 


e Competency 


e Online lecture 


Fiesty management of based 
physiological changes 06४6 based assessment 
and discomforts of 2™ (हित 

earnin C 
ee trimester * OSCE 

Maintain woman Case study 

centered Rh negative and 

relationship-based prophylactic anti D Simulation workshop 

care 
Second trimester tests 
and health education 

Assess fetal growth o Interpreting screening 

and development results 


o Health education on 


Discuss management IFA, calcium and 


for existing disease va) 

or pathology supplementation, 
glucose tolerance test, 
immunization etc. 

Facilitate ethical Informed decision 

midwifery practice making 


promoting maternal 


20 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SECc.4] 


Unit | Hours 


IV 


Learning Outcomes 


autonomy and choice 


Demonstrate 
knowledge of 
midwifery practice 
throughout the 377 
trimester 


Maintain woman 
centered 
relationship-based 
care to develop birth 
plan 


Provide antenatal 
care related to 
preparation for birth 
and breastfeeding 
education to build 
each woman’s 
confidence 


Content 


e Antenatal assessment: 
abdominal palpation, fetal 
assessment, auscultate 
fetal heart rate - Doppler 
and Pinnards 


e Assessment of fetal well- 
being: fetal pattern, 
DFMC, biophysical 
profile, non-stress test, 
cardiotocography, USG, 
vibro-acoustic stimulation 


e 24 trimester antenatal 
care 


० Women centered care 


० Respectful care and 
compassionate 
communication 


o Referral and 
collaboration, 
empowerment 


o Ongoing risk 
assessment 


o Maternal Mental 
Health 


o Role of Doula/ 
ASHA’s 


Midwifery care during 3"¢ 
trimester of pregnancy 


e Physiological 
discomforts during 37 
trimester 


Third trimester tests and 
screening 


Fetal engagement in late 
pregnancy 


3" trimester antenatal 
education classes 


Birth preparedness and 
complication readiness 


Health education on 
exclusive breastfeeding 


Danger signs of 
pregnancy - recognition 
of ruptured membranes 


Ongoing risk assessment 
Cultural needs 
Women centered care 


Respectful and 
compassionate 
communication 


Alternative birthing 


Methods of 
Assessment 


Teaching Learning 


Activities Assignments 


Tutorial e Quiz, (end of 


course exam) 
Group work 


e Competency 
based 
assessment 


Online lecture 


Scenario based 
learning 


Case study 
Simulation workshop 


Demonstration of 
birthing position 


[भागता--खण्ड 4] 


Unit | Hours | Learning Outcomes Content 


positions - women’s 
preferred choices 


e Role of Doula/ ASHA’s 


Apply the physiology |Midwifery care during 7 
of labour stage of labour 


Review of 


Describe how a 
midwife builds a 
woman’s confidence 
and provides 
respectful care for 
the women during 
labour 


e Normal labour and birth 
e Onset of birth/labour 


e Per vaginal examination 
(if necessary) 


Stages of labour 


Organization of labor 
room - Triage, 


Pogues Ul Tele-or preparation for birth 


birth companion 
during labour Positive birth 


environment 


Respectful care and 


Discuss the effect of ese. 
communication 


the midwife’s (and 
other team members) | [५ Stage 
language on the 
woman’s emotional 
well-being 


e Physiology of normal 
labour 


e Monitoring progress of 


labour 
Discuss how to 


maintain an 
environment for 
labour in which the 
woman feels safe 


e Using Partograph 


e Pain relief in labour 
(non-pharmacological 
and pharmacological) 


Assessing and 


Work effectively monitoring fetal well 
with pain during being 
labour 


Psychological support - 
managing fear 


Activity and positioning 
for labour 


Nutrition during labour 


Care during |* stage of 
normal labour 


o Positive childbirth 
experience for women 


labour 


o Safe environment 
for mother and 
newborn to promote 
bonding 


० Role of Doula/ 
ASHA’s 


० Evidence based 
theories (e.g., 
becoming a mother) 


o Birth companion for 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Teaching Learning 


Activities 


Discussion and 


experiential learning 


Bed side clinics 
Case discussions 
Seminar 
Simulation 
Video 


Demonstrations 


Supervised clinical 


practice in labour 
ward 


SBA, IMNCI, 


NSSK modules 


LaQshya 
guidelines 


Assignments 


Bed side clinic 
Health education 


Case 
presentation 
Clinical 
Conference 


Case study 


Plotting and 
interpretation of 
partograph 


Supervised 
clinical practice 


]2] 


Methods of 
Assessment 


Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 


OSCE/ OSPE 


Assessment of 
skills using 
procedure 
checklist 


Assess clinical 
performance 
with rating 
scale 


292. THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SECc.4] 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 


and practice in relation 
to labour interventions 


Apply knowledge of |Midwifery care during 204 
the physiology of stage of labour 

birth to midwifery 
care 


Unit | Hours | Learning Outcomes Content Assignments 


Self-directed learning 


Physiology (mechanism 

of labour) 
Discuss how the 
midwife provides 
care and support for 
the women during 
birth to enhance Birth position of choice 
physiology and 
promote normal birth 


Signs of imminent labour 


Intrapartum monitoring 


Warm compresses 


Vaginal examination (if 
necessary) 


Management - 
preparation and 
supporting birth 


Psychological support 
Non-directive coaching 


Role of Doula/ ASHA’s 
VII Assessment and care |Care during 3" stage of Tutorial e Case study 


of the newborn labour 
immediately Group work e Simulation 


e Physiology - placental 
separation and expulsion, Online lecture 
homeostasis 


CL-70 |following birth 


Scenario based 
Physiological learning 
management of third 

stage of labour 


Active management of 
third stage of labour 


Examination of placenta, 
membranes and vessels 


Assess perineal, vaginal 
tear/injuries and suture if 
required 


Immediate perineal care 


Assessment and care of 
the newborn immediately 
following birth 


Essential newborn care 
(ENBC) 


Initiation of breast 
feeding 


Skin to skin contact 
Vitamin K prophylaxis 
Newborn resuscitation 


VIII | T-2 |Discuss the impact of|Care during 4" stage of —[e Tutorial 
labour and birth as a |labour 


transitional event in e Group work 


Observation, Critical 


Methods of 
Assessment 


e Quiz (end of 
course exam) 


e Quiz (end of 
course exam) 


e Competency 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


Unit | Hours 


Ix 


CL-70 


T-5 
CL-80 


Learning Outcomes 


the woman’s life 


Ensure initiation of 
breast feeding and 
adequate latching 


Demonstrate 
integration of the 
role of midwife in 
the care of woman 


Explore the maternal 
physiological 
changes following 
birth 


Understand the 
physiology of 
lactation and 
composition of breast 
milk 


Demonstrate skill in 
caring for postnatal 
women 


Understand 
homeostasis and 
nutritional 
requirements of the 
newborn 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Content 


Analysis and Management |e 
of mother and newborn 


e Maternal assessment, 
observation of fundal 
height, urine output, 
blood loss 


e Documentation and 
Record of birth 


e Breastfeeding and 
latching 


e Managing uterine cramp 


e Alternative/ 
complementary therapies 


e Role of Doula/ ASHA’s 


e Various childbirth 
practices 


e Safe environment for 
mother and newborn to 
promote bonding 


Postpartum care/ Ongoing |e 
care of women 


Review of e 
e Normal postpartum e 
period 


e Physiology of 
puerperium 


e Post-natal assessment 
and care - facility and 
home-based care 


e Perineal hygiene and care 


e Bladder and bowel 
function 


e Minor disorders of 
puerperium and its 
management 


e Physiology of lactation 
and lactation 
management 


e Postnatal counseling and 
psychological support 


e Normal postnatal baby 
blues and recognition of 
postnatal depression 


e Transition to parenthood 


e Care for the mother from 
72 hours to 6 weeks after 
the delivery 


o Cultural competence 
(Taboos related to 
postnatal diet and 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 
Online lecture 


Scenario based 
learning 


Case study 


Simulation 
Workshop 


Discussion and 
experiential learning 


Demonstration 
Simulations 


Bedside rounds/ 
clinics 


Case discussion 
Role play 


Safe Delivery App 
video on feeding 


e Case studies 


]23 


Methods of 


Assignments 
8 Assessment 


based 
assessment 


e Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 


Seminar 


Cincal e Assessment 
03350 003 of skills with 
Counseling procedure 


mothers for check list 


breast feeding - 
techniques and 
position 


e OSCE/ OSPE 


Health talk 


Postnatal 
assessment 


Supervised 
clinical practice 
in postnatal ward 
and OPD 


]24 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SECc.4] 


Methods of 
Assessment 


Teaching Learning 


Content Activities 


Unit | Hours | Learning Outcomes Assignments 


practices) 


o Evidence based 
practice in relation to 
postnatal and newborn 
care 


e Knowledge on 
postpartum family 
planning methods 


e Follow-up 


Section 3: Care of the Newborn 


This section will prepare the student to provide skilled, knowledgeable, respectful and compassionate midwifery 
care to the newborn in both community and institution. 


It will address the knowledge and skills required to provide quality care for the newborn and promote a healthy 
transition to life. This will include but not limited to: supporting the transition to extra uterine life; immediate care of 
the newborn, Apgar score, newborn assessment, essential newborn care; complete physical examination; newborn 
health needs; nutritional needs of the newborn, skin to skin contact; breastfeeding; maternal newborn bonding; growth 
and development of the infant; prophylactic measures; involve partner/support person; screening and immunization; 
provide evidence based information to parents; consideration of cultural norms; respectful care. It further equips the 


students to distinguish variations in normal development of the newborn and refer to the inter professional team. 
SECTION 3: CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): 6 hours, Skills Lab (SL): 2 hours and Clinical (CL): 40 hours 


Unit | Hours | Learning Outcomes 


I T-l  |Discuss the need for 
compassionate, family 
centered midwifery care 
of the newborn and how 
this is provided 


Discuss how the woman 
and family’s views and 
beliefs are respected 


Understand that actions 
and interventions carried 
out on baby need to be 
fully explained and 
informed consent 
obtained 

II Discuss preparation for 

newborn at birth 


Explain the midwife’s 
role in observing and 
assessing the newborn 
immediately after birth 


Explore the 
physiological adaptions 
that the newborn 
undergoes following 
birth 


Content 


Family centered care 


e Concept of family 
centered care 


Partnership and cultural 
competency 


Respectful care and 
communication 


Informed consent and 
shared decision making 


Assessment and ongoing 
care of normal neonates 


Review of 


e Normal neonate - 
physiological adaptation 


Newborn assessment 
and care 


Screening for congenital |® 
anomalies 


Care of newborn from 
72 hours to 6 weeks 
after the delivery 
(routine care of 
newborn) 


Teaching Learning 


Activities Assignments 


e Tutorials and group 


work 


e Scenarios 


e Case 
presentation/ 
Case discussion 


Discussion and 
experiential learning 


Demonstrations 


_ te Health talk 
Self-directed learning 


e Newborn 


Seminar assessment 


Case discussion 


Safe Delivery App 
module on newborn 
management and risk 
management 


Supervised clinical 
practice in postnatal 
ward/NICU/ Nursery 


Methods of 
Assessment 


Formative 
assessment, 
competency 
based 


Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 


OSCE/OSPE 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


Unit | Hours 


lil 


IV 


Learning Outcomes 


Demonstrate skills in 
caring for normal 
newborns in the 
presence of mother 


Identify the newborn at 
risk and give relevant 
immediate care 


Understand the process 
to refer unwell 
newborns 


Educate the mother and 
family on prevention, 
recognition, and 
management of common 
newborn problems 


Discuss the benefits of 
breastfeeding for the 
baby and mother 


Understand the 
composition of breast 
milk 


Discuss the 
recommendation of 
exclusive breastfeeding 
for six months 


Explain how to help a 
mother succeed with the 
first breastfeeding and 
recognize if the baby is 
breastfeeding well 


Explain and demonstrate 
how to express breast 
milk and storage 


Understand the BFHI 


भारत का राजपत्र : 


Content 


e Skin to skin contact 
e Thermoregulation 


e Infection prevention 
(asepsis and hand 
washing) 


Risk identification and 
referral 


e Risk Identification and 
referrals 


Minor disorders of 
newborn and their 
management 


Newborn screening 


Signs of distress and 
risk assessment 


Identification of 
complications, 
management and 
referral as per IMNCI 
protocol 


Documentation and 
record 


Health education to the 
mother and family 
about the management 
of common newborn 


problems 


Nutritional needs of the 
newborn and establishing 
breastfeeding 


Breastfeeding 


Breast milk 
composition 


Benefits of 
breastfeeding for the 
newborn and mother 


Lactation management: 
Breast feeding 
techniques and 
positions, rest and 
nutrition for mother 
during breastfeeding 


Exclusive breastfeeding 


Expression and storage 
of breast milk 


Signs of hunger 


Supportive environment 
for breastfeeding 


Baby Friendly Hospital 
Initiative (BFHI) 
guidelines 


Health education to 


असाधारण 25 
Teaching Learning PO eee Methods of 
Activities 8 Assessment 


| | 


Tutorials and group 
work 


Scenarios 
Simulation 
Workshops 


Online lecture 


e Formative 
quiz 


Tutorials and group 
work 


Scenarios e Competency 


: | based OSCE 
Simulation 


e Summative 


Workshops न 


Online lecture 


26 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SECc.4] 


Unit | Hours | Learning Outcomes Content i. Acne oe Assignments हे लक 
Activities Assessment 
mother and family on 
breastfeeding 


Understand the Disease prevention and Tutorials and group Formative 
midwife’s role in immunization work quiz 


immunization Pe . ; 
Immunization Scenarios Summative 
| . exam 
Importance of Simulation 
Demonstrate skill in immunization 


immunization of the Workshops 
newborn Health education to 


family on current 
immunization schedule Self-directed 


Online lecture 


learning 


SECTION 4: COMPLEX CARE OF THE WOMEN AND NEWBORN, HEALTHY FAMILIES AND 
COMMUNITIES 


This section will develop students’ knowledge and skills in providing woman and family-centred, evidence-based 
midwifery care for women with complex needs across pregnancy, labour and birth and the puerperium, management 
of the compromised newborn. It further will provide student with a sound understanding of the midwifery role in 
primary health and optimising positive outcomes for the woman and her family. 


This will include but not limited to: assessment of risk; triaging, midwifery management and care of medical and 
obstetric complications and emergencies, provision of midwifery care in the event of poor maternal and/or neonatal 
outcomes or demise; law and ethics in relation to complex care; effective communication, collaboration, team work 
and referral; application and use of technology during complications of pregnancy, childbirth and the postpartum 
period, malpositions and abnormal presentations, cephalo-pelvic disproportion (CPD), preterm labour, disorders of 
uterine action; complications of third stage: obstetric emergencies, obstetric procedures induction of labour, basic 
life-saving skills - adult CPR; recognition and management of postnatal problems; identification of deviation from 
normal, puerperal pyrexia, puerperal sepsis, urinary complications, secondary postpartum haemorrhage, vulval 
haematoma, breast engorgement including mastitis/breast abscess, thrombophlebitis, DVT, uterine subinvolution, 
Vesico Vaginal Fistula (VVF), recto vaginal fistula (RVF), decision making about management and referral. 


Content on complex care of newborn will include but not limited to: Newborn mortality and major causes in 
India, care planning and midwifery management of the neonate with complex needs, use of technology; incorporation 
of family-focused care in the management of the compromised neonate; care in stillbirth and neonatal death, Models 
of newborn care in India - NBCC, SNCUs, NICU. Management of conditions include: prematurity, birth asphyxia, 
newborn sepsis, hypothermia, respiratory distress, hypoxia and asphyxia, jaundice, neonatal infections, high fever, 
convulsion neonatorum tetanus, low birth weight, congenital anomalies, haemorrahagic diseases, birth injuries, home 
based newborn care program - community facility integration in newborn care, calculation of fluid requirements, 
EBM/formula feeds/tube feeding, care of bereaved families, shared decision making about management and referral, 
Integrated Management of Neonatal Childhood Illnesses IMNCI). 


This section will also include: health promotion; disease prevention; family planning and family planning 
counselling using Balanced Counselling Strategy (BCS), cultural norms and cultural competence; community 
knowledge and understanding; men’s engagement in maternity care; reproductive health and rights; adolescent 
pregnancy; unintended pregnancy; post-abortion care; ICM Bill of rights for women and midwives. Care includes: 
impact of early/frequent childbearing, MTP Act, methods of MTP, post abortion family planning methods, 
collaboration with other health workers, social welfare schemes of Gol. 


SECTION 4: CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): 22 hours, Skills Lab (SL): 6 hours and Clinical (CL): 300 hours 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


Pat, | sours Outcomes Activities 

I T Identify, provide |Recognition and Management |e Discussion and e Write on health |e Essay, short 
initial of problems during Pregnancy | experiential learning assessment, answers and 
management and screening and MCQ 


Reg sede Se ices 
eview ० * Bedside clinics management of 


CL-70 |refer women with Oeee 


pregnancy within e Evaluation of 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


Unit | Hours 


Learning 
Outcomes 


the scope of 
midwifery 
practice 


Support women 
with complicated 
pregnancy and 
facilitate safe and 
positive birthing 
outcome 


भारत का राजपत्र : 


Content 


e Triaging and risk stratification 


e Performing and interpreting 
fetal surveillance (CTG/NST) 


e Review of complications 
during pregnancy (definition, 
causes, signs and symptoms, 
diagnosis, management and 
complications) 


o Bleeding in early 


pregnancy: 
v Abortion 
v Ectopic pregnancy 


४ Hydatidiform mole 


Bleeding in late pregnancy: 


v Antepartum haemorrhage 


- placenta previa, 
abruption placenta 


Hyperemesis gravidarum 


Pregnancy induced 
hypertension 


४ Pre-eclampsia 

v Eclampsia 
Multiple pregnancy 
Oligohydramnios 
Polyhydramnios 


Medical conditions in 
pregnancy 


v Anemia in pregnancy 


Y Gestational diabetes 
mellitus 


४ Cardiac disease 
४ Pulmonary disease 
४ Thyrotoxicosis 


४ Sexually transmitted 
diseases 


४ HIV/AIDS 
४ Rh incompatibility 


Infections in pregnancy - 
urinary tract infection, 
bacterial, viral, protozoal, 
fungal 


Intrauterine growth 
restriction 


Intrauterine fetal death 


Gynecological disorders 
complicating pregnancy 


o Adolescent pregnancy 


असाधारण 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 


Case presentation 
and discussion 


Simulation 


Safe Delivery App 
modules on post 
abortion care and 
hypertension 


Supervised clinical 
practice in antenatal 
ward/ OPD/Obstetric 
IUC 


i227 


| Methods of 
Assignments 
Assessment 
mothers Case 
study/case 
e Health education presentation 


plan 


e Case study plan 
and report 


]28 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SECc.4] 


Unit | Hours 


I 


Learning 
Outcomes 


Identify, provide 
initial 
management and 


refer women with 


problems during 
labour within the 


communication 
link between the 
midwife, women 
and families 


Collaborate with 
the obstetricians 
in the 
management of 
obstetric 
emergencies and 
complications 


Content Teaching Learning 
Activities 
o Elderly primi gravida and 
grand multipara 


Management of conditions as 
per the protocol 


Decision making for 


management and referral 
Policy for the referral services 


Role of NPM in management 
of the problems during 
pregnancy 


Recognition of deviations from |e Discussion and 
the normal and management experiential learning 


during labour _ 
Bed side clinics 


Review of 
Demonstration 
e Preterm labour: Prevention 
and management of preterm 
labour (use of antenatal 
corticosteroids in preterm 
labour) 


Seminar 
Case discussion 


e Premature rupture of 
membranes 


e Malposition’s and abnormal 
presentations (breech, brow, 
face) 


Cephalo Pelvic Disproportion 
(CPD) 


Disorders of uterine action 
o Prolonged labour 

० Precipitate labour 

o Dysfunctional labour 
Complications of 3 stage: 
o Retained placenta 

o Injuries to birth canal 


o Postpartum hemorrhage 
(bimanual compression of 
the uterus, aortic 
compression, uterine 
balloon tamponade) 


Obstetric emergencies 

० Ruptured uterus 

० Obstetrical shock 

o Amniotic fluid embolism 
० Foetal distress 

o Cord prolapses 

o Shoulder dystocia 

o Uterine inversion 


o Vasa previa 


Episiotomy and suturing with 
informed consent (types, 


Self-directed learning 


Assignments 


Case 
Presentation plan 
and report 


Simulations 


Safe Delivery 
App modules on 
PPH, Manual 
removal of 
Placenta and 
prolonged labour 


Supervised 
clinical practice 
in labour room/ 
obstetric 
casualty/ 
Obstetric IUC, 
operation theatre 


Scenario based 
learning 


Methods of 
Assessment 


Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 


Assessment of 
skills using 
procedure 
check list 


OSCE/ OSPE 


Assessment of 
case study 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


Learning 


Unit | Hours गत 5 


Il Identify, provide 
initial 
management and 


refer women with 


postnatal 
problems within 


and families for 
continuity of care 


Identify, manage 
and refer high- 
risk newborn 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Content 


indication etc.) 


Obstetric procedures 


o Forceps delivery 
o Vacuum delivery 


Manual removal of the 
placenta 


Induction of labour 


Caesarean section: indications 


& preparation 


Recognition and Management 
of postnatal problems 


Review of 


e Physical examination, 
identification of deviation 
from normal 


e Review of puerperal 
complications and its 
management 


o Puerperal pyrexia 
० Puerperal sepsis 
o Urinary complications 


o Secondary Postpartum 
hemorrhage 


o Vulval hematoma 


o Breast engorgement 
including mastitis/ breast 
abscess, feeding problem 


o Thrombophlebitis 
o DVT 
o Uterine subinvolution 


० Vesico vaginal fistula 
(VVF) 


o Recto vaginal fistula (R VF) 


o Postpartum blues/ psychosis 


e Decision making about 
management and referral 


e Clinical procedures as per the 
guidelines 


Recognition and Management 
of neonatal problems 


e Newborn mortality and major 
causes in India 


Models of newborn care in 
India - NBCC; SNCUs 


Screening of high-risk 
newborn 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 


e Discussion and 
experiential learning 


e Bedside clinics 


Discussion and 
experiential learning 


Demonstration 


Self-directed learning 


Seminar 
Case discussion 


Safe Delivery App 
video on newborn 


e Newborn 


]29 


Methods of 


Assignments 
8 Assessment 


Preparation of 
health talk 


Essay, short 
answers and 
MC 

Clinical Q 
presentation - 
plan & report 


Self-directed 
learning 


Assessment of 
skills with 
procedure 
check list 


Seminar 
Case discussion 


Supervised 
clinical practice 
in postnatal 
ward/ postnatal 
OPD/ obstetric 
casualty/ 
operation theatre 


Safe Delivery 
App module on 
Sepsis 


Discussion on 
variety of case 
studies/ 
simulation 
scenarios to 
practice decision 
making 


e Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 


assessment 
report 


Assessment of 
skills with 
procedure 
check list 


Assessment of 
clinical 


l30 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Unit | Hours one Content कि caching one Assignments Pe tnUs OF 
Outcomes Activities Assessment 
e Review of conditions affecting] resuscitation, performance 
newborns and their newborn with rating 
consequences management and low scale 
birth weight module C 
© Prematurity = = OSCE/ OSPE 
= Supervised clinical 
¢ Low birth weight practice in NICU/PN 
o Kangaroo Mother Care ward/well baby clinic 
e Birth asphyxia/Hypoxic " Role play 
encephalopathy 
e Newborn sepsis 
e Hypothermia 
e Respiratory distress 
e Jaundice 
e Neonatal infections 
e High fever 
Encourage C 
mother-infant है onyursions 
bonding e Neonatorum tetanus 


Congenital anomalies 


Hemorrhagic diseases 


Birth injuries 


SIDS (sudden infant death 
syndrome) prevention, 
Compassionate care 


Calculation of fluid 
requirements, EBM/ formula 
feeds/tube feeding 


Home based newborn care 
program - community facility 
integration in newborn care 


Decision making about 
management and referral 


Integrated Management of 
Neonatal Childhood IInesses 
(IMNCI) 


e Bereavement counseling 


Counsel women 
and families with 
situations 
requiring grief 
counseling 


V T Healthy families and e Discussion and e FP counseling |e Essay, short 
communities experiential learning | report answers and 


reparation MC 
e Health promotion & disease |e Demonstration per = 


prevention e Demonstration |e OSCE 


Explain various 
family welfare e Role plays 
services available |e Social and cultural norms and 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 


Learning 


Outcomes Content 


Unit | Hours 


to couples and 
families 


competence e Self-directed learning} 


Father’s engagement in e Seminar 


maternity care a 
e Supervised clinical 


practice in PN 
ward/PN OPD/FP 
ward/ 
PHC/CHC/HSC 


Counsel couples 
and provide 
family welfare 
services 


Family Welfare Services 
o Planned Parenthood 


o Impact of early/ frequent 
childbearing 


o Comprehensive range of 
family planning methods 


Y Action, effectiveness, 
advantages, 
disadvantages, myths, 
misconception and 
medical eligibility criteria 
(MEC) for use of various 
family planning methods 


o Emergency contraceptives 


o Family planning counseling 
using Balanced Counseling 
Strategy (BCS) 


o Importance of follow up 
and recommended timing 


० Unintended or mistimed 
pregnancy 


o Post abortion counseling 


o Collaboration with other 
health workers (especially 
ASHAs and ANMs) 


० Role of NPM in family 
planning program/ family 
welfare services 


Support the 

women with 
abortion and 
provide post 
abortion care 


I3] 


; Methods of 
Assignments 
Assessment 


Role plays 


Self-directed 
learning 


Seminar 


Supervised 
clinical practice 
in PN ward/PN 
OPD/FP ward/ 
PHC/CHC/ HSC 


Counselling on 
Family planning 
management to 
the couple 


SECTION 5: PHARMACOLOGY, INFECTION CONTROL & LEGAL AND ETHICAL ISSUES 


This section will deepen students’ knowledge and understanding of pharmacology to ensure safe practice for the 


woman, fetus and newborn. 


The content will include but not be limited to: pharmacokinetics; pharmacodynamics; quality use of medicines, 


medication therapy in emergency and complex care; drug classification and legislation as well as environmental 
hazards and teratogens. Complementary therapies and supplementation. The legal, regulatory and ethical frameworks 
and requirements of midwifery practice, including code of ethic and professional conduct, jurisdictional laws (incl. 
legislation regarding abortion), local policy and guidelines, respectful behaviour, human rights, humanizing birth, 
autonomy and shared decision making, confidentiality and privacy. It will also support students to develop skills on 
infection prevention and control measures in maternal and newborn care facilities. 


[32 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Unit | Hours 


I | T-20 


SECTION 5: CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): 24 hours and Skills Lab (SL): 2 hours 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


Outcomes Activities 


Applied pharmacology and = Lecture e Drug dosage 


fundamentals of prescribin ; calculation 
Describe the P है e Discussion and 


pharmacology |e Drugs used in obstetrics for experiential e Drug study/ answers and 
of drugs to be mothers and neonates learning presentation | essay 

used in 
obstetrics for 


mothers and Mechanism of action 

neonates e Review of e Case study |e Drug 
Dosage literature - laws analysis and | presentation 
Uses and regulations, discussion & Case 


Identify | trends of nurse reports 
challenges and |e Side effects prescribing 


Pees Role of NPMs - Advice to practice 
collaboration ow : 
women and family (including |, Integrated Clinical 
special precautions while practice in 


Classification e Self-directed e Writing e Case study 
learning prescription | analysis 


Identify taking medicines) maternal-neonatal 


teratogenicity Teratogenic effect of drugs eee 
and its 


e Writing 
prevention 


Classification of drugs as o 
prescription 


pregnancy risk category 


Documentation: accurate and 
complete records 


Fundamentals of prescribing 


o Principles of prescribing 
and factors influencing it 


o Process and steps of 
prescribing 


o Prescribing competencies 


Prescriptive role of Nurse 
Practitioners (National & 
International) 


Professional, legal and ethical 
issues relevant to prescribing 
practice 


Implications of wrong 
practices related to prescribing 
(using case studies) 


Prescription of medicines as 
per protocols (national 
guidelines & regulations - the 
Council/MoHFW) 


ए ७ List of drugs that can be 
लए administered by nurse 


aaa practitioner as approved by 
rugs for Gol 


women as per 
the protocols 


[ATT Ii—ave 4] 


Learning 


Unit | Hours Ouiconies 


infection 
control policies 


Explain the 
code of ethics 
and legal 
implications of 
various aspects 


Reflect on the 
nature of ethics 
and diverse 


outlooks of 
people 


भारत का राजपत्र 


Content 


Infection Control 


e National guidelines and 
institutional policy 


e Principles of prevention of 


infection 


e Standard precautions for 
prevention of infections 


o Hand washing 
o Use of protective attire 


o Processing of used 
items/equipment 


o Proper handling and 
disposal of sharps 


o Maintaining a clean 
environment 


o Biomedical waste disposal 


National infection control 
guidelines 


» असाधारण 


Teaching Learning 
Activities 


e Discussion and 
experiential 
learning 


Games 


Demonstration 
using IP materials 


Skill 
demonstrations - 
infection practices 
to reach expert 
level in IP 


Videos 
Clinical practice 


Self-directed 
learning 


Safe Delivery App 
module on IP 


Role of NPM and health team 


in infection prevention/ 
control 


Legal and ethical issues 


e National legal framework for 
Medical Practice including 
National Health Policy 20I7 


e IMNC Act 


e The Council/ICM Code of 
ethics and its implications 


Practice standards for 


midwifery and its rationale 


o Policies and procedures 


Discussion and 
experiential 
learning 


e Scenarios 


o Establishing standing orders 


and protocols 
o Informed consent 


Legal framework for 
midwifery practice and its 
implications 


Ethical issues in maternal and 


neonatal care 


Adoption laws, MTP Act, Pre- 
Natal Diagnostic Test (PNDT) 


Act, Surrogate mothers 


Scope and specifics of 


national MNH Guidelines of 


the MoHFW 


[33 


Methods of 


Assignments 


e Review notes|e OSCE/ 
on national 
guidelines 


Draw from 
clinical 
experience 
and write 
infection 
control 
related 
practice 
standards 


Assessment 


e Presentation |e Essay, short 


- ethical and 
legal issues 
in midwifery 


MCQ 


answers and 


34 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Unit | Hours Fearne Content हा cache आग Assignments DMeneds or 
Outcomes Activities Assessment 
COURSE MODULE III 


PREPARING MIDWIVES TO LEAD, MANAGE AND SUPERVISE QUALITY MIDWIFERY CARE 
Theory (T): |5 hours; Clinical (CL): 20 hours 
Course Aim 


The NPM educator will demonstrate skills of leadership, supervision and management for provision of quality 
midwifery education and practice. 


Course Description 


This module is designed to enable the NPM educators to develop an understanding of the principles of leadership, 
supervision and management. It also focuses on management of MLCUs, quality assurance of MNH services and 
continued professional development. 


Course Objectives 
l. Describe the importance of leadership, supervision, management and advocacy for midwifery. 


2. Demonstrate current midwifery knowledge and skills and recognize the role of continuing professional 
development. 


Competencies (WHO educator competencies) 

l. Provide facility-based mentoring for the NPM’s after placement. (6.3) 
Demonstrate effective communication using variety of methods in diverse care delivery settings. (7.) 
Demonstrate cultural competence in course design and development and teaching and midwifery practice. (7.2) 


2 

3 

4. Function as leaders and change agents to improve midwifery education and practice. (7.3) 
5. Use a variety of advocacy strategies to promote midwifery education and practice. (7.4) 

6 


Participate in professional development activities relevant to midwifery education. (7.5) 
CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): |5 hours and Clinical (CL): 20 hours 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


Unit | Hours Outcomes Activities 


I T Demonstrate an Midwifery leadership Tutorial, group work e Summative 


understanding of ee ere continuous 
contemporary eadership and styles Scenario-based 35460 007 62 


leadership (transformational leadership) | learning community 


development 


Identify elements Personality styles Online resources 
plan 


underpinning 

effective team 
building and Team building, Negotiation 
negotiation skills 


Myer Briggs personality style|e Personality quiz 


Conflict resolution 
Identify strategies to 


respond to Respectful communication 


community needs 


Emergency response, 
community development 


II T Identify key theories |Change theories and e Tutorial, group work e Summative 
of change transformative practice report on 


e Scenario-based . 
. ] h ] 
Describe e Change theories learning eadership styles 


transformative 
midwifery practice |* Agents of change e Online resources 
e Transformative care 


e Innovation 


Unit | Hours 


Learning 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 35 
Content T eaching Learning Acsiaaments Methods of 
Activities Assessment 


lil 


IV 


Outcomes 


Describe role of 
NPM in 
management and 
supervision of 
maternal and 
neonatal care in 
various health care 
settings including 
MLCUs 


Utilize advocacy 
skills and cultural 
competence for 
promoting 
midwifery education 
and MLCC 


Describe and utilize |Records and Reports 


the different types 
of records and 
reports in midwifery 
care and their 
importance 


Perform clinical 
audits based on the 
role of nurse 
midwives 


Management including 
management of MLCU’s 


e Management 


o Definition, principles and 
elements 


o Management of (time, 
material and personnel) 
MLCU 


o Team management 


o Material management - 
equipment and supplies 


Supervision 


o Definition, objectives and 
types of supervision 


o Mentoring - facility based 
mentoring for NPMs 


Quality Assurance 


o Nursing and midwifery 
audit 


० Quality assurance of MNH 
services 


Quality assurance of 
midwifery training 


Advocacy 


o Definition, principles, 
type/level of advocacy, 
advocacy skills for 
midwives 


Importance of records 
keeping 


Various records and reporting |e 
formats to be maintained in 
MLCU 


Record storage systems 
Retrieval of records 
E-records 


Role of nurse midwives in 
clinical audits - MPDSR; 
Newborn death audit; 
Caesarean audits; maternal 
and newborn service audits 


Practical utility of regular 
records and reporting 


MoHFW Clinical Case 
Sheets for MNH including 
safe childbirth checklist 


Role of NPM in reviewing 
and reporting the data in 
terms of indicators and 


e Discussion and 


e Exercises/ 
case studies 


e Essay, short 
answers and 
MCQ 


experiential learning 
Scenarios 

Case studies 

Role play 


Observation 


List of 
records and 
reports in 
MLCU 


Discussion and 
experiential learning 


e Essay, short 

answers and 
MCQ 
Seminar 
Orientation on 
various records and 
reporting formats in 
MNH area 


Supervised clinical 
practice in 
PHC/CHC/ 
HSC/DH/ MCH 


36 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


Unit | Hours Outcomes Activities 


discussion how that impacts 


care being provided 


COURSE MODULE IV 
PREPARING MIDWIVES FOR EVIDENCE-BASED MIDWIFERY PRACTICES 
Theory (T): |5 hours, Clinical (CL): 20 hours 
Course Aim 
The NPM educator will identify and utilize evidence in the practice of midwifery. 
Course Description 


This module is designed to enable the NPM educators to develop an understanding of research process and 
utilization of evidence in daily midwifery practice. 


Course Objectives 

l. Develop effective learning and teaching practice and resources based on evidence. 

2. Utilize the assessment and evaluation data to critically analyze and enhance midwifery practice. 

3. Demonstrate an understanding of quality indicators in education and as they relate to midwifery practice. 
Competencies (WHO educator competencies) 

l. Use research and inform teaching and practice (8.) 


2. Cultivate a culture supporting critical inquiry and evidence-based practice. (8.2) 


3. Train NPM’s to develop skills to conduct, communicate and utilize research. (8.3) 
CONTENT OUTLINE 
Theory (T): |5 hours and Clinical (CL): 20 hours 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


nit | Hours eee 
7 Outcomes Activities 
I ye Knowledge and utilization of Discussion and e Literature Essay/short 
research and evidence experiential search on answers and 


® ० ० a ] i M H M C 
Qualitative & Quantitative one NH care Q 


Research Portfolio, reflection |e Research Assessment 
activities and report of 


e Overview of qualitative and 
planned modules assignments 


Describe the quantitative research paradigms 
research process, 
quantitative and 
qualitative methods 


A research study Assessment 
based on area of of completed 
work (e.g., WHO research 
Intrapartum study - 
Research approaches and designs| | tecommendations presentation 

or LAQSHYA and report 
Methodology indicators) 


Research questions in 
quantitative and qualitative 
research 


Discuss the value of 
evidence in the o Sampling EBMP - Journal 
context of best & ‘Data collechon =tooleand club (discussion of 
practices in techniques evidence on 
maternity care midwifery 
Analysis and interpretation of practices) 
data 


Communication, dissemination 
Demonstrate and utilization of research - 
application of academic integrity, correct 


academic integrity referencing 
principles and 
correct use of 


Research critique 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 37 


Teaching Learning Methods of 


Learning Content Assignments Assessment 


Unit | Hours ae 
Outcomes Activities 
Literature search strategies - 
selection of relevant literature 


Critical appraisal, analysis and 

synthesis 
Identify and utilize 
evidence through 
review of literature Statistics 
and valid 
recommendations Sources and presentation of data 
for midwifery 
practice 


Writing literature review 


Statistical packages and its 
application 


Preparing research proposal 


Evidence based midwifery 
Identify and select |practice (EBMP) 
relevant literature 


e Recommended sources of 
data/evidence - 
Facility/District/State - available 
registers, HMIS, DLHS, Indian - 
Analyze and NFHS, RHS, SRS, HMIS, 
synthesise research DLHS, AHS, Census, MoHFW 
literature Gol guidelines 


Global standards - WHO 
recommendations; ICM 
recommendations; 
Demonstrate CONCHRANE; State of Worlds 
understanding of Midwifery 
different levels of 
evidence 


Research priorities in midwifery 


Utilization of facility data for 
improvement in health services; 
health outcomes 


Describe the use of 
evidence in practice 


3. STRUCTURED MENTORSHIP 


The clinical residency program is of 6 months duration to develop educational abilities as well as to ensure 
clinical skills are up to date. This can be made more effective by integrating the 2-month mentorship and a portfolio 
approach, which is seen as an extension of the residency program. 


A portfolio is a collection of experiences and reflections which the student gathers across the mentorship period 
and includes continuity of care experiences and provides a competency-based approach to learning and assessment. 
The portfolio provides evidence of learning and competence, contextualizing the learning and linking it with theory 
and practice. Students are required to develop their learning plan having identified learning needs and objectives for 
their clinical practice experience. The portfolio helps the student develop self-directed learning and critical reflection. 
It provides personal and professional evidence of the student’s learning and is used as a means to promote interactions 
between students and preceptors, mentors and/or teachers. Students receive feedback based on competencies achieved 
and documented reflective practice. The portfolio will be paper based initially but with the development of an 
e-portfolio anticipated. The structure may include a title page (giving student’s name, year of training and name of the 
mentor), contents page, a list of learning objectives, clinical experience records and a short reflection on each 
experience. A competency assessment will be collected during clinical placements and specific skills will be assessed 
for competency according to the ICM essential competencies. A final reflective overview will summarize the learning 
that has taken place since the last portfolio review. 


Preceptorship and mentoring are crucial for competency-based learning and assessment, as it enhances the 
feedback process and stimulates students’ reflections in relation to the ICM competencies. Students will have 
individual mentors allocated for their mentorship experience. The aims of mentoring are to: provide feedback; 
stimulate reflection; support students in compiling the portfolio; monitor students’ competency development; support 
students in developing a better awareness and understanding of their strengths and weaknesses; support students in 


36 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


creating a learning plan for the placement; and motivate/inspire students. The mentors will be required to complete a 
competency assessment of general and specific practice skills. 


If the organisation and logistics permit students should be brought together for at least l], 2 or 3 workshop 
intensives in which they share experience, what went well, what was difficult, with tutor support. The students will 
bring with them teaching material they have prepared. They will use their log books, keep their portfolio, and reflect 
on experience. 


During this period students should be encouraged to have peer support of each other. 


Mentorship Plan 


Objective: Onsite orientation of local stakeholders, gap analysis and support for initiating midwifery service 


Baseline assessment - Training infrastructure, clinical practice site and midwifery services. 

Unlearning of practices and encompassing the normal physiological aspects of births. 

Clinical mentoring - Focus on organizing ANC clinic, triaging area, childbirth education area, labor room. 
Clinical mentoring - Support in running antenatal clinic, triaging area and childbirth education area. 
Handholding support for antepartum and intrapartum care. 

Clinical mentoring - Support in running antenatal clinic, triaging area and childbirth education area. 
Handholding support for antepartum and intrapartum care. 


Reflections with educators. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, competency assessment and training on PPH 


Reflections with educators, NPM trainees and obstetric champions to identify challenges. 


Clinical mentoring - Support in running antenatal clinic, triaging area and childbirth education area. 
Handholding support for antepartum and intrapartum care. 

Competency assessment for antenatal health education, abdominal examination, vaginal examination. 
Obstetric emergency drill - PPH. 


Clinical Mentoring - Support in running antenatal clinic, triaging area and childbirth education area. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, clinical training on CTG, Pre-eclampsia and eclampsia identification and 
management, competency assessments 


e Clinical teaching on CTG monitoring and interpretation. 
e Obstetric emergency drill - Pre-Eclampsia/Eclampsia. 


e Competency assessment - Management of first stage of labor, care of 2™ Stage, physiological third stage of labour 
and AMTSL. 


e Clinical Mentoring - Support in running antenatal clinic, triaging area and childbirth education area. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, clinical training on induction of labor, NBR and competency assessments 


e Clinical teaching on induction of labor. 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 39 


e Obstetric emergency drill — NBR. 
e Competency assessment of clinical skills - CTG monitoring, new born care and assessment, post-natal care. 


e Clinical Mentoring- Support in running antenatal clinic, triaging area and childbirth education area. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, clinical training, family planning and competency assessments 


Reflections with educators, NPM trainees and obstetric champions to identify challenges. 

Clinical teaching - Family planning counselling and IUCD insertion (Interval and PPIUCD). 
Competency assessment of clinical skills - Episiotomy, perineal assessment and suturing. 

Clinical Mentoring - Support in running antenatal clinic, triaging area and childbirth education area. 


Handholding support for antepartum and intrapartum care. 


Objective: Clinical handholding and clinical teaching on Midwifery care - abortion related services 


Competency assessment - consolidating skills. 


Clinical teaching - Midwifery care - abortion related services (Bereavement counselling, advice in terms of safe 
abortion). 


Clinical Mentoring - Support in organizing competency assessments for NPM trainees. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, competency assessments and support for preparation of research protocol 


e Competency assessment - Consolidating skills. 


e Teaching - Research proposal development. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, competency assessments and review on IMNCI protocols 


e Competency assessment - consolidating skills. 


e Teaching - IMNCI protocols. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, competency assessments and review on Facility Based New-born Care protocols 


e Competency assessment - consolidating skills. 


e Teaching - Facility Based New-born Care protocols. 


Objective: Clinical handholding, competency assessments 


Objective: Clinical handholding, competency assessments 


l40 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Objective: Competency based assessments of midwifery educators and appraisal of research study 


Dr. T. DILEEP KUMAR, President 


[ADVT.-I/4/Exty ./796/2023-24] 
4. ANNEXURES 


ANNEXURE-I 
ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE NPM EDUCATOR 


The NPM Educator will ensure the implementation of Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) program and train 
those who enroll for the course at the State Midwifery Training Institutes. 


e The NPM Educator will ensure that trainee NPM’s who enroll for NPM course are adequately exposed to theory 
and practice during the entire program. 


e The NPM Educator will follow the curriculum prescribed by the Council to provide details of content in theory, 
practice, and internship along with lesson plans for standardized training. 


e The NPM Educator will also be in charge of keeping a record for every NPM student (logbook). A copy of the 
same will remain with the NPM student as well. This will be managed as a joint responsibility to ensure 
participatory learning. 


e The NPM Educator would be required to continuously update their knowledge and participate in professional 
development activities relevant to midwifery education. 


e To maintain competency, the NPM Educator will also practice in the clinical facility of the training institute and 
provide comprehensive midwifery care to the women under her care. He/She would focus on the care of women 
with low-risk pregnancies for whom he/she provides antenatal care and offers support to women during labour 
and childbirth. After birth he/she focuses on ensuring that the mother and baby are well, develops close bonding 
and makes sure that the baby has the best start in life. He/She also utilizes her knowledge and competencies to 
identify deviations from normal pregnancy, labour and postpartum care, provide initial management and obtain 
appropriate medical help as indicated. 


ANNEXURE-II 
ICM ESSENTIAL COMPETENCIES FOR MIDWIFERY PRACTICE (209) 


COMPETENCY CATEGORY I: GENERAL COMPETENCIES 


NPMs demonstrate professional accountability as an autonomous practitioner in the delivery of midwifery care as 
per ICM standards adopted by the Council that are consistent with moral, altruistic and humanistic principles in 
midwifery practice. 


Competencies 

la. Assume responsibility for own decisions and actions as an autonomous practitioner. 

lb. Assume responsibility for self-care including personal safety and self-development as a midwife. 

lc. Appropriately delegate aspects of care and provide supervision. 

ld. Utilize research to informed practice. 

le. Uphold the fundamental human rights of individuals when providing midwifery care. 

lf. Adhere to jurisdictional laws, ethical, regulatory requirements, codes of conduct for midwifery practice. 
lg. Facilitate women to make individual choices about care. 


lh. Demonstrate effective interpersonal communication with women and families, health care teams, and community 
groups. 


li. Facilitate normal birth processes in institutional and community settings, including women’s homes. 

lj. Assess the health status, screen for health risks, and promote general health and well-being of women and infants. 
lk. Prevent and treat common health problems related to reproduction and early life. 

ll. Recognize conditions outside midwifery scope of practice and refer appropriately. 


Im. Care for women who experience physical and sexual violence and abuse. 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 4] 


COMPETENCY CATEGORY वा: PRE-PREGNANCY AND ANTENATAL 


NPMs perform health assessment of woman and fetus, promote their health and well-being, detect complications 
during pregnancy, and provide care to women with unexpected pregnancy. 


Competencies 

2a. Provide pre-pregnancy and antenatal care. 

2b. Determine health status of women. 

2c. Assess the fetal wellbeing. 

2d. Monitor the progression of pregnancy. 

2e. Promote and support health behaviors that improve their wellbeing. 

2f. Provide anticipatory guidance related to pregnancy, birth, breastfeeding, parenthood, and change in the family. 
2g. Detect, manage, and refer women with complicated pregnancies. 

2h. Assist the woman and her family to plan for an appropriate place of birth. 

2. Provide care to women with unintended or mistimed pregnancy. 

COMPETENCY CATEGORY III: CARE DURING LABOUR AND CHILDBIRTH 


The NPMs continue to monitor and provide care to woman during labour that facilitates physiological processes 
and a safe birth, immediate care to newborn infant and detect complications in mother and infant. 


Competencies 

3a. Promote physiologic labour and birth. 

3b. Manage a safe spontaneous vaginal birth and prevent complications. 

3c. Provide care of the newborn immediately after birth. 

COMPETENCY CATEGORY IV: ONGOING CARE OF WOMEN AND NEWBORNS 


The NPMs continue to perform health assessment of mother and infant, provide health education and support for 
breast feeding, detect complications, and initiate family planning services. 


Competencies 

4a. Provide postnatal care for the healthy woman. 

4b. Provide care to healthy newborn infant. 

4c. Promote and support breast feeding. 

4d. Detect and treat or refer postnatal complications in woman. 
4e. Detect and manage health problems in newborn infant. 

Af. Provide family planning services. 


ANNEXURE-ITI 
CLINICAL LOGBOOK FOR NPM EDUCATORS (PROCEDURAL COMPETENCIES/SKILLS) 


Performs independently/ 


Performs collaborativel ices 
S.No. Specific Procedural Competencies/Skills व कक कि Signature of 
with doctor/Assists in F 
the Faculty 


procedures (P/PC/A) * 
l |ANTENATAL CARE 
l.l |Health assessment of antenatal woman: History taking, 
physical examination and obstetrical examination 


].2 |Urine pregnancy test 


]42 


S.No. 


2.l0 


DAZ 


2.4 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 
Performs collaboratively |. Date & 
Specific Procedural Competencies/Skills . seh eed Signature of 
with doctor/Assists in F 
the Faculty 


procedures (P/PC/A) * 


Estimation of hemoglobin using Sahli’s hemoglobinometer/ true a ae 
Hb-P 


बा. आन बा 
Se ae बनाके 
ee 
ee 
बा आज 


Perform USG PC 


Fetal patterns/Kick chart/DFMC (Daily Fetal Movement Count) 


Preparation and recording of Cardiotocography (CTG)/ 
Non-Stress Test (NST)/Contraction Stress Test (CST) 


Preparation/assisting woman for antenatal investigations - 
amniocentesis, cordocentesis, chorionic villus sampling 


Antenatal counseling - diet & exercise 
Administration of TT/Td-P 
Prescription of iron and folic acid tablets 


Prenatal counseling and care of general and vulnerable groups 
such as adolescent pregnant mothers 


C 


=. 
2 
| 
7 
> 
Z 
s 
= 
> 
o 
(0 
> 
7 
Ss 


Identification, assessment and admission of woman in labour 


C है है nv G 


ru 
(9 
पे 
ie) 
ian) 
= 
(2 
— 
८2 
go) 
(2 


Vaginal examination during labour including clinical pelvimetry 
Plotting and interpretation of partograph 

Preparation for birthing - physical and psychological 
Setting up of the birthing room/unit 

Pain management during labour - non-pharmacological 
Supporting normal births 

Episiotomy only if required and repair 

Essential newborn care 

Active management of third stage of labour 
Examination of placenta 

Care during fourth stage of labour 


Initiation of breast feeding and lactation management 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 43 


S.No. 


5.6 


ae 
5.8 
5.9 


5.0 


Sell 
Sl 2 


5.3 


Performs independently/ 


Performs collaboratively Las 
Specific Procedural Competencies/Skills . Pane Signature of 
with doctor/Assists in F 
the Faculty 


procedures (P/PC/A) * 


a आम 
a आधा 
= आन बात 
बा ee माहाए 
_ ह# 

का 

ee 


Postnatal counseling - diet, exercise & breast feeding 
Postpartum family planning 


Assessment of newborn including gestational age 
Baby bath 
Kangaroo Mother Care 


Identification of minor disorders of newborn and their 
management 


Neonatal immunization - Administration of BCG, Hepatitis B 
vaccine 


CARE OF WOMAN WITH COMPLICATIONS/HIGH RISK MOTHER 


मा 
antepartum hemorrhage 

a ee /_ 
धान es बना 
जा आधा 


Preparation of woman for emergency/elective caesarean section A 
and assisting in caesarean 


Prepare the mother and perform vacuum delivery when P&PC 


favourable 
Diagnosis of malpresentations and malpositions 
Diagnosis and management of cord presentation/cord prolapse P& PC 


Early diagnosis of preterm labor 


Prepare, assess suitability and support the mother during breech 
delivery when favorable 


go) 
(2 


Conduct Breech delivery 


Infection prevention during labor and newborn care 


Diagnosis and management of prolonged labour 


l44 


S.No. 


5.4 


5.5 


5.8 


है 2 । 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART III—SEc.4] 
Performs collaboratively |. Date & 
Specific Procedural Competencies/Skills . seh eed Signature of 
with doctor/Assists in F 
the Faculty 


procedures (P/PC/A) * 


Prepare and perform low forceps operation 


BS] 
(2 


| 


Manual removal of the placenta 


Diagnosis and initial management of PPH P& PC 
Bimanual compression of uterus 


Balloon tamponade for atonic uterus 


Aortic compression for PPH 


Prescription and administration of fluids and electrolytes 
through intravenous 


Repair of perineal and vaginal tears (upto II degree) 


Repair of perineal and vaginal tears (above II degree) 


Diagnosis and management of puerperal sepsis P& PC 


P&PC 


so so 
Hh | I 


Identification of high-risk newborn 
Neonatal resuscitation 


Assisting in neonatal diagnostic procedures 


4 
न 
न 
. 

4 
न 


Fr 
a 
6 
5 
— 
= 
ga 
2 
mh 
3 
= 
0५ 
is 
= 
Nn 
~ 
5 
o 
= 
छः 
© 
an) 
5 
es 
z 
o—~ 
N 
5S) 
© 
© 
= 
a=) 
© 
— 
o 
on 
= 


Insertion/removal/feeding - Naso/orogastric tube 


Administration of medication - oral/parenteral 


Care of neonate in incubator/warmer/Vventilator 


Neonatal intubation/ventilator 


Transportation of high-risk newborn 


Oi |) CO Ql) Zz 
SS n fe) 4 if) 
ga 22 | Ke fo) 
2 n @ 0५ 5 
Sill et" || 26 6 x) 
S|) s| = Sis 
(9 5 rat) — 
Nn (9 (9 ८. (० म 
0. * o =) 5 
Pp a i) =" 0५ 
oO tel) o> 5 ‘ 
6 हि ८ Z| § 
S| oo} 5 as | Oo 
co one पट 
— = ao) = — 
OQ © = ie) 9 
< 5 5 =) =. 
6 | al हैं © 
fo) n. > 
Pr | 6 | & 
te) 
al) le 
(८ < 
5 
je) 
o 
te) 
— 
Q 
= 
(9 


=i 
2| g 
g.| 2 
5 
z.| = 
as 
S| > 
S| 7 
=) 
6 es) 
5: 
ga 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 45 


Performs independently/ 


Performs collaboratively | q. pale ® 
S.No. Specific Procedural Competencies/Skills . Pane Signature of 
with doctor/Assists in F 
the Faculty 


procedures (P/PC/A) * 


7.2 |Distribution of temporary contraceptives - condoms, OCP’s, 
emergency contraception 


Insertion and removal of Interval IUCD 


= 
ae) 


Insertion and removal of PPIUCD/PAIUCD 


oy 
n 


Counselling of the woman for Postpartum sterilization 


cy 
OV 


I 
~ 


Prepare and assist in tubectomy 


OTHER PROCEDURES 


oe) 


oo 
— 


Prepare and assist for D&C/D&E operations 


oa 
NO 


(22 
be 


Perform Manual Vacuum Aspiration P& PC 


Post abortion care 


a 
a 


Post abortion family planning services 


7 
ni 


Post abortion counseling 


se 
OO 


Pre-conception nutritional assessment, screening HIV, Cervical 
cancer 


Sor 
क 


Preconception counseling and care 


Pap smear 


eo 
\o 


eC 
ore 


Visual inspection with acetic acid/iodine 


8.l0 |Counseling on breast self-examination 


oe 
go) 
(2 


Conduction of maternal and perinatal death audit 
8.l2 |Maintenance of registers 


8.l3 |Maintenance of records 


* When the learner is found competent to perform the skill, the faculty/trainer will sign it. 


Learners: are expected to perform the listed skills/competencies many times until they reach level 3 competency, 
after which the faculty signs against each competency. 


Faculty/Trainers: Must ensure that the signature is given for each competency only after they reach level 3. 

e Level 3: competency denotes that the leaner is able to perform that competency without supervision 

e Level 2: Competency denotes that the learner is able to perform each competency with supervision 

e Level l: competency denotes that the learner is not able to perform that competency/skill even with supervision 
PORTFOLIO 


The skills that require collaborative performance and that are only assisted can be followed up even during 
mentorship and maintained through portfolio. However, the skills that need to be performed independently and the 
learners are able to reach level 3 performance have to be completed before appearing for the final examination at the 
end of 6 months. 


ANNEXURE-IV 
NPM EDUCATOR TRAINING PROGRAM: CLINICAL REQUIREMENTS 


[46 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Signature of the 
Faculty/Preceptor 


S.No. Clinical Requirement Date 


3 


Observing normal births - 5 


Facilitating normal births from |*' stage (¢ndependent) - 40 


cs 
i 
cz 


Antenatal care study - 2 (normal - |, high risk - ) 


Diagnosis: 
Intrapartum care study - 2 (normal - I, high risk - ) 
Postnatal care study - 2 (normal - |, high risk - |) 
Diagnosis: 
Newborn care study - | 
Diagnosis: 
Clinical presentation - 4 
e Antenatal: 
e = Intra natal: 
Postnatal: 


e Newborn: 


Health talk 
Antenatal - Topic: 
Postnatal - Topic 
Newborn - Topic: 


Family Welfare - Topic: 


Counseling mothers & family members 


l. 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण [47 


Signature of the 
Faculty/Preceptor 


S.No. Clinical Requirement Date 


Antenatal in-patient reviews - 2 
l. 
pe 


Clinical Seminar/Clinical Conference 


Topic: 


Drug study, presentation and report - | 


Drug: 


Visits - report 


e = Peripheral health facility 


॥| 
Topic: 


Microteaching sessions - Theory - 4 
॥ 
2 
3. 
4 
Microteaching - Skill demonstration - 4 


l. 


2 
3. 
4 


Signature of the Program Coordinator 


ANNEXURE-V 
NPM EDUCATOR TRAINING PROGRAM: CLINICAL EXPERIENCE DETAILS 


Number of days Signature of 


Area of Posting Clinical Condition care given Faculty/Preceptor 


[46 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEc.4] 


Signature of the Program Coordinator 


ANNEXURE-VI 
LEARNING RESOURCES 


List of GoI Guidelines (RMNCH) 

e Guideline on Midwifery Services in India (20I8) 

e LaQshya: Labour Room Quality Improvement Initiative Guideline 

e Guidelines for Standardization of Labour Rooms at Delivery Point 

e Dakshata: Empowering Providers for Improved MNH Care during Institutional Deliveries 


e SBA: Guidelines for Antenatal Care and Skilled Attendance at Birth by ANMs/LHVs/SNs, Handbook and 
Trainers Guide 


e IMNCI Training Modules, Photo and Chart Booklets 

e Navjat Shishu Suraksha Karyakram Guidelines 

e Routine Immunization Handbook for Health Workers 

e Postpartum Family Planning Handbook for Service Providers 

e IUCD Reference Manual for Medical Officers and Nursing Personnel 
e PPIUCD Reference Manual 


e Operational Guidelines: Introduction of Haemophilus influenza b (Hib) as Pentavalent Vaccine in Universal 
Immunization Program of India 


e Use of Antenatal Corticosteroids in preterm Labour 

e = Facility based IMNCI (F-IMNCI) (Participants Manual and Chart Booklet) 
e Guidance Note on use of Uterotonics during labour 

e Vitamin K Prophylaxis at Birth (in facilities) 

e National Guideline for Calcium Supplementation during Pregnancy 

e National Guideline on Management of Hypothyroidism during Pregnancy 


० National Guidelines for Diagnosis & Management of Gestational Diabetes Mellitus 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 49 


e Screening for Syphilis during Pregnancy 

० National Guidelines Respectful Newborn Care - Child Health Division, MoHFW 

e Guidance for Mentoring and Support Visit - DAKSHATA 

e Assessment Guidelines for Selection of NPM Educators - MoHFW Guidelines 

Other Resources 

e WHO Report on Strengthening Quality Midwifery Care and Midwifery Education 

e The Lancet Series 20I4, 20I8 - Midwifery Quality Maternal and Newborn Care (QMNC) Framework 
e ICM Essential Competencies for Midwifery Practice (20l8 update) Framework Structure 
e WHO Midwifery Educator Competencies 

e Safe Delivery App 

e Pairman et al, Midwifery Preparation for Practice (209) 

e Downe and Byrom, Squaring the Circle (209) 

e Downe and Byrom, ROAR Compassionate Care 

e Midwifery Continuity of Care, 2™ Edition 

e Caroline Homer, Pat Brodie, Jane Sandall and Nicky Leap 


e Empowering Decision-making in Midwifery: A Global Perspective, I*t Edition by Elaine Jefford (Editor), Julie 
Jomeen (Editor) 


e Dahlen H., Schmied V., Hazard B., Birthing Outside the System: The Canary in the Coalmine (209) 
e Visaria L., Midwifery and Maternal Health in India (20I0) 

e WHO, Midwives Voices, Midwives Realities (206) 

e UNFPA. State of World’s Midwifery (204) 

E- Resources 


e = https://www.who.int/maternal_child_adolescent/topics/quality-of-care/midwifery/strengthening-midwifery- 
education/en/ 


e = https://www.who.int/hrh/nursing_midwifery/educator_competencies/en/ 


e = https://www. internationalmidwives.org/our-work/policy-and-practice/essential-competencies-for-midwifery- 
practice.html 


e = https://www.cochrane.org/CD004667/PREG_midwife-led-continuity-models-care-compared-other-models-care- 
women-during-pregnancy-birth-and-early 


e = https://www.whiteribbonalliance.org/wp-content/uploads/207/] l/Final_RMC_Charter.pdf 
e = https://transform.childbirthconnection.org/reports/physiology/ 

e = https://www. whiteribbonalliance.org/whatwomenwant/ 

References 


e Biesta G. (20I5) What is education for? On Good Education, Teacher Judgement and Educational 
Professionalism, European Journal of Education, 50(\), 75-87 


e Cranton P. (2009) Understanding and Promoting Transformative Education: A Guide for Educators of Adults, 
Canadian Journal of University Continuing Education, 35() 


e Chorazy M. and Klinedinst K. (20I9) Learning by doing: A model for incorporating high-impact experiential 
learning into an undergraduate public health curriculum. Frontiers in Public Health Journal, 7(3]), |-6 


e Dewey J. ((938) Experience and Education. New York, NY: Collier Books 


e Finlay L. (2008) Reflecting on ‘Reflective Practice’. ‘t ed. [ebook] The Open University, Accessed on 2" July 
209 at http://www.open.ac.uk/opencetl/files/opencetl/file/ecms/web-content/Finlay-(2008)-Reflecting- 


on-reflective-practice-PBPL-paper-52.pdf 


l50 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


e Friere P. (972) Pedagogy of the Oppressed, Penguin Books, Hammondsworth, UK 


e Gibbs G. (I988) Learning by Doing: A guide to teaching and learning methods, Further Education Unit, Oxford 
Polytechnic: Oxford 


e Homer C.S.E., Friberg I.K., Dias M.A.B., ten Hoope-Bender P., Sandall J., Speciale A.M. & Bartlett L.A. (20I4) 
The projected effect of scaling up midwifery. The Lancet, 384 (9948), 46-lI57 


e Kolb D.A. (984) Experiential Learning: Experience as the Source of Learning and Development, Englewood 
Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall 


e Mezirow J. ([99]) Transformative dimensions of adult learning, Jossey-Bass, San Francisco 


e Renfrew M.J., Mcfadden A., Bastos M.H., Campbell J., Channon A.A., Cheung N.F., Silva D.R.A.D., Downe S., 
Kennedy H.P., Malata A., Mccormick F., Wick L. & Declercq E. (20l4) Midwifery and quality care: findings 
from a new evidence-informed framework for maternal and newborn care, The Lancet, 384, 29-45 


e Miller S., Abalos E., Chamillard M., Ciapponi A., Colaci D., Comandé D., Diaz V., Geller S., Hanson C., Langer 
A., Manuelli V., Millar K., Morhason-Bello I., Castro C.P., Pileggi, V.N., Robinson N., Skaer M., Souza J.P., 
Vogel J.P. & Althabe F. (206) ‘Beyond too little, too late and too much, too soon: a pathway towards evidence- 
based, respectful maternity care worldwide’, The Lancet, 388 (0056), 276-292. 


e ICM Essential Competency Standards for the Midwife (ICM 20]8) accessed on July 2" July 209 at 
https://www.internationalmidwives.org/our-work/policy-and-practice/essential-competencies-for- 


midwifery-practice.html 


e Sandall J., Soltani H., Gates S., Shennan A., Devane D. (20I6) Midwife-led continuity models versus other 
models of care for childbearing women, Cochrane Database of Systematic Reviews, Issue 4. Art. No.: CD004667. 
DOI: 0.002/465858.CD004667.pub5 


e Smith M., Warnes S. & Vanhoestenberghe A (20I8) Scenario-based learning in Teaching and Learning in Higher 
Education: Perspectives from UCL, Ch. l0 Ed Davies J and Pachler N., UCL Institute of Education Press, 
University College, London 


e Tracy S K., Welsh A., Hall B., Hartz D., Lainchbury A., Bisits A., White J. & Tracy M.B. (20I4) Caseload 
midwifery compared to standard or private obstetric care for first time mothers in a public teaching hospital in 
Australia: a cross sectional study of cost and birth outcomes. BMC Pregnancy and Childbirth, 4, 46 


e United Nations Population Fund (UNFPA) 204. The State of the World’s Midwifery, A Universal Pathway. A 
Woman’s Right to Health 


e World Health Organization (WHO) 20l3a. Midwifery educator core competencies, Geneva. 


e World Health Organization (WHO) 20l3b. WHO recommendations on postnatal care of the mother and newborn, 
Geneva 


e World Health Organization (WHO) 20]4a. Midwifery educator core competencies adaptation tool, Geneva 


e World Health Organization (WHO) 20l4b. WHO midwifery educator core competencies: building capacities of 
midwifery educators, Geneva 


e World Health Organization (WHO) 20l6. WHO recommendations on antenatal care for a positive pregnancy 
experience, Geneva 


e World Health Organization (WHO) 20l8. WHO recommendation: intrapartum care for a positive childbirth 
experience, Geneva 


e World Health Organization (WHO) 20I9. Strengthening quality midwifery education for Universal Health 
Coverage 2030: Framework for action, Geneva 


ANNEXURE-VII 
EXAMINATION GUIDELINES FOR 
NURSE PRACTITIONER MIDWIFERY EDUCATOR PROGRAM 


Indian Nursing Council 
INTRODUCTION 


The Government of India (Gol) is implementing the ‘Midwifery initiative’ in India to bring about a 
transformation in the quality of care given to women and their families during pregnancy, labour, childbirth and 
postpartum period. This initiative has brought about the setting up of a new cadre of Nurse Practitioners in Midwifery 


[भाग ता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण I5] 
(NPM) who would be functioning under the title “Nurse Practitioner Midwife’ providing compassionate, respectful, 
competent and women centered midwifery care. 


These NPMs are trained by the NPM educators at the State Midwifery Training Institutes (SMTI). The knowledge 
and skills of the NPM educators are standardized through a specialized NPM educator program which includes 6 
months of intensive residential training in the national midwifery training institute (NMTI) followed by onsite 
mentoring for !2 months. The NPM educators would receive their certification at the end of !8 months on successful 
completion of the program. This training program is conducted by a group of 6 international trainers and 6 national 
trainers who are the faculty trainers for this program. 


During their training program, the NPM educators undergo 3 assessments/examinations: 
(i) First assessment after 3 months of training 
(ii) Second assessment after 6 months of residential training for provisional certification 


(iii) Final assessment/examination for certification at the end of 8 months, that is after 2 months of onsite 
training with mentorship. 


This document gives a complete description of the preparation and process of conduction of examination and 
certification. 


EXAMINING AUTHORITY 


The examining authority for the NPM educator program will be the state examination boards approved by the 
Council. The examination as per the Council curriculum guidelines, will be designed, conducted and evaluated by the 
board and certificates would be issued by the same authority. Three examinations/assessments will be conducted at 
specified intervals for final certification. Registration numbers are allotted to the candidates at the time of admission. 


TYPE OF EXAMINATIONS 


Considering the transformative nature of the NPM program, the NPM educators should be highly efficient, 
competent and motivated to teach and train NPMs to bring about change in the delivery of compassionate and 
respectful midwifery care. The process of evaluation and certification is made robust to meet this demand. 


(i) First assessment 


At the end of 3 months, the NPM educators will undergo examination in one theory paper and one practical 
examination to assess the suitability to continue the course. However, if the NPM educator does not clear the 
examination, she may be given one more chance and if still does not clear, she would be discontinued from the 
program. (Module | and Module 2: Section l-3 would be covered in this examination. 


(ii) Second assessment 


At the end of 6 months, the candidates would undergo Second assessment in theory and practical examination. On 
passing the examination, a provisional certificate of partial completion of the program would be issued. All modules 
are included for the examination. 


(iii) Final assessment 


After completion of 2 months onsite mentorship experience, the NPM educators would appear for their final 
examination in theory and practical conducted at the respective NMTI. All modules are included for the examination. 
On successful completion, the candidates would be certified as NPM educators. 


Note: For all the three examinations, the same pattern of examination will be followed. 
ELIGIBILITY FOR ADMISSION TO EXAMINATION 
The candidates who fulfill the following criteria only would be eligible to appear for the examinations. 
(i) First assessment 
e Completion of at least 90% of prescribed attendance (3 months) for both theory and clinical practice. 
e Completion of 40% of logbook and clinical requirements. 


e Certificate of completion of attendance and requirements by the Principal of College of Nursing/Program 
coordinator (faculty trainer). 


(ii) Second assessment 
e Completion of at least 90% of prescribed attendance (6 months) for both theory and clinical practice. 


e Completion of 80% of logbook and clinical requirements. 


52 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


e Certificate of completion of attendance and requirements by the Principal of College of Nursing/Program 
coordinator (faculty trainer). 


(iii) Final examination 
e Completion of at least 90% of prescribed attendance (6 months) for both theory and clinical practice. 
e Completion of !2 months of mentorship experience in the SMTI according to the plan. 
e Completion of 00% of logbook and clinical requirements. 


e §=Certification of completion of logbook and clinical requirements by the principal college of Nursing/Program 
coordinator (Faculty trainer) based on the records maintained by the respective faculty trainer who mentored 
the NPM educator during the !2 months of onsite training. 


e Successful conduction of trainings for the NPMs in the SMTI. 
PASS: 70% both internal and external together in prescribed theory and practical examination 
SUPPLEMENTARY EXAMINATION 


Candidates who fail in the first assessment would be given one more chance to appear for the examination within 
2-4 weeks in the examination failed, either in theory or practical only and if they fail again and are not found suitable, 
would be discontinued from the program. Candidates who fail in the Second assessment at the end of 6 months, can 
appear for the examination after 6 weeks in the examination failed, either in theory or practical only. The provisional 
certificate of partial completion of the program would be given only after passing the Second assessment. However, 
the candidates can proceed for onsite training under mentorship. 


EXAMINATION PATTERN 


The pattern of examination is the same for all three assessments/examinations. There will be one theory paper and 
one practical examination 


Theory 
Internal assessment External examination 


Theory Total = 25 marks Total = 75 marks; Duration = 3 hours 


Internal (25 marks) + e *Tests: 3 tests x 5 marks = | 5 marks e Multiple choice questions: 


External (75 marks) l0 x | = 0 marks 
- OO वां e *Assignments/presentations: 


5 x 2 marks = ]0 marks e Short answers: 5 x 2 = 0 marks 
Short notes: 5 x 5 = 25 marks 
e Essay/Scenario: 30 marks 


2 x 5 = 30 marks 


Practical Total = 50 marks Total = 50 marks 


Internal (50 marks) + e Clinical performance = 0 marks e OSCE (5 stations) = 20 marks 


External (50 marks) _ ु 
= गत marks e Clinical assignments/presentations = |0_ |e Direct observed practical =30 marks 


marks 


e OSCE = 0 marks 


e Direct observed practical = 20 marks 


*Tests should be conducted for 25 marks (MCQ - 3 marks, Short answers - | x 2 = 2 marks, Short answers 2 x 5 = 0 
marks and essay/scenario type - |0 marks) and converted to 5 marks for consolidation. Assignments/ presentations can 
be scored for !0 marks and converted to 2 marks for consolidation. 


EXAMINERS 
Theory 


e Question paper setting - The board assigns a panel of 2 examiners to set 2 sets of question papers each examiner 
as per the blue-print (Annexure-A). Question papers should be set by the faculty trainers of the NPM educators. 
Questions from these 4 question papers as per the blue-print and question paper pattern are selected and the final 


[भाग पा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 53 


question paper is prepared by the examination board. Confidentiality should be maintained and each faculty who 
is setting the question paper should sign an undertaking of confidentiality. 


Invigilation - The invigilation of the examination should be done by an external faculty appointed by the board. 
The Principal of the nursing college/Program coordinator (faculty trainer) in which the NMTI is located will be 
the chief superintendent of the examination. 


Evaluation - The theory papers should be evaluated at the examination board or the center allotted by the 
examination board by the faculty trainers under the supervision of the secretary/chairperson of the examination 
board. 


Mark sheet — The sample of the mark sheet is enclosed in Annexure-B. 


Practical Examination 


Practical examination should be conducted for 2 to 3 days — on day one OSCE is conducted followed by directly 
observed practical on the subsequent days. 


OSCE - For the conduction of OSCE, a team of 5 evaluators for 5 stations should be appointed by the board from 
the NMTI along with the Principal of the college of nursing/Program coordinator (Faculty trainer) who will be the 
chief superintendent for the examination. An external examiner (faculty trainer) is appointed by the board to 
observe and moderate the conduction of the OSCE sessions. List of the OSCE stations for examination is selected 
by the board and sent to the examination center in a sealed cover — 3 basic skills and 2 advanced skills (List 
enclosed in Annexure-D). 


Directly Observed Practical — This is conducted by a team of 3 examiners. 2 faculty trainers - one internal and 
one external and | medical preceptor who were involved in the teaching program of the NPM educators. 


Qualification of Examiners: M.Sc. nursing, OBG specialty with 5 years of teaching or clinical experience after 
PG with a dual role/M.Sc. OBG nursing with 5 years of experience as faculty with a minimum of 2 years 
midwifery clinical working experience. Medical preceptor should be medical faculty from Obstetrics and 
Gynecology, Pediatrics and Public Health with 3 years post PG experience/consultant. 


CONDUCTION OF EXAMINATION 


The examination schedule for both theory and practical examination is given at least 2 weeks prior to the 
examination by the board. 


Hall tickets are sent from the examination board to the examination center. 
The center for examination is allotted by the examination board. 
The invigilators and practical examiners are appointed by the examination board. 


Question papers are sealed and sent to the examination center or may be done online. The chief superintendent 
who is either the principal/program coordinator (faculty trainer) is responsible for the security of the papers. 


The candidates should use only their registration numbers. Names should not be written anywhere in the answer 
scripts. 


Theory 


The examination hall is arranged with adequate lighting and ventilation. Seating is arranged as per the registration 
number. 


Candidates can be permitted into the hall |5 minutes before commencement of the examination on producing the 
hall ticket. 


Duration of examination is 3 hours. 


No candidates should enter the examination hall after the expiry of thirty minutes from the commencement of 
examination and leave the examination hall before the expiry of sixty minutes from the commencement of the 
examination. 


No electronic devices should be permitted in the examination hall. 
The answer scripts should be signed by the invigilator before commencement of the examination. 


The question paper pack should be opened by the chief superintendent and the invigilators in the presence of the 
candidates |5 minutes prior to commencement. (If online, downloaded in the same manner) 


54 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


e A bell should be given every half an hour of the examination to alert the candidates. 


e On completion of the examination, the answer scripts are collected in order, packed, sealed, signed by the chief 
superintendent and sent to the examination board on the day of examination by registered post or speed post. 


Practical Examination 
(i) Objective Structured Clinical Examination (OSCE) 
e OSCE is done on day | of the examination. 


e The OSCE station list is given by the examination board which can be opened 60 minutes prior to the 
commencement of the examination. 5 stations are selected - 3 basic skills and 2 advanced skills (list of skills 
- Annexure-D). 


e [ach station should be set up with the necessary articles and checklist. 
e Each candidate can be allowed l0 minutes for each station. 


e The time allotted for | OSCE session is 50 minutes. There can be a maximum of 6 rounds of OSCE in a day. 
30 candidates can be assessed on the same day. The candidates who complete the OSCE should not be 
allowed to meet the other candidates waiting for the examination. If the number of candidates is more, the 
examination can be done on the next day with a different set of skill stations. 


e The scores for the OSCE are done for each station by the individual evaluators and the final scoring sheet is 
compiled and consolidated jointly by the external evaluator and chief superintendent. OSCE Score sheet is 
enclosed in Annexure-E. 


(ii) Directly Observed Practical (DOP) 
e DOP is done on day 2 of the examination. 


e Each candidate is allotted a mother for examination - antenatal, intranatal or postnatal by lottery method. 
They would be given 3-4 hours for assessment and care of the mothers and newborn (if postnatal). 


e The care given is evaluated by the internal examiner, external examiner and medical preceptor individually 
and their scores are combined for the final score. Viva voce is conducted in the bedside/ conference room in 
the clinical area. The DOP assessment form is enclosed in Annexure-F. 


e A maximum of |5-20 students can be examined on the same day. 


e The score is compiled with the OSCE scores and signed by the examiners and the chief superintendent. The 
score sheet is sent to the examination board on the day of examination by registered post or speed post. 


RESULTS 

The results of the examination are declared by the examination board within a period of I5 days up to one month 
from the conduction of the examinations. The paper evaluation center can be decided by the board. A candidate 
successfully clears the examination if she has scored at least 70% of marks in both theory and practical papers 
together which is Pass. Format of mark sheet and certificate (provisional & Final) is enclosed in Annexure-B & C. 
CERTIFICATION 
A. Title - Nurse Practitioner Midwifery Educator (NPM Educator) 


B. The title is awarded upon successful completion of the prescribed study program, which will state that the 
candidate 


[भाग ]---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण I55 
i. Has completed the prescribed course of nurse practitioner midwifery educator 


ii. Has attended 90% of the theoretical and !00% of the practical instruction hours before awarding the 
certificate. 


iil. Has passed (70% marks both internal and external together) in the prescribed theory and practical 
examination. 


C. SNRC will register NPM educator as additional qualification. 


On passing the second examination at the end of 6 months, a provisional certificate of partial completion of the 
program would be issued. On successful completion of the final examination, the candidates would be awarded the 
certificate of NPM educator. Model of the certificates are enclosed in Annexure-C. 


SUB-ANNEXURES IN ANNEXURE-VII 
ANNEXURE-A: Blueprint of Question Paper 
Exam : Preliminary/interim/final examination Marks : 75 


Date : Time : 3 hours 


MCQ Short Short | Essay/ Situation 
S.No. Type of questions answers notes Percentage 
] mark 2marks | 5 marks l5 marks 


Remembering (knowledge 
based simple recall 
questions, facts, terms, 
concepts, principles, 
theories, identify, define 
information) 


Understanding 
(comprehension, understand 
conceptually, interpret, 
compare, contrast, explain, 
paraphrase, interpret 
information) 


Analysis and synthesis 
(classify, compare, contrast, 
differentiate, organize and 
integrate new pieces of 
information) 


Evaluation (appraise, judge, 
justify the value or worth of 
a decision or outcome, 


predict outcomes based on 
values) 


उठ. | Application (use abstract 
information in concrete 
situation, apply knowledge 
to new situation, solve 
problems) 


56 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART IHI—SEC.4] 


l0xl=0 2xl04+]I5=35 l00 l00 


*Question Paper Pattern 


Name of the Examination Board: 


State: 


Name of the Theory Examination - First/Second/Final Examination 


Date: Maximum marks: 75 marks 


Duration: 3 hours 


Answer all the questions in the answer booklet given 


I. Multiple choice question: choose the best answer 0 x | = [0 marks 


(A question stem with 4 options) 


II. Short answers: answer in one or two sentences 5 x 2 = 0 marks 


(definitions, meanings, application, differences, list etc.) 


III. Short notes: 4x 5 5८ 20 marks 


(analyze, interpret, comprehend, brief, explain) 


IV. Essay/situation: (2 x 0) + (] x 5) = 35 marks 


(Discuss, apply, narrate, evaluate, compare and contrast) 


ANNEXURE-B: Sample Mark Statement 


Sao OF EXAMINATION BOARD 


STATE 


STATEMENT OF MARKS - NPM EDUCATOR PROGRAM 


जा. आओ, lone NPM Educator Registration Number 


[भागता---खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


ANNXURE-C: Sample Certificates (Provisional & Final) 


A= & OF EXAMINATION BOARD Photo of 


EMBLEM candidate 
STATE (to be 
attested) 


PROVISIONAL CERTIFICATE OF PARTIAL COMPLETION 


The Examination Board hereby 


makes known that , born on 


l57 


58 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Sample of Certificate - Final Certificate 


eee OF EXAMINATION BOARD 

Photo of 

candidate 

EMBLEM Speen (To be 


attested) 


AWARD OF DIPLOMA 
Nurse Practitioner Midwifery Educator 


The Examination Board hereby 


makes known. that , born on 


[भागत--खण्ड 4] 


Seal of the Board 


भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 


ANNEXURE:D: List of Skills for OSCE 


Basic Skills 


Antenatal assessment: calculation of EDD 


Antenatal assessment: detecting pregnancy using 
pregnancy testing kit 


Antenatal examination: measuring blood pressure 


Antenatal examination: measuring pulse 


Advanced Skills 
Management of antenatal complications: pre- 
eclampsia and eclampsia 
Administration of Inj. MgSOx4 


Identification and management of hemorrhage in 
pregnancy 


Preparation and recording of Cardiotocography 


l60 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY 


[PART III—SEc.4] 


5 a ee 


l6. 


ie 


8. 


l9. 
20. 
2. 
22: 


23: 
24. 
2D: 
20. 
27. 
28. 
29. 
30. 
3. 


32 


Abdominal examination during pregnancy 


Laboratory investigation: Testing blood - hemoglobin 


Laboratory investigation: Testing urine for sugar 
Laboratory investigation: Testing urine for protein 
Laboratory investigation: RDT for malaria 

. Glucose challenge test/Glucose Tolerance test 

. Antenatal general examination 

. Administration of Inj. TT 

. Counseling of antenatal woman 

. Setting up of the birthing room/unit 


. Assessment during first stage of labor: PV 
examination including clinical pelvimetry 


Pain management during labour - non- 
pharmacological 


Assessment and care during second stage of labor: 
conducting normal delivery 


Assessment and care during third stage of labor: 
active management 


Essential newborn care 
Examination of placenta 
Assessment and weighing of newborn 


Neonatal immunization - Administration of BCG, 
Hepatitis B vaccine 


Care during fourth stage of labour 

Baby bath 

Perineal/episiotomy care 

Breast care 

Counseling postnatal woman 

Distribution of oral contraceptive pills 
Counseling on postpartum family planning 
Counseling on family planning - method specific 
Post abortion counseling 


. Counseling on breast self-examination 


wi 


Ser 5 नल) 


2 


I3. 
4. 
I5. 


l6. 
04 
8. 
l9. 
20. 
2. 


22, 
23. 
24. 
25. 
20. 
27. 
28. 
29. 
30. 


(CTG)/Non-Stress Test (NST)/Contraction Stress 
Test (CST) 


Assessment during first stage of labor: plotting of 
partograph 


Intrapartum complications: Identify and manage 
Newborn resuscitation 
Kangaroo mother care 


Prepare and perform low forceps operation 


. Conduct Breech delivery 


. Initial management of PPH: preparation and 


administration of oxytocin drip 


Initial Management of PPH: Bimanual compression 
of uterus 


Balloon tamponade for atonic uterus 
Aortic compression for PPH 


Prescription and administration of fluids and 
electrolytes through intravenous 


Manual removal of the placenta 

Catheterization - Plain catheter 

Catheterization - Indwelling catheter 

Starting up of IV line 

Repair of perineal and vaginal tears (upto I degree) 


Identification and first aid management of obstetric 
shock 


Management of postnatal complications 
Oxygen administration 

Care of neonate on phototherapy and ventilator 
Insertion and removal of PPIUCD/PAIUCD 
Perform Manual Vacuum Aspiration 

Post abortion care 

IUCD insertion - Interval 

Pap smear 


Visual inspection with acetic acid/iodine 


* A total of 5 skills — 3 basic and 2 advanced skills are selected for each OSCE session. 


ANNEXURE-E: OSCE SCORE SHEET 


Plan for OSCE Examination and Compilation Sheet 


(External Examination) 


Name of the Examination Centre 


Name of the Examination 


Date 


Total Number of Students : 30 


First/Second/Final Examination 


[भाग शा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 6] 


Time per Station : l0 minutes 


Total duration : 6 hours (4 hours morning, 2 hours evening) 
Evaluators l. 
2. 
3. 
4. 
5. 
Moderator 
Chief Superintendent 
S.No. Station Category Skill Assessed Marks 
] I Basic 20 
Z II Advanced 20 


re 
re 
re 


Total marks 00/5 = 20 marks 


OSCE Compilation sheet 


Name of the Examination Center 


Name of the Examination > First/Second/Final Examination 

Date 

Roll Number of Students allotted : From to 

Total Number of Students > Allotted: Attended: 

Total Number of OSCE Station :_ Basic Skills - 03 Advanced Skills - 02 


OSCE Score Summary Sheet 


Name of OSCE Station Stations Total Marks | Total Marks 


Registration Number (out of 00) | (out of 20) 


l62 THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART II—SECc.4] 


Signature of Moderator Signature of Chief Superintendent 
ANNEXURE-F: Assessment Form for Directly Observed Practical 
NAME OF THE EXAMINATION CENTER 
NPM Educator Program 
Evaluation form for Practical Examination - First/Second/Final Examination 
(Same but separate forms for internal examiner, external examiner and medical preceptor) 


Examiner: Internal/External/Medical Preceptor 


S.No 
Registration 
Number 
General physical 
examination 
assessment 
Plan of care 
Goal/objective 
Midwifery care 
provided 
Application of 
scientific principles 
valuation of care 
Communication 

Education & 
Counseling 
others feedback 
Viva 
Total 


SI = 


= 
S 
E 
E 
२ 
~ 
s 
०० 


ON MN न Uo N 


ioe) 


~— 


No) 


[भाग गा--खण्ड 4] भारत का राजपत्र : असाधारण 63 


Signature of the Examiner 


0 


_ 
>> 


— 
eS) 


— 
न 


— 
MN 


External Practical Examination Consolidation Sheet 


Name of the Examination Center 


Name of the Examination : First/Second/Final Examination 
Dates of the Examination : OSCE - DOP - 
Roll Number of Students allotted : From to 

Total Number of Students Allotted Attended: 


Internal External Medical 
Examiner | Examiner | Preceptor 


64 


THE GAZETTE OF INDIA : EXTRAORDINARY [PART HI—SEC.4] 


Internal Examiner 
Place: 

Date: 

Seal: 


External Examiner Medical Preceptor 


Signature of Chief Superintendent 


(Principal/Program Coordinator/Faculty Trainer) 


ANNEXURE-VIII 
SCOPE OF PRACTICE 
For 
Nurse Practitioner in Midwifery (NPM) Educator 
& 
Nurse Practitioner Midwife 
Document Prepared by MoHFW and Indian Nursing Council (June 202]) 
Reference: Available at MoHFW and INC websites 


Uploaded by Dte. of Printing at Government of India Press, Ring Road, Mayapuri, New Delhi-!!0064 


and Published by the Controller of Publications, Delhi-l0054. — RAvINDER _ 2ea¥ysersty 7 


Date: 2024.03.4 09::28 
KUMAR 40830 


